UAC (As of July 1, 2003) Printed: September 23, 2003 Page 1 R25.
Administrative Services, Finance.
R25-7.
Travel-Related Reimbursements for State Employees.
R25-7-1.
Purpose.
The purpose of this rule is to establish procedures to be followed by departments to pay travel-related reimbursements to state employees.
R25-7-2.
Authority and Exemptions.
(1) This rule is established pursuant to Section 63A-3-107, which authorizes the Division of Finance to adopt rules covering in-state and out-of-state travel.
(2) Senate Bill 1, Line Item 60 of the 2000 legislative session (2000 Utah Laws 344), as continued by House Bill 1, Item 57 of the 2001 legislative session (2001 Utah Laws 334), Senate Bill 1, Item 49 of the 2002 legislative session (2002 Utah Laws 277) and House Bill 1, Item 52 of the 2003 legislative session contains intent language directing that the mileage reimbursement rate authorized in Section R25-7-10 also be applied to legislative staff, the Judicial Branch and to the Utah System of Higher Education.
R25-7-3.
Definitions.
(1 ) "Agency" means any department, division, commission, council, board, bureau, committee, office, or other administrative subunit of state government.
(2) "Boards" means policy boards, advisory boards, councils, or committees within state government.
(3) "Department" means all executive departments of state government.
(4) "Finance" means the Division of Finance.
(5) "Per diem" means an allowance paid daily.
(6) "Policy" means the policies and procedures of the Division of Finance, as published in the "Accounting Policies and Procedures."
(7) "Rate" means an amount of money.
(8) "Reimbursement" means money paid to compensate an employee for money spent.
(9) "State employee" means any person who is paid on the state payroll system.
R25-7-4.
Eligible Expenses.
(1) Reimbursements are intended to cover all normal areas of expense.
(2) Requests for reimbursement must be accompanied by original receipts for all expenses except those for which flat allowance amounts are established.
R25-7-5.
Approvals.
(1) For insurance purposes, all state business travel, whether reimbursed by the state or not, must have prior approval by an appropriate authority.
This also includes non-state employees where the state is paying for the travel expenses.
(2) Both in-state and out-of-state travel must be approved by the department head or designee.
(3) Exceptions to the prior approval for out-of-state travel must be justified in the comments section of the Request for Out-of-State Travel Authorization, form FI 5, or on an attachment, and must be approved by the Department Director
or the designee.
(4) The Department Director, the Executive Director, or the designee must approve all travel to out-of-state functions where more than two employees from the same department are attending the same function at the same time.
R25-7-6.
Reimbursement for Meals.
(1) State employees who travel on state business may be eligible for a meal reimbursement.
(2) The reimbursement will include tax, tips, and other expenses associated with the meal.
(3) Allowances for in-state travel differ from those for outof-state travel.
(a) The daily travel meal allowance for in-state travel is $30.00 and is computed according to the rates listed in the following table.
1 ELBAT
(b) The daily travel meal allowance for out-of-state travel is $38.00 and is computed according to the rates listed in the following table.
2 ELBAT
(4) When traveling to premium cities (New York, Los Angeles, Chicago, San Francisco, Washington DC, Boston, and Atlanta), the traveler may choose to accept the per diem rate for out-of-state travel or to be reimbursed at the actual meal cost, with original receipts, up to $50 per day.
(a) The traveler must be entitled to be reimbursed for all meals for the day in order to qualify for premium rates for a given day.
(b ) The traveler must use the same method of reimbursement for an entire day.
(c) Actual meal cost includes tips. (d) Alcoholic beverages are not reimbursable.
(5) When traveling in foreign countries, the traveler may choose to accept the per diem rate for out-of-state travel or to be reimbursed at the reasonable, actual meal cost, with original receipts.
(a) The traveler may combine the reimbursement methods during a trip; however, he must use the same method of reimbursement for an entire day.
(b) Actual meal cost includes tips. (c) Alcoholic beverages are not reimbursable.
(6) The meal reimbursement calculation is comprised of
secnawollA laeM levarT etatS-fo-tuO
secnawollA laeM levarT etatS-nI 0 0 0 0 e 0 0 0 0 e 0 0 0 0 t 0 0 0 0 t . . . . a . . . . a 0 5 9 6 R 8 8 1 9 R 3$ 1$ $ $ 3$ 1$ 1$ $ l re h tsafk s l re h tsafk s a n c a l a n c a l t n n e a t n n e a o i u r e o i u r e T D L B M T D L B M
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 2
three parts: (a) The day the travel begins.
The traveler's entitlement is determined by the time of day he leaves his home base (the location the employee leaves from and/or returns to), as illustrated in the following table.
3 ELBAT
R25-7-7.
Meal Per Diem for Statutory Non-Salaried State Boards.
(1) When a board meets and conducts business activities during mealtime, the cost of meals may be charged as public expense.
(2) Where salaried employees of the State of Utah or other advisors or consultants must, of necessity, attend such a meeting in order to permit the board to carry on its business, the meals of such employees, advisors, or consultants may also be paid.
In determining whether or not the presence of such employees, advisors, or consultants is necessary, the boards are requested to restrict the attendance of such employees, advisors, or consultants to those absolutely necessary at such mealtime meetings.
R25-7-8.
Reimbursement for Lodging.
State employees who travel on state business may be eligible for a lodging reimbursement.
(1) Lodging is reimbursed for single occupancy only.
(2) For non-conference hotel in-state travel, where the department/traveler makes reservations through the State Travel Agency, the state will reimburse the actual cost up to $55 per night plus tax except in Moab, Cedar City, St. George, metropolitan Salt Lake City (Draper to Centerville), Ogden city, Park City, Tooele, Heber City, Midway, and Provo/Orem city.
In these areas, the rates are: (a) Moab, Cedar City, and St. George - $65 per night plus tax (b) Metropolitan Salt Lake City (Draper to Centerville), Park City, Tooele, Heber City, and Midway - $68 per night plus tax (c) Ogden city and Provo/Orem city - $63 per night plus tax (3) The state will reimburse the actual cost per night plus tax for out-of-state travel where the department/traveler makes reservations through the State Travel Agency.
(4) The same rates apply for in-state travel for stays at a non-conference hotel where the department/traveler makes their own reservations.
(5) For out-of-state travel, the state will reimburse the actual cost up to $65 per night plus tax.
(6) Exceptions will be allowed for unusual circumstances when approved in writing by the Department Director or designee prior to the trip.
(a) For out-of-state travel, the approval may be on the form FI 5.
( b) Attach the written approval to the Travel Reimbursement Request, form FI 51B or FI 51D.
(7) For stays at a conference hotel, the state will reimburse the actual cost plus tax for both in-state and out-of-state travel.
The traveler must include the conference registration brochure with the Travel Reimbursement Request, form FI 51A or FI 51B.
(8) A proper receipt for lodging accommodations must accompany each request for reimbursement.
(a) The tissue copy of the MasterCard Corporate charge receipt is not acceptable.
(b) A proper receipt is a copy of the registration form generally used by motels and hotels which includes the
(b) The days at the location.
(i) Complimentary meals of a hotel, motel, and/or association and meals included in the registration cost are deducted from the total daily meal allowance.
(ii) Meals provided on airlines will not reduce the meal allowance.
(c) The day the travel ends.
The meal reimbursement the traveler is entitled to is determined by the time of day he returns to his home base, as illustrated in the following table.
4 ELBAT
(7) An employee may be authorized by his Department Director or designee to receive a meal allowance when his destination is at least 100 miles from his home base and he does not stay overnight.
(a) Breakfast is paid when the employee leaves his home base before 6:01 a.m. (b) Lunch is paid when the trip meets one of the following requirements: (i) The employee is on an officially approved trip that warrants entitlement to breakfast and dinner.
(ii) The employee leaves his home base before 10 a.m. and returns after 2 p.m. (iii) The Department Director provides prior written approval based on circumstances.
(c) Dinner is paid when the employee leaves his home base and returns after 7 p.m. (d) The allowance is not considered an absolute right of the employee and is authorized at the discretion of the Department Director or designee.
D ,L , thgindim-10 .m retrauQ h
slaem o thgindim-10 .m retrauQ h
00.03$
00.83$
B : . t
n : . t
0$
0$
* 7 p 4
* 6 p 4
L, 00:7-10: .m retrauQ d
D* 00:6-10:21 .m.p retrauQ dr3 B 2 . r * 1 p 3
snigeB levarT yaD ehT sdnE levarT yaD ehT renniD=D ,hcnuL=L ,tsafkaerB=B 00.02$ 00.9$ 0 etatS-fo-tu 00.51$ 00.6$ 0 n n 2 . s renniD=D ,hcnuL=L ,tsafkaerB= 00.81$ 00.92$ 00.8 etatS-fo-t 00.51$ 00.42$ 00.0 etatSD ,L , 00:6-10: .m retrauQ t B* noon-10:6 .m.a retrauQ dn2 etatSslaem o 00:6-10: .m retrauQ t D, noon-10 .m retrauQ d L : . n * 6 a 2 B 3 u 3 n B 2 . s * $ O $ I * 1 a 1 * $ O $ I * 1 a 1
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 3
following information: name of motel/hotel, street address, town and state, telephone number, current date, name of person/persons staying at the motel/hotel, date of occupancy, amount and date paid, signature of agent, number in the party, and single or double occupancy.
(9) Travelers may also elect to stay with friends or relatives or use their personal campers or trailer homes instead of staying in a hotel.
(a) With proof of staying overnight away from home on approved state business, the traveler will be reimbursed the following: (i) $20 per night with no receipts required or (ii) Actual cost up to $30 per night with a signed receipt from a facility such as a campground or trailer park, not from a private residence.
(10) Travelers who are on assignment away from their home base for longer than 90 days will be reimbursed as follows: (a) First 30 days - follow regular rules for lodging and meals.
Lodging receipt is required.
(b) After 30 days - $46 per day for lodging and meals.
No receipt is required.
R25-7-9.
Reimbursement for Incidentals.
State employees who travel on state business may be eligible for a reimbursement for incidental expenses.
(1) Travelers will be reimbursed for actual out-of-pocket costs for incidental items such as baggage tips and transportation costs.
(a) Tips for maid service, doormen, and meals are not reimbursable.
(b) No other gratuities will be reimbursed.
(c) Include an original receipt for each individual incidental item above $20.00 and for all airport parking.
(2) The state will reimburse incidental ground transportation and parking expenses.
(a) Travelers shall document all official business use of taxi, bus, parking, and other ground transportation including dates, destinations, parking locations, receipts, and amounts.
(b) Personal use of such transportation to restaurants is not reimbursable.
(c) Parking at the Salt Lake City airport will be reimbursed at a maximum of the airport long-term parking rate with a receipt.
(3) Registration should be paid in advance on a state warrant.
(a) A copy of the approved FI 5 form must be included with the Payment Voucher for out-of-state registrations.
(b) If a traveler must pay the registration when he arrives, the agency is expected to process a Payment Voucher and have the traveler take the state warrant with him.
(4) Telephone calls related to state business are reimbursed at the actual cost.
(a) The traveler shall list the amount of these calls separately on the Travel Reimbursement Request, form FI 51A or FI 51B.
(b) The traveler must provide an original lodging receipt or original personal phone bill showing the phone number called and the dollar amount for business telephone calls and personal
telephone calls made during stays of five nights or more.
(5) Allowances for personal telephone calls made while out of town on state business overnight will be based on the number of nights away from home.
(a) Four nights or less - actual amount up to $2.50 per night (documentation is not required for personal phone calls made during stays of four nights or less) (b) Five to eleven nights - actual amount up to $20.00 (c) Twelve nights to thirty nights - actual amount up to $30.00 (d) More than thirty days - start over (6) Actual laundry expenses up to $18.00 per week will be allowed for trips in excess of six consecutive nights, beginning after the sixth night out.
(a) The traveler must provide receipts for the laundry expense.
(b) For use of coin-operated laundry facilities, the traveler must provide a list of dates, locations, and amounts.
(7) An amount of $5 per day will be allowed for travelers away in excess of six consecutive nights beginning after the sixth night out.
(a) This amount covers miscellaneous incidentals not covered in this rule.
(b) This allowance is not available for travelers going to conferences.
R25-7-10.
Reimbursement for Transportation.
State employees who travel on state business may be eligible for a transportation reimbursement.
(1) Air transportation is limited to Air Coach or Excursion class.
(a) All reservations (in-state and out-of-state) should be made through the State Travel Office for the least expensive air fare available at the time reservations are made.
(b) Only one change fee per trip will be reimbursed.
(c) The explanation for the change and any other exception to this rule must be given and approved by the Department Director or designee. (d) In order to preserve insurance coverage, travelers must fly on tickets in their names only.
(2) Travelers may be reimbursed for mileage to and from the airport and long-term parking or away-from-the-airport parking.
(a) The maximum reimbursement for parking, whether travelers park at the airport or away from the airport, is the airport long-term parking rate.
(b) The parking receipt must be included with the Travel Reimbursement Request, form FI 51A or FI 51B.
(c) Travelers may be reimbursed for mileage to and from the airport to allow someone to drop them off and to pick them up.
(3) Travelers may use private vehicles with prior approval from the Department Director or designee.
(a) Only one person in a vehicle may receive the reimbursement, regardless of the number of people in the vehicle.
(b) Reimbursement for a private vehicle will be at the rate of 30 cents per mile, or 36 cents per mile if a state fleet vehicle is not available to the employee.
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 4
(c) Agencies may establish a reimbursement rate that is more restrictive than the rate established in this Section.
(d) Exceptions must be approved in writing by the Director of Finance.
(e) Mileage will be computed from the latest official state road map and will be limited to the most economical, usually traveled routes.
(f) The mileage rate is all-inclusive, and additional expenses such as parking and storage will not be allowed unless approved in writing by the Department Director.
(g) An approved Private Vehicle Usage Report, form FI 40, should be included with the department's payroll documentation reporting miles driven on state business during the payroll period.
(h) Departments may allow mileage reimbursement on an approved Travel Reimbursement Request, form FI 51A or FI 51B, if other costs associated with the trip are to be reimbursed at the same time.
(4) A traveler may choose to drive instead of flying if approved by the Department Director.
(a) If the traveler drives a state-owned vehicle, the traveler may be reimbursed for meals and lodging for a reasonable amount of travel time; however, the total cost of the trip must not exceed the equivalent cost of the airline trip.
The traveler may also be reimbursed for incidental expenses such as toll fees and parking fees.
(b) If the traveler drives a privately-owned vehicle, reimbursement will be at the rate of 30 cents per mile or the airplane fare, whichever is less, unless otherwise approved by the Department Director.
(i) The lowest fare available within 30 days prior to the departure date will be used when calculating the cost of travel for comparison to private vehicle cost.
(ii) An itinerary printout which is available through the State Travel Office is required when the traveler is taking a private vehicle.
(c) The traveler may be reimbursed for meals and lodging for a reasonable amount of travel time; however, the total cost of the trip must not exceed the equivalent cost of an airline trip.
(d) These reimbursements are all-inclusive, and additional expenses such as parking and toll fees will not be allowed unless approved in writing by the Department Director.
(e) When submitting the reimbursement form, attach a schedule comparing the cost of driving with the cost of flying.
The schedule should show that the total cost of the trip driving was less than or equal to the total cost of the trip flying.
(f) If the travel time taken for driving during the employee's normal work week is greater than that which would have occurred had the employee flown, the excess time used will be taken as annual leave and deducted on the Time and Attendance System.
(5) Use of rental vehicles must be approved in writing in advance by the Department Director.
(a) An exception to advance approval of the use of rental vehicles shall be fully explained in writing with the request for reimbursement and approved by the Department Director.
(b) Detailed explanation is required if a rental vehicle is requested for a traveler staying at a conference hotel.
(c) When making rental car arrangements through the State
Travel Agency, reserve the vehicle you need.
Upgrades in size or model made when picking up the rental vehicle will not be reimbursed.
(i) State employees should rent vehicles to be used for state business in their own names, using the state contract so they will have full coverage under the state's liability insurance.
(ii) Rental vehicle reservations not made through the travel agency must be approved in advance by the Department Director.
(iii) The traveler will be reimbursed the actual rate charged by the rental agency.
(iv) The traveler must have approval for a rental car in order to be reimbursed for rental car parking.
(6) Travel by private airplane must be approved in advance by the Department Director or designee.
(a) The pilot must certify to the Department Director that he is certified to fly the plane being used for state business.
(b) If the plane is owned by the pilot/employee, he must certify the existence of at least $500,000 of liability insurance coverage.
(c) If the plane is a rental, the pilot must provide written certification from the rental agency that his insurance covers the traveler and the state as insured.
The insurance must be adequate to cover any physical damage to the plane and at least $500,000 for liability coverage.
(d) Reimbursement will be made at 50 cents per mile. (e) Mileage calculation is based on air mileage and is limited to the most economical, usually-traveled route.
(7) Travel by private motorcycle must be approved prior to the trip by the Department Director or designee.
Travel will be reimbursed at 16 cents per mile.
(8) A car allowance may be allowed in lieu of mileage reimbursement in certain cases.
Prior written approval from the Department Director, the Department of Administrative Services, and the Governor is required.
KEY: air travel, per diem allowances, state employees, transportation July 1, 2003 63A-3-107 Notice of Continuation May 1, 2003 63A-3-106 2000 Utah Laws 344 2001 Utah Laws 334 2002 Utah Laws 277 H.B. 1 Item 52, 2003 General Session
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 5
R65.
Agriculture and Food, Marketing and Conservation.
R65-2.
Utah Cherry Marketing Order.
R65-2-1.
Authority.
Promulgated under authority of Section 4-2-2(1)(e).
R65-2-2.
Definitions of Terms.
A. "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Agriculture and Food of the State of Utah.
B. "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, legal representative, or any organized group of individuals.
C. "Cherries" mean sweet cherries produced for the fresh, brine, and frozen markets.
D. "Producer" means any person in this State in the business of producing or causing to be produced cherries for the fresh, brine, or frozen markets, with at least one acre of trees in production, provided such producers shall not include producers who sell all the commodity direct to the consumer.
E. "Registered" producer means a producer who has indicated that he/she wants to be included in the marketing order voting process by registering to vote in the referendum.
Registration forms may be mailed out with the ballots.
F. "Known" producer means a producer of a specific commodity who has been identified by the commodity group, her/himself, or a third party as being eligible to register to vote in a referendum affecting that specific commodity.
R65-2-3.
Board.
A.
A Board of Control is hereby established consisting of seven members, two of whom shall be handlers to carry out the provisions of the order.
B.
The original members of the Board of Control shall be selected by the Commissioner from a list of names submitted by the industry.
C. Successors to original members may be appointed by the Commissioner from names submitted by the industry.
Three grower members and one handler member shall be appointed for a term of four year in February of 1980.
Two grower members and one handler member shall be appointed for four years in February of 1982.
D.
No member of such Board shall receive a salary but each shall be entitled to his actual expenses incurred while engaged in performing his duties herein authorized in accordance with Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
E.
The duties of the Board shall be administrative only and may include only the acts mentioned in this Marketing Order.
F.
All decisions of the Board of Control shall be by majority vote.
G.
No member of the Board, nor any employee of the Board, shall be deemed responsible individually in any way whatsoever to any producer, distributor, handler, processor, or any other person, for errors of judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission of principal, agent, person, or employee, except for his own individual acts of dishonesty or crime.
No such person or employee shall be held responsible individually for any act or omission of any other member of the Board.
The liability of the members of such Board shall be several and not joint, and no member shall be liable for the default of any other member.
R65-2-4.
Provisions of the Order.
A.
This order provides for: 1.
Uniform grading of cherries for fresh, frozen, or brine markets, sold or offered for sale by producers or handlers.
Such grading standards shall not be established below any minimum standards now prescribed by law for this state.
2.
Advertising and sales promotion to create new or larger markets for cherries grown in Utah, provided that any such plan shall be directed towards increasing the sale of such commodity without any reference to a particular brand or trade name.
Provided further, that no advertising or sales promotion program shall be authorized which shall make use of false or unwarranted claims in behalf of the product covered by this Order, or disparage the quality, value, sale or use of any other agricultural commodity to supply the market demands of consumers of such commodity.
3.
Labeling, marking, or branding of cherries which does not conflict with any rules of the Commissioner or laws of the State of Utah.
4.
The Board of Control to cooperate with any other state or federal agency whose activities may be deemed beneficial to the purposes of this Order.
B. Expenses - Assessments - Collections and Disbursement.
1.
Each producer subject to this Order shall pay to the Board his or her pro rata share of such expenses as the Commissioner may find necessary to be incurred by the Board for the functioning of said Marketing Order.
This assessment levied in the specified amount shall constitute a personal debt of every person so assessed and shall be due and payable when payment is called for thereby.
The pro rata share of the expenses payable by a cooperative association of producers shall be computed on the basis of the quantity of the product covered by the Order which is distributed, sold, or shipped in commerce by such cooperative association of producers.
The Board may maintain in its own name, or in the name of its members, a suit against any producer, subject to this Order, for the collection of such producer's pro rata share of expenses.
2.
This assessment shall be set at $2 per ton for brine and frozen cherries and up to $25 per ton for fresh cherries.
The discretionary assessment shall be set by the majority vote of the board, and approved by the Commissioner.
The assessment is effective June 1, 1984.
3.
The assessment of each producer shall be deducted from the producer's gross receipt of sweet cherries by the dealer or producer-handler.
All proceeds from the deducted portion shall be paid annually to the Commission upon request of the Board.
4.
The Board shall retain records of the receipt of the assessment which will be available for public inspection upon request.
5.
The Board of Control is required to reimburse the Commissioner for any funds as are expended by the Commissioner in performing his duties, as provided in this Order.
Such reimbursement to include only funds actually expended in connection with this Order.
6.
The Board is authorized to incur such expenses as are necessary to carry out its functions subject to the approval of the Commissioner.
The Board shall receive and disburse all funds received by it pursuant to Section R65-2-5.
Any funds
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 6
remaining at the end of any year over and above the necessary expenses of said Board of Control may be divided among all persons from whom such funds were collected, or, at the discretion of the Board, such amounts may be applied to the necessary expenses of the Board for the continuation of its program during the next succeeding year, and in such case the Board shall credit all persons from whom such funds were collected with their proper proportions thereof.
7.
The Board shall retain records of the receipt of the assessment.
These records shall be audited annually by an auditor approved by the Commissioner.
Copies of the audit shall be available to any contributor upon request.
R65-2-5.
Division of Funds.
Assessment made and monies collected under provisions of this order shall be divided into assessments and funds for A. administrative purposes, B. advertising purposes, and C. research purposes.
Such assessments and funds shall be used solely for the purposes for which they are collected; provided, that no funds be used for political or lobbying activities.
R65-2-6.
Refund.
Any producer who wishes a refund of their assessments may receive such by notifying the Board in writing of their request by December 31 for cherries harvested in that harvest year.
R65-2-7.
Complaints for Violation - Procedure.
Complaints for violation shall be handled by the responsible legal agencies and shall be enforced in the civil courts of the State.
R65-2-8.
Termination of Order.
The Commissioner may terminate the Marketing Order at such time as he may determine there is no longer an industry need for such order.
This order shall be reviewed or amended at least every five years by the industry, Subsection 4-2-2(3)(a).
Once a year, a referendum vote may be called at the request of the producers through a petition of ten percent of the producers.
KEY: promotions May 1, 1996 Notice of Continuation June 13, 2003
4-2-2(1)(e)
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 7
R65.
Agriculture and Food, Marketing and Conservation.
R65-5.
Utah Red Tart and Sour Cherry Marketing Order.
R65-5-1.
Authority.
Promulgated under authority of Section 4-2-2(1)(e).
R65-5-2.
Definitions of Terms.
A. "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Agriculture and Food of the State of Utah.
B. "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, legal representative, or any organized group of individuals.
C. "Cherries" mean all marketable Red Tart and Sour cherries produced and sold to manufacturers or consumers.
D. "Producer" means any person in this state in the business of producing or causing to be produced Red Tart or Sour cherries, that has a minimum of 300 trees or has received $500.00 or more from a processor for the previous year's production.
E. "Registered" producer means a producer who has indicated that he/she wants to be included in the marketing order voting process by registering to vote in the referendum.
Registration forms may be mailed out with the ballots.
Only registered voting producers will be counted.
F. "Known" producers means a producer of a specific commodity who has been identified by the commodity group, her/himself, or a third party as being eligible to register to vote in a referendum affecting that specific commodity.
G. "Processor" means any person engaged in canning, freezing, dehydrating, fermenting, distilling, extracting, preserving, grinding, crushing, or in any other way preserving or changing the form of cherries for the purpose of marketing them.
H. "Board" means Red Tart and Sour Cherry Marketing Board.
R65-5-3.
Board.
A.
A Board is hereby established consisting of seven members, two of whom shall be processors to carry out the provisions of the order.
B.
The original members of the Board of Control shall be selected by the Commissioner from a list of names submitted by the industry.
Three grower members and one processor member shall be appointed for a term of four years.
Two grower members and one processor member shall be appointed for four years.
C. Successors to original members may be appointed by the Commissioner from names submitted by the industry.
D.
No member of such Board shall receive a salary but each shall be entitled to his actual expenses incurred while engaged in performing his duties herein authorized in accordance with Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
E.
The duties of the Board shall be administrative only and may include only the acts mentioned in this Marketing Order.
F.
All decisions of the Board of Control shall be by majority vote.
G.
No member of the Board, nor any employee of the Board, shall be deemed responsible individually in any way whatsoever to any producer, distributor, handler, processor, or any other person, for errors of judgment, mistakes, or other acts,
either of commission or omission of principal, agent, person, or employee, except for his own individual acts of dishonesty or crime.
No such person or employee shall be held responsible individually for any act or omission of any other member of the Board.
The liability of the members of such Board shall be several and not joint, and no member shall be liable for the default of any other member.
R65-5-4.
Provisions of the Order.
A.
This order shall provide for: 1.
Uniform grading Red Tart and Sour cherries for fresh or frozen markets, sold or offered for sale by producers or processors.
Such grading standards shall not be established below any minimum standards now prescribed by law for this state.
2.
Advertising and sales promotion to create new or larger markets for cherries grown in Utah, provided that any such plan shall be directed towards increasing the sale of such commodity without any reference to a particular brand or trade name.
Provided further, that no advertising or sales promotion program shall be authorized which shall make use of false or unwarranted claims in behalf of the product covered by this Order, or disparage the quality, value, sale or use of any other agricultural commodity to supply the market demands of consumers of such commodity.
3.
Labeling, marketing, or branding of cherries which does not conflict with any rules of the Commissioner or laws of the State of Utah.
4.
The Board of Control to cooperate with any other state or federal agency whose activities may be deemed beneficial to the purposes of the Order.
B. Expenses-Assessments-Collections and Disbursement.
1.
Each producer or processor subject to this Order shall pay to the Board his or her pro rata share (as approved by the Commissioner) of such expenses as the Board may find necessary to be incurred for the functioning of said Marketing Order.
This assessment levied in the specified amount shall constitute a personal debt of every person so assessed and shall be due and payable when payment is called for thereby.
The pro rata share of the expenses payable by a cooperative association of producers shall be computed on the basis of the quantity of the product covered by the Order which is distributed, sold, or shipped in commerce by such cooperative association of producers or processors.
The Board may maintain in its own name, or in the name of its members, a suit against any producer, or processor subject to this Order, for the collection of such producer's pro rata share of expenses.
2.
This assessment shall be determined to be up to $10.00 per ton for Red Tart and Sour cherries.
The discretionary assessment shall be set by majority vote of the board, as approved by the Commissioner.
The assessment is effective May 1, 1983.
3.
The assessment of each producer shall be deducted from the producer's gross receipt of Red Tart and Sour cherries by the producer-processor.
All proceeds from the deducted portion shall be paid annually to the Board on or before October 1, for that crop year.
4.
The Board shall retain records of the receipt of the assessment which will be available for public inspection upon
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 8
request.
The Board shall issue an annual financial statement to the Commissioner showing receipts and reimbursement.
This statement shall be made available to any contributor upon request.
5.
The Board is required to reimburse the Commissioner for any funds as are expended by him in performing his duties as provided in this Order.
Such reimbursement shall include only funds actually expended in connection with this Order.
6.
The Board is authorized to incur such expenses as are necessary to carry out its functions subject to the approval of the Commissioner.
The Board shall receive and disburse all funds received by it pursuant to Section R65-5-5.
7.
The Board shall retain records of the receipt of the assessment.
These records shall be audited annually by an auditor approved by the Commissioner.
Copies of the audit shall be available to any contributor upon request.
R65-5-5.
Division of Funds.
Assessment made and monies collected under provisions of this order shall be divided into assessments and funds for administrative, advertising and research purposes.
Such assessments and funds shall be used solely for the purposes for which they are collected; provided, that no funds be used for political or lobbying activities.
R65-5-6.
Complaints for Violation - Procedure.
Complaints for violation shall be handled by the responsible legal agencies and shall be enforced in the civil courts of the State.
R65-5-7.
Termination of Order.
The Commissioner may terminate the Marketing Order at such time as he may determine there is no longer an industry need for such order.
This order shall be reviewed or amended at least every five years by the industry.
Once a year, a referendum vote may be called at the request of the producers through a petition of ten percent of the registered producers.
KEY: promotions 1989 Notice of Continuation June 13, 2003
4-2-2(1)(e)
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 9
R65.
Agriculture and Food, Marketing and Conservation.
R65-7.
Horse Racing.
R65-7-1.
Authority.
Promulgated under authority of Section 4-38-4.
R65-7-2.
Definitions.
The following definitions shall apply in these rules unless otherwise indicated.
1.
"Act" means the Utah Horse Regulation Act.
2.
"Added money" means all monies added to the fees paid by the horsemen into the purse for a race.
3.
"Age" of a horse is reckoned as beginning on the first day of January in the year in which the horse is foaled.
4.
"Also Eligible" pertains to (a) a number of eligible horses, properly entered, which were not drawn for inclusion in a race, but which become eligible according to preference or lot if an entry is scratched prior to scratch time deadline; (b) the next preferred nonqualifier for the finals or consolation from a set of elimination trials which will become eligible in the event a finalist is scratched by the stewards for a rule violation or is otherwise eligible if written race conditions permit.
5.
"Arrears" means money past due for entrance fees, jockey fees, or nomination or supplemental fees in nomination races, and therefore in default incidental to these Rules or the conditions of a race.
6.
"Authorized Agent" means a person appointed by a written instrument, signed and acknowledged before a notary public by the owner in whose behalf the Agent will act.
Said instrument must be on file with the Commission and its authorized representatives.
7.
"Bleeder" means a horse which during or following exercise or the race is observed to be shedding blood from one or both nostrils, or the mouth, or hemorrhaging in the lumen of the respiratory tract.
8.
"Breeder" of a horse is the owner or lessee of its dam at the time of breeding.
9.
"Closing" means the time published by the organization after which nominations or entries will not be accepted for a race.
10.
"Commission" means the Utah Horse Racing Commission.
11.
"Commissioner" means a member of the Commission.
12.
"Conditions of a race" are the qualifications which determine a horse's eligibility to enter.
13.
"Day" is a period of 24 hours beginning at midnight.
14.
"Race day" is a day during which horse races are conducted.
15.
"Declaration" means the act of withdrawing an entered horse from a race before the closing of overnight entries.
16.
"Drug (Medication)" means a substance foreign to the normal physiology of the horse.
17.
"Enclosure" means all areas of the property of an organization licensee to which admission can be obtained only by payment of an admission fee or upon presentation of proper credentials and all parking areas designed to serve the facility which are owned or leased by the organization licensee.
18.
"Entry" means a horse made eligible to run in a race.
19.
"Family" means a husband, wife and any dependent children.
20.
"Field" means all horses competing in a race.
21.
"Financial Interest" means an interest that could result in directly or indirectly receiving a pecuniary gain or sustaining a pecuniary loss as a result of ownership or interest in a business entity, or as a result of salary, gratuity, or other compensation or remuneration from any person.
22.
"Foreign Substances" are all substances, except those which exist naturally in the untreated horse at normal physiological concentration, and shall include but not be limited to all narcotics, stimulants, or depressants.
23.
"Foul" means an action by any horse or jockey that hinders or interferes with another horse or jockey during the running of a race.
24.
"Horse" means an equine of any breed and includes a stallion, gelding, mare, colt, filly, spayed mare or ridgeling.
25.
"Horse Racing" means any type of horse racing, including Arabian, Appaloosa, Paint, Pinto, Quarter Horse, and Thoroughbred horse racing.
26.
Horse Racing Types: A. "Appaloosa Horse Racing" means the form of horse racing in which each participating horse is an Appaloosa horse registered with the Appaloosa Horse Club or any successor organization and mounted by a jockey.
B. "Arabian Horse Racing" means the form of horse racing in which each participating horse is an Arabian horse registered with the Arabian Horse Club Registry of America and approved by the Arabian Horse Racing Association of America or any successor organization, mounted by a jockey, and engaged in races on the flat over a distance of not less than one-quarter mile or more than four miles.
C. "Paint Horse Racing" means the form of horse racing in which each participating horse is a Paint horse registered with the American Paint Horse Association or any successor organization and mounted by a jockey.
D. "Pinto Horse Racing" means the form of horse racing in which each participating horse is a Pinto horse registered with the Pinto Horse Association of America, Inc., or any successor organization and mounted by a jockey.
E. "Quarter Horse Racing" means the form of horse racing where each participating horse is a Quarter Horse registered with the American Quarter Horse Association or any successor organization, mounted by a jockey, and engaged in a race over a distance of less than one-half mile.
F. "Thoroughbred Horse Racing" means the form of horse racing in which each participating horse is a Thoroughbred horse registered with the Jockey Club or any successor organization, mounted by a Jockey, and engaged in races on the flat.
27.
"Inquiry" means the stewards immediate investigation into the running of a race which may result in the disqualification of one or more horses.
28.
"Jockey" means the rider licensed to race.
29.
"Jockey Agent" means a licensed authorized representative of a jockey.
30.
"Lessee" means a licensed owner whose interest in a horse is by virtue of a completed Commission-approved lease form attached to the registration certificate and on file with the Commission.
31.
"Lessor" means the owner of the horse that is leased.
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 10
32.
"Maiden" means a horse that has never won a race recognized by the official race records of the particular horse's breed registry.
A maiden which has been disqualified after finishing first is still a maiden.
33.
"Minor" means any individual under 18 years of age.
34.
"Nominator" means the person who nominated the horse as a possible contender in a race.
35.
"Objection" means: A.
A written complaint made to the Stewards concerning a horse entered in a race and filed not later than two hours prior to the scheduled post time for the first race on the day which the questioned horse is entered; B.
A verbal claim of foul in a race lodged by the horse's jockey, trainer, owner, or the owners licensed Authorized Agent before the race is declared official.
36.
"Occupation License" means a requirement for any person acting in any capacity within the enclosure during the race meeting.
37.
"Occupation Licensee" means a person who has obtained an occupation license.
38.
"Utah Bred Horse" means a horse that is sired by a stallion standing in Utah.
39.
"Organization License" means a requirement of any person desiring to conduct a race meeting within the state of Utah.
40.
"Organization Licensee" means any person receiving an organization license.
Owner is any person who holds, in whole or in part, any rights title or interest in a horse, or any lessee of a horse who has been duly issued a currently valid owner's license as a person responsible for such horse.
41.
"Person" means any individual, corporation, partnership, syndicate, another association or entity.
42.
"Post Position" means the position in the starting gate assigned to the horse for the race.
43.
"Post Time" means the advertised time for the arrival of the horses at the start of the race.
44.
"Protest" means a written complaint, signed by the protester, against any horse which has started in a race and shall be made to the Stewards within 48 hours after the running of the race, except as noted in Subsection R65-7-10(8).
45.
"Race Meeting" means the entire period of time not to exceed 20 calendar days separating any race days for which an organization license has been granted to a person by the Commission to hold horse racing.
46.
"Allowance" means a race in which eligibility and/or the weight to be carried are based upon the horse's past performance over a specified time.
47.
"Handicap" means a race in which the weights to be carried by the entered horses are assigned according to the Racing Secretary's evaluation of each horse's potential for the purpose of equalizing their respective chances of winning.
48.
"Invitational" means a race in which the competing horses are selected by inviting their owners to enter specific horses.
49.
"Match" means a race contest between two horses with prior consent by the Commission under conditions agreed to by the owners.
50.
"Nomination" means a race in which the subscription to a payment schedule nominates and sustains the eligibility of
a particular horse.
Nominations must close at least 72 hours before the first post time of the day the race is originally scheduled to be run.
51.
"Progeny" means a race restricted to the offspring of a specific stallion or stallions.
52.
"Purse Race (Overnight)" means any race in which entries close less than 72 hours prior to its running.
53.
"Schooling Race" means a preparatory race for entry qualification in official races which conform to requirements adopted by the Commission.
54.
"Stakes" means a race which is eligible for stakes or "black-type" recognition by the particular breed registry.
55.
"Trials" means a set of races in which eligible horses compete to determine the finalists for a purse in a nominated race.
56.
"Restricted Area" means any area within the enclosure where access is limited to licensees whose occupation requires access.
Those areas which are restricted shall include but not be limited to, the barn area, paddock, test barn, Stewards Tower, race course, or any other area designated restricted by the organization licensee and/or the Commission.
Signs giving notice of restricted access shall be prominently displayed at all entry points.
57.
"Rules" means the rules herein prescribed and any amendments or additions.
58.
"Scratch" means the act of withdrawing an entered horse from a race after the closing of overnight entries.
59.
"Scratch Time" means the deadline set by the organization licensee for the withdrawing of entered horses.
60.
"Starter" means the horse whose stall door of the starting gate opens in front of such horse at the time the starter (the Official) dispatches the horses.
61.
"Subscription" means the act of nominating a horse to a nomination race.
62.
"Week" means a period of seven days beginning at 12:01 a.m., Monday during which races are conducted.
R65-7-3.
Commission Powers and Jurisdiction.
1.
Description and Powers.
The Utah Horse Racing Commission is an administrative body created by Section 4-383.
The Commission consists of five members which are appointed by the governor, confirmed by the senate, and whose powers and duties are prescribed by the legislature.
The Commission appoints an executive director who is the administrative head of the agency, and the Commission determines the duties of the executive director.
The Commission shall have supervision of all race meetings held in the State of Utah, and all occupation and organization licensees in the State and all persons on the property of an organization licensee.
2.
Jurisdiction.
Without limitations by specific mention hereof, the stated purposes of the Rules and Regulations hereby promulgated are as follows: A.
To encourage agriculture and breeding of horses in this State; and B.
To maintain race meetings held in the State of the highest quality and free of any horse racing practices which are corrupt, incompetent, dishonest or unprincipled; and C.
To maintain the appearance as well as the fact of
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 11
complete honesty and integrity of horse racing in this State; and D.
To generate public revenues.
E. Commission jurisdiction of a race meet commences one hour prior to post time and ends one hour following the last posted race.
3.
Controlling Authority.
The law, the rules, and the orders of the Commission supersede the conditions of a race meeting and govern Thoroughbred, Quarter Horse, Appaloosa, Arabian, Paint and Pinto racing, except in the event it can have no application to a specific type of racing.
In the latter case, the Stewards may enforce rules or conditions of The Jockey Club for Thoroughbred racing, the American Quarter Horse Association for Quarter Horse racing; the Appaloosa Horse Club for Appaloosa racing; the Arabian Horse Racing Association of America for Arabian racing; the American Paint Horse Association for Paint racing; and the Pinto Horse Association of America, Inc., for Pinto racing; if such rules or conditions are not inconsistent with the Laws of the State of Utah and the Rules of the Commission.
4.
Punishment By The Commission.
Violation of the Act and rules promulgated by the Commission, whether or not a penalty is fixed therein, is punishable in the discretion of the Commission by denial, revocation or suspension of any license; by fine; by exclusion from all racing enclosures under the jurisdiction of the Commission; or by any combination of these penalties.
Fines imposed by the Commission shall not exceed $10,000 against individuals for each violation, any Rules or regulations promulgated by the Commission, or any Order of the Commission; or for any other action which, in the discretion of the Commission, is a detriment or impediment to horse racing, according to Subsection 4-38-9(2).
5.
Extension For Compliance.
If a licensee fails to perform an act or obtain required action from the Commission within the time prescribed therefore by these Rules, the Commission, at some subsequent time, may allow the performance of such act or may take the necessary action with the same effect as if the same were performed within the prescribed time.
6.
Notice To Licensee.
Whenever notice is required to be given by the Commission or the Stewards, such notice shall be given in writing by personal delivery to the person to be notified or by mailing, Certified Mail, Return Receipt Requested, such notice to the last known address furnished to the Commission; or may be given as is provided for service of process in a civil proceeding in the State of Utah and pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act.
7.
Location For Information Or Filing With Commission.
When information is requested or a notice in any matter is required to be filed with the Commission, such notice shall be delivered to an authorized representative of the Commission at an office of the Commission on or before the filing deadline.
Offices of the Commission are currently located at: State of Utah, Department of Agriculture and Food, 350 North Redwood Road, Salt Lake City, UT 84116.
8.
Public Inspection Of Documents.
All forms adopted by the Commission together with all Rules and other written statements of policy or interpretation; and all final orders, decisions, and opinions, formulated, adopted or used by the Commission in the discharge of its functions are available for
public inspection at the above office.
9.
Forms And Instruction.
The following forms and instructions for their use have been adopted by the Commission: Apprentice Jockey Certificate Authorized Agent Agreement Fingerprint Card Identifier's Daily Report Lease Agreement Occupation Licensee Application(s) Occupation License Renewal Application(s) Open Claim Certificate Organization's Daily Report Organization Licensee Application Petition for Declaratory Ruling Petition for Promulgation, Amendment or Repeal of Rule Petition in and before the Utah Horse Commission Postmortem Examination Report Stable Name, Corporation, Partnership or Syndicate Registration Form Stewards' Daily Report Stewards' Hearing Notice Stewards' Hearing Reports Subpoena (Steward and Commission) Test Barn Diuretic Approval Form 10.
Forms for substituting petitions for promulgating or repealing of rules, and for requests for declaratory ruling are available at the Utah State Department of Agriculture and Food.
R65-7-4.
Racing Organization.
1.
Allocation Of Racing Dates.
The Commission shall allocate racing dates for the conduct of horse race meetings within this State for such time periods and at such racing locations as the Commission determines will best serve the interests of the people of the State of Utah in accordance with the Utah Horse Act.
Upon a finding by the Commission that the allocation of racing dates for any year is completed, the racing dates so allocated shall be subject to reconsideration or amendment only for conditions unforeseen at the time of allocation.
2.
Application For License And Days To Conduct A Horse Race Meeting.
Every person who intends to conduct a horse race meeting shall file such application with the Commission no later than August 1 of the preceding calendar year.
Any prospective applicant for license and days to conduct a horse race meeting failing to timely file the application for license may be disqualified and its application for license refused summarily by the Commission.
3.
Commission May Demand Information.
The Commission may require any racing organization or prospective racing organization to furnish the Commission with a detailed proposal and disclosures as to its proposed racing program, purse, program, financial projections, racing officials, principals or shareholders, plants, premises, facility, finances, lease arrangements, agreements, contracts, and such other information as the Commission may require to determine the eligibility and qualification of the organization to conduct a race meeting; all in addition to that required in the application form set forth in Subsection R65-7-4(4) and as required by Section 4-38-4.
4.
Application For Organization License.
Any person
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 12
desiring to conduct a horse race meeting where the public is charged an admission fee shall apply to the Commission for an organization license.
The application shall be made on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission.
The application shall contain the following information: A.
The dates on which and location where the applicant intends to conduct the race meeting.
B.
The name and mailing address of the person making the application.
1.
If the applicant is a corporation, a certified copy of the Articles of Incorporation and Bylaws; the names and mailing addresses of all stockholders who own at least 3% of the total stock issued by the corporation, officers, and directors; and the number of shares of stock owned by each.
2.
If the applicant is a partnership, a copy of the partnership agreement, and the names and mailing addresses of all general and limited partners with a statement of their respective interest in the partnership.
C. Description of photographic equipment, video equipment, and copies of any proposed lease or purchase contract or service agreement in connection therewith.
D. Copies of any agreements with concessionaires or lessees, together with schedules of rates charged for performance of any service or for sale of any article within the enclosure, whether directly or through the concessionaire.
E. Schedule of admission price(s) to be charged.
F. Applicants must submit balance sheets and profit and loss statements for each of the three fiscal years immediately preceding the application, or for the period of organization if less than three years.
If the applicant has not completed a full fiscal year since its organization, or if it acquires or is to acquire the majority of its assets from a predecessor within the current fiscal year, the financial information shall be given for the current fiscal year.
All financial information shall be accompanied by an unqualified opinion of a Certified Public Accountant; or if the opinion is given with qualifications, the reasons for the qualifications must be stated.
G.
A schedule of stall rent, entry fees, or any other charges to be made to the horsemen or public not mentioned above.
H.
Any other information the Commission may require.
For applicants requesting to conduct non pari-mutuel racing, the licensee fee shall not be less than $25.00.
A separate application upon a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission shall be filed for each race meeting which such person proposes to conduct.
The application, if made by a person, shall be signed and verified under oath by the person; and if made by more than one person or by a partnership, shall be signed and verified under oath by at least two of the persons or members of the partnership; and if made by an association, a corporation, or any other entity, shall be signed by the President, attested to by the Secretary under the seal of such association or corporation, if it has a seal, and verified under oath by one of the signing officers.
No person shall own any silent or undisclosed interest in any entity requesting an organization license.
No organization license shall be issued to any applicant that fails to comply with provisions of this Rule.
No incomplete license application shall be considered by the Commission.
I.
In considering the granting or denying of all
organization's application for a license to conduct horse racing with the non pari-mutuel system of wagering, the following criteria, standards, and guides should be considered by the Commission: 1.
Public Interest a.
Safety b. Morals c. Security d. Municipal Comments e. Revenues: State and Local 2.
Track Location a.
Traffic Flow b. Support Services (i.e., hotels, restaurants, etc.) c. Labor Supply d.
Public Services (i.e., police, fire, etc.) e. Proximity to Competition 3.
Number of Tracks Running or Making Application a.
Size b. Type of Racing c. Days 4.
Adequacy of Track Facilities 5.
Experience in Racing of Applicant and Management a.
Length b. Type c. Success/Failure 6.
Financial Qualifications of Applicant, Applicant's Partners, Officers, Associates, and Shareholders ( To Include Contract Services) a.
Financial History (1) Records (2) Net Worth 7.
Qualifications of Applicant, Applicant's Partners, Officers, Associates, and Shareholders (To Include Contract Services) (1) Arrest Record (2) Conviction Record (3) Litigation Record (Civil/Criminal) (4) Law Enforcement Intelligence 8.
Official Attitude of Local Government Involved 9.
Anticipated Effect Upon Breeding and Horse Industry in Utah 10.
Effect on Saturation of Non pari-Mutuel Market 11.
Anticipated Effect upon State's Economy a.
General Economy (1) Tourism (2) Employment (3) Support Industries b. Government Revenue (1) Tax (Direct/Indirect) (2) Income (Direct/Indirect) 12.
Attitude of Local Community Involved 13.
The Written Attitude of Horse Industry Associations 14.
Experience and Credibility of Consultants, Advisors, and Professionals a.
Feasibility b. Credibility and Integrity of Feasibility Study 15.
Financial and Economic Integrity of Financial Plan (1) Equity a.
Source
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 13
b. Amount c. Position d. Type (2) Debt a.
Source b. Amount c.
Terms d. Repayment (3) Equity to Debt Ratio a.
Integrity of Financing Plan (1) Identity of Participants (2) Role of Participants (3) History of Participants (4) Law Enforcement Intelligence 16.
Apparent or Non-Apparent Hope of Financial Success 5.
List Of Shareholders.
Each organization shall, if a corporation or partnership, maintain a current list of shareholders and the number of shares held by each; and such list shall be available for inspection upon demand by the Commission or its representatives.
The organization shall immediately inform the Commission of any change of corporate officers or directors, general or managing partners, or of any change in shareholders; provided, however, that if the organization is a publicly-held entity, it shall disclose the names and addresses of shareholders who own 3% of the outstanding shares of the organization.
The organization shall immediately notify the Commission of all stock options, tender offers, and any anticipated stock offerings.
The Commission may refuse to issue a license to, or suspend the license of, any organization which fails to disclose the real name of any shareholders.
6.
Denial Of License.
The Commission may deny a license to conduct a horse racing meeting when in its judgment it determines the proposed meeting is not in the public interest, or fails to serve the purposes of the Utah Horse Act, or fails to meet any requirements of Utah State law or the Commission's rules.
The Commission shall refuse to issue a license to any applicant who fails to provide the Commission with evidence of its ability to meet its estimated financial obligations for the conduct of the meeting.
7.
Duty Of Licensed Organization.
Each organization shall observe and enforce the rules of the Commission.
The license is granted on the condition that the organization, its officials, its employees and its concessionaires shall obey all decisions and orders of the Commission.
The organization shall not allow any wagering within the enclosure of the racing facility which might be construed as being in violation of the Laws of the State of Utah.
8.
Conditions Of A Race Meeting.
The organization may impose conditions for its race meeting as it may deem necessary; provided, however, that such conditions may not conflict with any requirements of Utah State Law or the Rules, Regulations and Orders of the Commission.
Such conditions shall be published in the Condition Book or otherwise made available to all licensees participating in its race meeting.
A copy of the conditions and nomination race book shall be published no later than 45 days prior to the commencement of the race meeting.
A proof of such conditions and nomination race book shall be filed with the Commission no later than 45 days prior to printing.
The conditions and nomination race book is subject to the
approval of the Commission.
The organization may impose requirements, qualifications, requisites, and track rules for its race meeting as it may deem necessary; provided such requirements, qualifications, and track rules do not conflict with Utah State Law or the Rules, Regulations, and Orders of the Commission.
Such information shall be published in the Condition Book, posted on the organization's bulletin boards, or otherwise made available to all licensees participating at its race meeting.
All requirements, qualifications, requisites or track rules imposed by the organization require prior review and approval by the Commission, which reserves the right of final decision in all matters pertaining to the conditions of a race meeting.
9.
Right Of Commission To Information.
The organization may be asked to furnish the Commission, on forms approved by the Commission, a daily itemized report of the receipts of attendance, parking, concessions, commissions, and any other requested information.
The organization shall also provide a corrected official program, completed race results charts approved by the Commission, and any other information the Commission may require.
Such daily reports shall be filed with the Commission within 72 hours of the race day.
10.
Duty To Compile Official Program.
The organization shall compile an official program for each racing day which shall contain the names of the horses which are to run in each race together with their respective post positions, post time for first race, age, color, sex, breeding, jockey, trainer, owners or stable name, racing colors, weight carried, conditions of the race, the order in which each race shall be run, the distance to be run, the value of each race, a list of Racing Officials and track management personnel, and any other information the Commission may require.
The Commission may direct the organization to publish in the program any other information and notices to the public as it deems necessary.
11.
Duty To Maintain Racing Records.
The organization shall maintain a complete record of all races of all authorized race meetings of the same type of racing being conducted by the organization, and such records shall be maintained and retained for a period of five years.
This requirement may be met by race records of Triangle Publications, the American Quarter Horse Association, the Appaloosa Horse Club, the American Paint Horse Association, other breed registry associations' racing records department, or other racing publications approved by the Commission.
12.
Horsemen's Bookkeeper.
The organization shall employ a Horsemen's Bookkeeper who shall maintain records as the organization and Commission shall direct.
The records shall include the name, address, social security or federal identification number, and the state or country of residence of each horse owner, trainer, or jockey participating at the race meeting who has funds due or on deposit in the horseman's account.
The Horsemen's Bookkeeper shall keep the riding accounts of the jockeys and shall disburse the received fees to the proper claimants.
It shall be the duty of the Horsemen's Bookkeeper to receive and disburse the purses of each race and all stakes, entrance money, jockey fees, and other monies that properly come into his possession, and make disbursements within 48 hours of receipt of notification from the testing laboratory that drug tests have cleared unless an appeal or
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 14
protest has been filed with the Stewards or the Commission.
The Horsemen's Bookkeeper may accept monies due belonging to other organizations or recognized meetings, provided prompt return is made to the organization to which the money is due; except upon written request, the Horsemen's Bookkeeper shall, within 30 days after the meeting, disburse all monies to the persons entitled to receive the same.
The Horsemen's Bookkeeper shall maintain a file of all required statements of partnerships, syndicates, corporations; assignments of interest; lease agreements; and registrations of authorized agents.
All records and monies of the Horsemen's Bookkeeper shall be kept separate and apart from any other of the organization and are subject to inspection by the Commission at any time.
13.
Accounting Practices And Responsibility.
The organization and its managing officers shall ensure that all purse monies, disbursements, and appropriate nomination race monies are available to make timely distribution in accordance with the Act, the Rules and Regulations of the Commission, the organization rules, and race conditions.
Copies of all nomination payment race contracts, agreements, and conditions shall be submitted to the Commission and related reporting requirements fulfilled as specified by the Commission.
Subject to approval of the Commission, the organization shall maintain on a current basis a bookkeeping and accounting program under the guidance of a Certified Public Accountant.
The Commission may require periodic audits to determine that the organization has funds available to meet those distributions for the purposes required by the Act, the Rules and Regulations of the Commission, the conditions and nomination race program of the race meeting, and the obligations incurred in the daily operation of the race meeting.
Annually, the organization shall file a copy of all tax returns, a balance sheet, and a profit and loss statement.
14.
Electronic Photo Finish Device.
All organizations shall install and maintain in good service an electronic photo finish device for photographing the finishes of all races and recording the time of each horse in hundredths of a second, when applicable, to assist the placing judges and the Stewards in determining the finishing positions and time of the horses.
P rior to first use, the electronic photo finish device must be approved by the Commission; and a calibration report must be filed with the Commission by January 1 of each year.
A photograph of each finish shall be promptly posted for public view in at least one conspicuous place in the public enclosure.
15.
Videotape Recording Of Races.
All organizations shall install and operate a system to provide a videotape recording of each race so that such recording clearly shows the position and action of the horses and jockeys at close enough range to be easily discernible.
A video monitor shall be located in the Stewards' Tower to assist in reviewing the running of the races.
Prior to first use, the videotape recording system and location and placement of its equipment must be approved by the Commission.
Every race other than a race run solely on a straight course may be recorded by use of at least two cameras to provide panoramic and head-on views of the race.
Races run solely on the straight course shall be recorded by the use of at least one camera to provide a head-on view.
Except with prior approval of the Commission, all organizations shall maintain an auxiliary videotape recording camera and player in case of
breakdown and/or malfunction of a primary videotape recording camera or player.
16.
Identification Of Photo Finish Photographs And Videotape Recordings.
All photo finish photographs and videotape recordings required by these Rules shall be identified by indicating thereon, the date, number of the race, and the name of the racetrack at which the race is held.
17.
Altering Official Photographs Or Recordings.
No person shall cut, mutilate, alter or change any photo finish photograph or videotape recording for the purpose of deceit or fraud of any type.
18.
Preservation Of Official Photographs And Recordings.
All organizations shall preserve all photographic negatives and videotape recordings of all races for at least 180 days after the close of their meeting.
Upon request of the Commission, the organization shall furnish the Commission with a clear, positive print of any photograph of any race, or a kinescope print or copy of the videotape recording of any race.
19.
Viewing Room Required.
The organization shall maintain a viewing room for the purpose of screening the videotape recording of the races for viewing by Racing Officials, jockeys, trainers, owners, and other interested persons authorized by the Stewards.
20.
Office Space For The Commission.
The organization shall provide within the enclosure adequate office space for use by the Commission and its authorized representatives, and shall provide such necessary office furniture and utilities as may be required for the conduct of the Commission's business and the collection of the public revenues at such organization's meetings.
21.
Duty To Receive Complaints.
The organization shall maintain a place where written complaints or claims of violations (objections) of racetrack rules, regulations, and conditions; Commission Rules and Regulations; or Utah State Laws may be filed.
A copy of any written complaint or claim filed with the organization shall be filed by the organization with the Commission or Commission representatives within 24 hours of receipt of the complaint or claim.
22.
Bulletin Boards Required.
The organization shall erect and maintain a glass enclosed bulletin board close to the Racing Secretary's Office in a place where access is granted to all licensees, upon which all official notices of the Commission shall be posted.
The organization shall also erect and maintain a glass enclosed bulletin board in the grandstand area where access is granted to all race day patrons, upon which all official notices of the Commission shall be posted.
23.
Communication Systems Required.
The organization shall install and maintain in good service a telephonic communication system between the Stewards' stand, racing office, jockey room, paddock, testing barn, starting gate, video camera locations, and other designated places.
The organization shall also install and maintain in good service a public address communication system for the purpose of announcing the racing program, the running of the races, and any public service notices, as well as maintaining communications with the barn area for the purpose of paddock calls and the paging of horsemen.
24.
Ambulance Service.
Subject to the approval of the Commission, the organization shall provide the services of an
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 15
approved medical ambulance and its properly qualified attendants at all times during the running of the race program at its meeting and, except with prior permission of the Commission, during the hours the organization permits the use of its race course for training purposes.
The organization shall also provide the service of a horse ambulance during the same hours.
A means of communication shall be provided by the organization between a staffed observation point (Stewards' Tower and Clocker's Stand) for the race course and the place where the required ambulances and their attendants are posted for prompt response in the event of accident to any person or horse.
In the event an emergency necessitates the departure of a required ambulance, the race course shall be closed until an approved ambulance is again available within the enclosure.
25.
Safety Of Race Course And Premises.
The organization shall take cognizance of any complaint regarding the safety or uniformity of its race course or premises, and shall maintain in safe condition the race course and all rails and other equipment required for the conduct of its races.
26.
Starting Point Markers And Distance Poles.
Permanent markers must be located at each starting point to be utilized in the organization's racing program.
The starting point markers and distance poles must be of a size and in a position where they can be seen clearly from the stewards' stand.
The starting point markers and distance poles shall be marked with the appropriate distance and be the following colors: ELBAT
27.
Grade And Distance Survey.
A survey by a licensed surveyor of the race course, including all starting chutes, indicating the grade and measurement of distances to be run must be filed with the Commission prior to the first race meeting.
28.
Physical Requirements For Non pari-Mutuel Racing Facility.
In order for an organization to be granted a license to conduct non pari-mutuel racing, the facility shall meet the following physical requirements: A.
A regulation track shall be a straightaway course of 440 yards in length.
The straightaway shall connect with an oval not less than one-half mile in circumference; except that the width may vary according to the number of horses started in a field, but a minimum of twenty feet shall be allowed for the first two horses with an additional five feet for each added starter.
B.
The inner and outer rails shall extend the entire length of the straightaway and around the connecting oval; it shall be at least thirty inches and not more than forty-two inches in
height.
A racetrack not approved by the Commission prior to January 1, 1993, shall otherwise have inner and outer rails of at least thirty-eight inches (38") and not more than forty-two inches in height.
It shall be constructed of metal not less than two inches in diameter, wood not less than two inches in thickness and six inches in width, or other construction material approved by the Commission.
Whatever construction material is used must provide for the safety of both horse and rider.
It must be painted white and maintained at all times.
C. Stabling facilities should be adequate for the number of horses to be on hand for the meet.
In no case will a track with less than 200 stalls be acceptable, without Utah Horse Commission approval.
D. Stands for Stewards and Timers shall be located exactly on the finish line and provide a commanding and uninterrupted view of the entire racing strip.
E.
The paddock shall be spacious enough to provide adequate safety.
The jockey's room shall be in or adjacent to the paddock enclosure and shall be equipped with separate but equal complete sanitation facilities including showers for both male and female riders.
This area must be fenced to keep out unauthorized persons and provide maximum security and safety.
The fence shall be at least four feet high of chain link, v-mesh or similar construction.
F.
A Test Barn with a minimum of two stalls shall be provided for purpose of collecting urine specimens.
The Test Barn and a walking ring large enough to accommodate several horses cooling out at the same time shall be completely enclosed by a fence at least eight feet high of chain link, v-mesh or similar construction.
There shall be only one entrance into the Test Barn enclosure which shall remain locked or guarded at all times.
Provisions shall be made in this area for an office to accommodate the needs of the Official Veterinarian and from which he can observe the stalls and the entrance into the Test Barn enclosure.
The organization shall provide facilities for the immediate cooling and freezing of all urine specimens, and shall make provisions for the specimens to be shipped to the laboratory packed in dry ice.
G.
A grandstand or bleachers shall be provided for the spectators and shall provide for the comfort and safety of the spectators.
Facilities must include rest rooms and a public water supply.
29.
Organization As The Insurer Of The Race Meeting.
Approval of a race meeting by the Commission does not establish said Commission as the insurer or guarantor of the safety or physical condition of the organization's facilities or purse of any race.
The organization does thereby agree to indemnify, save and hold harmless the Utah Horse Commission from any liability, if any, arising from unsafe conditions of track facilities or grandstand and default in payment of purses.
The organization shall provide the Commission with a certificate of adequate liability insurance.
R65-7-5.
Occupation Licensing and Registration.
1.
Occupation Licenses.
No person required to be licensed shall participate in a race meeting without their holding a valid license authorizing that participation.
Licenses shall be obtained prior to the time such persons engage in their vocations upon such racetrack grounds at any time during the calendar
sep s sep sep s se se se e p p p s
sepirts latnoziroh etihw dna k wo p i i i e i r r r p r t t t i t s s s r s l l l ts l a a a a t t t l t n n n a n o o o t o z z z n z i i i o i r r r z r o o o i o h h h r h e e e oh e t t t t i i i e i h h h t h w w w i w d d d hw d n n n n a a a d a k n k na k
i e i i
r p r r
t i t t
s r s s
l ts l l
atn la atn atn
o t o o
z n z z
i o i i
r z r r
o i o o
h r h h
e oh e e
tih et tih tih
w i w w
d hw d d
na n dna na n na k
eul cal eer cal de cal de cal lle eul eer de eer cal
b b g b r b r b y b g r g b
. . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . .
s s s s s s s s s s s s s s
d d d d d d d d d d d e e e
r r r r r r r r r r r l l l
a a a a a a a a a a a o o o
y 078 y 077 y 066 y 055 y 044 y 004 y 053 y 033 y 003 y 052 y 022 p 4/1 p 8/1 p 61/1
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 16
year for which the organization license has been issued.
A.
A person whose occupation requires acting in any capacity within any area of an enclosure shall pay the required fee and procure the appropriate license or licenses.
B.
A person acting in any of the following capacities shall pay the required fee and procure the appropriate license or licenses: (A list of all required fees shall be available at the Utah Department of Agriculture and Food.)
1.
Owner/Trainer Combination 2.
Owner 3.
Trainer 4.
Assistant Trainer 5.
Jockey 6.
Veterinarian 7.
Jockey Room Attendant 8.
Paddock Attendant 9.
Pony Rider 10.
Concessionaire 11.
Valet 12.
Groom C.
A person whose license-identification badge is lost or destroyed shall procure a replacement license-identification badge and shall pay the required fee.
D.
The date of payment of all required fees as recorded by the Commission shall be the effective date of issuance of a continuous occupation license or registration shall expire on December 31 of the year in which it is issued.
A license renewal shall be on an annual basis beginning January 1.
E.
All license applicants may be required to provide two complete sets of fingerprints on forms provided by or acceptable to the Commission and pay the required fee for processing the fingerprint cards through State and Federal Law Enforcement Agencies.
If the fingerprints are of a quality not acceptable for processing, the licensee may be required to be refingerprinted.
F.
All applicants for occupation licenses must be a minimum of 16 years of age.
However, this shall not preclude dependent children under the age of 16 from working for their parents or guardian if said parents or guardian are licensed as a trainer or assistant trainer and permission has been obtained from the organization licensee.
A trainer or his authorized representative signing a Test Barn Sample Tag must be licensed and a minimum of 18 years of age.
2.
Employment Of Unlicensed Person.
No organization, owner, trainer or other licensee acting as an employer within the enclosure at an authorized race meeting shall employ or harbor within the enclosure any person required to be licensed by the Commission until such organization, owner, trainer, or other employer determines that such person required to be licensed has been issued a valid license by the Commission.
No organization shall permit any owner, trainer, or jockey to own, train, or ride on its premises during a recognized race meeting unless such owner, trainer, or jockey has received a license to do so from the Commission.
The organization or prospective employer may demand for inspection the license of any person participating or attempting to participate at its meeting, and the organization may demand for inspection the documents relating to any horse on its grounds.
3.
Notice Of Termination.
Any organization, owner, trainer, or other licensee acting as an employer within the
enclosure at an authorized race meeting shall be responsible for the immediate notification to the Commission and the organization conducting the race meeting of a termination of employment of a licensee.
The employer shall make every effort to obtain the license badge from the employee and deliver the license badge to the Commission.
4.
Application For License.
An applicant for license shall apply in writing on the application forms furnished by the Commission.
5.
License Identification Badge Requirements.
The license identification badge may consist of the following information concerning the licensee: A. Full Name B. Permanent Address C. License Capacity D. Date of Issue E. Passport-Type Color Photograph F. Social Security Number G. Date of Birth All license identification badges may be color coded as to capacity of occupation and eligibility for access to restricted areas.
All license holders, except jockeys riding in a race, must wear a current identification badge while present in restricted areas of the enclosure or as otherwise specified in Subsection R65-7-5(1).
6.
Honoring Official Credentials.
Credentials issued by the Commission may be honored for admission at all gates and entrances and to all places within the enclosure.
Automobiles with vehicle decals issued by the Commission to its members and employees shall be permitted ingress and egress at any point.
Credentials issued by the National Association of State Racing Commissioners to its members, past members, and staff shall be honored by the organization for admission into the public enclosure when presented therefore by such persons.
7.
License Subject To Conditions And Agreements.
A. Every license is subject to the conditions and agreements contained in the application therefore and to the Statutes and Rules.
B. Every license issued to a licensee by the Commission remains the property of the Commission.
C. Possession of a license does not, as such, confer any right upon the holder thereof to employment at or participation in a race.
D.
The Commission may restrict, limit, place conditions on, or endorse for additional occupational classes, any license, R65-7-5(9).
8.
Changes In Application Information.
Each licensee or applicant for license shall file with the Commission his permanent and his current mailing address and shall report in writing to the Commission any and all changes in application information.
9.
Grounds For Denial, Refusal, Suspension Or Revocation Of License.
The Commission, in addition to any other valid ground or reason, may deny, refuse to issue, suspend or revoke an occupation license for any person: A. Who has been convicted of a felony of this State, any other state, or the United States of America; or B. Who has been convicted of violating any law regarding gambling or controlled dangerous substance of this State, any
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 17
other state, or of the United States of America; or C. Who is unqualified to perform the duties required of the applicant; or D. Who fails to disclose or states falsely any information required in the application; or E. Who has been found guilty of a violation of any provision of the Utah Horse Act or of the Rules and Regulations of the Commission; or F. Whose license for any racing occupation or activity requiring a license has been or is currently suspended, revoked, refused or denied for just cause in any other competent racing jurisdiction; or G. Who has been or is currently excluded from any racing enclosure by a competent racing jurisdiction.
10.
Examinations.
The Commission may require the applicant for any license to demonstrate his knowledge, qualifications, and proficiency for the license applied for by such examination as the Commission may direct.
11.
Refusal Without Prejudice.
A refusal to issue a license (as distinguished from a denial of a license) to an applicant by the Commission at any race meeting is without prejudice; and the applicant so refused may reapply for a license at any subsequent or other race meeting, or he may appeal such refusal to the Commission for hearing upon his qualifications and fitness for the license.
12.
Hearing After Denial Of License.
Any person who has had his license denied may petition the Commission to reopen the case and reconsider its decision upon a sufficient showing that there is now available evidence which could not, with the exercise of reasonable diligence, have been previously presented to the Commission.
Any such petition must be filed with the Commission no later than 30 days after the effective date of the Commission's decision in the matter.
Any person who has been denied a license by the Commission may not refile a similar application for license until one year from the effective date of the decision to deny the license.
13.
Financial Responsibility Of Applicants.
Applicants for license as horse owner or trainer must submit satisfactory evidence of their financial ability to care for and maintain the horses owned and/or trained by them when such evidence is requested by the Commission.
14.
Physical Examination.
The Commission or the Stewards may require that any jockey be examined at any time, and the Commission or the Stewards may refuse to allow any jockey to ride until he has successfully passed such examination.
15.
Qualifications For Jockey.
No person under 16 years of age shall be granted a jockey's license.
A person who has never ridden in a race at a recognized meeting shall not be granted a license as jockey unless he has satisfactorily worked a horse from the starting gate in company, before the Stewards or their representatives.
Upon the recommendation of the Stewards, the Commission may issue a jockey's license granting permission to such person for the purpose of riding in not more than four races to establish the qualifications and ability of such person for the license.
Subsequently, the Stewards may recommend the granting of a jockey's license.
16.
Jockey Agent.
A jockey agent is the authorized representative of a jockey if he is registered with the Stewards and licensed by the Commission as the Jockey's representative.
No jockey agent shall represent more than two jockeys at the same time.
17.
Workers' Compensation Act Compliance.
No person may be licensed as a trainer, owner, or in any other capacity in which such person acts as the employer of any other licensee at any authorized race meeting, unless his liability for Workers' Compensation has been secured in accordance with the Workers' Compensation Act of the State of Utah and until evidence of such security for liability is provided the Commission.
Should any such required security for liability for Workers' Compensation be canceled or terminated, any license held by such person shall be automatically suspended and shall be grounds for revocation of the license.
If a license applicant certifies that he has no employees that would subject him to liability for Workers' Compensation, he may be licensed, but only for the period he has no employees.
18.
Program Trainer Prohibited.
No licensed trainer, for the purpose of avoiding his responsibilities or insurance requirements as set forth in these Rules, shall place any horse in the care or attendance of any other trainer.
19.
Qualifications For License As Horse Owner.
No person may be licensed as a horse owner who is not the owner of record of a properly registered race horse which he intends to race in Utah and which is in the care of a licensed trainer, or who does not have an interest in such race horse as a part owner or lessee, or who is not the responsible managing owner of a corporation, syndicate or partnership which is the legal owner of such horse.
20.
Horse Ownership By Lease.
Horses may be raced under lease provided a completed Utah Horse Commission, breed registry, approved pari-mutuel or other lease form acceptable to the Commission, is attached to the Registration Certificate and on file with the Commission.
The lessor(s) and lessee must be licensed as horse owners.
No lessor shall execute a lease for the purpose of avoiding insurance requirements.
21.
Statements Of Corporation, Partnership, Syndicate Or Other Association Or Entity.
All organizational documents of a corporation, partnership, syndicate or other association or entity, and the relative proportion of ownership interest, the terms of sales with contingencies, arrangements, or leases, shall be filed with the Horsemen's Bookkeeper of the organization and with the Commission.
The above-said documents shall declare to whom winnings are payable, in whose names the horses shall be run, and the name of the licensed person who assumes all responsibilities as the owner.
The part owner of any horse shall not assign his share or any part of it without the written consent of the other partners, and such consent shall be filed with the Horsemen's Bookkeeper and the Commission.
A person or persons conducting racing operations as a corporation, partnership, syndicate or other association or entity shall register the information required by Rules in this Article and pay the required fee(s) for the appropriate entity.
22.
Stable Name Registration.
A person or persons electing to conduct racing operations by use of a stable name shall register the stable name and shall pay the required fee.
A.
The applicant must disclose the identity or identities of all persons comprising the stable name.
B. Changes in identities must be reported immediately to
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 18
and approval obtained from the Commission.
C.
No person shall register more than one stable name at the same time nor use his real name for racing purposes so long as he has a registered stable name.
D.
Any person who has registered under a stable name may cancel the stable name after he has given written notice to the Commission.
E.
A stable name may be changed by registering a new stable name and by paying the required Fee. F.
No person shall register a stable name which has been registered by any other person with any organization conducting a recognized race meeting.
G.
A stable name shall be clearly distinguishable from that of another registered stable name.
H.
The stable name, and the name of the owner or managing owner, shall be published in the official program.
If the stable name consists of more than one person, the official program will list the name of the managing owner along with the phrase "et al."
I.
If a partnership, corporation, syndicate, or other association or entity is involved in the identity comprising a stable name, the rules covering a partnership, corporation, syndicate or other association or entity must be complied with and the usual fees paid therefore in addition to the fees for the registration of a stable name.
23.
Ownership Licensing Required.
The ownership licensing procedures required by the Commission must be completed prior to the horse starting in a race and shall include all registrations, statements and payment of fees.
24.
Knowledge Of Rules.
Every licensee, in order to maintain their qualifications for any license held by them, shall be familiar with and knowledgeable of the rules, including all amendments.
Every licensee is presumed to know the rules.
25.
Certain Prohibited Licenses.
Commission-licensed jockeys, veterinarians, organizations' security personnel, vendors, and such other licensees designated by the stewards with approval of the Commission, shall not hold any other license.
The Commission may refuse to issue a license to a person whose spouse holds a license and which, in the opinion of the Commission, would create a conflict of interest.
R65-7-6.
Racing Officials and Commission Racing Personnel.
1.
Racing Officials.
The racing officials of a race meeting, unless otherwise ordered by the Commission, are as follows: the stewards, the associate judges, the placing judges, the paddock judge, the patrol judges, the starter, the identifier/tattooer, and the racing secretary.
No racing official may serve in that capacity during any race meeting at which is entered a horse owned by them or by a member of their family or in which they have any financial interest.
Being the lessee or lessor of a horse shall be construed as having a financial interest.
2.
Responsibility To The Commission.
The racing officials shall be strictly responsible to the Commission for the performance of their respective duties, and they shall promptly report to the Commission or its stewards any violation of the rules of the Commission coming to their attention or of which they have knowledge.
Any racing official who fails to exercise due diligence in the performance of his duties shall be relieved
of his duties by the stewards and the matter referred to the Commission.
3.
Racing Officials Subject To Approval.
Every racing official is subject to prior approval by the Commission before being eligible to act as a racing official at the meeting.
At the time of making application for an organization license, the organization shall nominate the racing officials other than the racing officials appointed by the Commission; and after issuance of license to the organization, there shall be no substitution of any racing official except with approval of the stewards or the Commission.
4.
Racing Officials Appointed By The Commission.
The Commission shall appoint the following racing officials for a race meeting: The board of three stewards and the identifier/tattooer.
The Commission may appoint from the approved stewards list one steward to serve as state steward.
5.
Racing Personnel Employed By The Commission.
The Commission shall employ the services of the licensing person for a race meeting.
6.
General Authority Of Stewards.
The stewards have general authority and supervision over all licensees and other persons attendant on horses, and also over the enclosures of any recognized meeting.
Stewards have the power to interpret the Rules and to decide all questions not specifically covered by them.
The stewards shall have the power to determine all questions arising with reference to entries, eligibility and racing; and all entries, declarations and scratches shall be under the supervision of the stewards.
The stewards shall be strictly responsible to the Commission for the conduct of the race meeting in every particular.
7.
Vacancy Among Racing Officials.
Where a vacancy occurs among the racing officials, the stewards shall fill the vacancy immediately.
Such appointment is effective until the vacancy is filled in accordance with the rules.
8.
Jurisdiction Of Stewards To Suspend Or Fine.
The stewards' jurisdiction in any matter commences 72 hours before entries are taken for the first day of racing at the meeting and extends until 30 days after the close of such meeting.
In the event a dispute or controversy arises during a race meeting which is not settled within the stewards' thirty-day jurisdiction, then the authority of the stewards may be extended by authority of the Commission for the period necessary to resolve the matter, or until the matter is referred or appealed to the Commission.
The stewards may suspend for not more than one year per violation the license of anyone whom they have the authority to supervise; or they may impose a fine not to exceed $2,500 per violation; or they may exclude from all enclosures in this state; or they may suspend and fine and/or exclude.
All such suspensions, fines, or exclusions shall be reported immediately to the Commission.
The Stewards may suspend a horse from participating in races if the horse has been involved in violation(s) of the rules promulgated by the Commission or the provisions of the Utah Horse Act under the following circumstances: A.
A horse is a confirmed bleeder as determined by the official veterinarian, and the official veterinarian recommends to the stewards that the horse be suspended from participation.
B.
A horse is involved with: i.
Any violation of medication laws and rules;
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 19
ii.
Any suspension or revocation of an occupation license by the stewards or the Commission or any racing jurisdiction recognized by the Commission; or iii.
Any violation of prohibited devices, laws, and rules.
9.
Referral To The Commission.
The stewards may refer with or without recommendation any matter within their jurisdiction to the Commission.
10.
Payment Of Fines.
All fines imposed by the stewards or Commission shall be due and payable to the Commission within 72 hours after imposition, except when the imposition of such fine is ordered stayed by the stewards, the Commission, or a court having jurisdiction.
However, when a fine and suspension is imposed by the stewards or Commission, the fine shall be due and payable at the time the suspension expires.
Nonpayment of the fine when due and payable may result in immediate suspension pending payment of the fine.
11.
Stewards' Reports And Records.
The stewards shall maintain a record which shall contain a detailed, written account of all questions, disputes, protests, complaints, and objections brought to the attention of the stewards.
The stewards shall prepare a daily report concerning their race day activities which shall include fouls and disqualifications, disciplinary hearings, fines and suspensions, conduct of races, interruptions and delays, and condition of racing facility.
The stewards shall submit the signed original of their report and record to the Executive Director of the Commission within 72 hours of the race day.
12.
Power To Order Examination Of Horse.
The stewards shall have the power to have tested, or cause to be examined by a qualified person, any horse entered in a race, which has run in a race, or which is stabled within the enclosure; and may order the examination of any ownership papers, certificates, documents of eligibility, contracts or leases pertaining to any horse.
13.
Calling Off Race.
When, in the opinion of the stewards, a race(s) cannot be conducted in accordance with the rules of the Commission, they shall cancel and call off such race(s).
In the event of mechanical failure or interference during the running of a race which affects the horses in such race, the Stewards may declare the race a "no contest."
A race shall be declared "no contest" if no horse covers the course.
14.
Substitution Of Jockey Or Trainer.
A.
In the event a jockey who is named to ride a mount in a race is unable to fulfill his engagement and is excused by the stewards, the trainer of the horse may select a substitute jockey; or, if no substitute jockey is available, the stewards may scratch the horse from the race.
However, the responsibility to provide a jockey for an entered horse remains with the trainer; and the scratching of said horse by the stewards shall not be grounds for the refund of any nomination, sustaining, penalty payments, or entry fees.
B.
In the absence of the trainer of the horse, the stewards may place the horse in the temporary care of another trainer of their selection; however, such horse may not be entered or compete in a race without the approval of the owner and the substitute trainer.
The substitute trainer must sign the entry card.
15.
Stewards' List.
The stewards may maintain a stewards' list of those horses which, in their opinion, are ineligible to be
entered in any race because of poor or inconsistent performance due to the inability to maintain a straight course, or any other reason considered a hazard to the safety of the participants.
Such horse shall be refused entry until it has demonstrated to the stewards or their representatives that it can race safely and can be removed from the stewards' list.
16.
Duties Of The Starter.
The starter shall have complete jurisdiction over the starting gate, the starting of horses, and the authority to give orders not in conflict with the rules as may be required to ensure all participants an equal opportunity to a fair start.
The starter shall appoint his assistants; however, he shall not permit his assistants to handle or take charge of any horse in the starting gate without his expressed permission.
In the event that organization starter assistants are unavailable to head a horse, the responsibility to provide qualified individuals to head and/or tail a horse in the starting gate shall rest with the trainer.
The starter may establish qualification for and maintain a list of such qualified individuals approved by the stewards.
No assistant starter or any individual handling a horse at the starting gate shall in any way impede, whether intentionally or otherwise, the start of the race; nor may an assistant starter or other individual, except the jockey handling the horse at the starting gate, apply a whip or other device in an attempt to load any horse in the starting gate.
No one other than the jockey shall slap, boot, or otherwise attempt to dispatch a horse from the starting gate.
17.
Starter's List.
The starter may maintain a starter's list of all horses which, in his opinion, are ineligible to be entered in any race because of poor or inconsistent performance in the starting gate.
Such horse shall be refused entry until it has demonstrated to the starter or his representatives that it has been satisfactorily schooled in the gates and can be removed from the starter's list.
Such schooling shall be under the direct supervision of the starter or his representatives.
18.
Duties Of The Paddock Judge.
The paddock judge shall supervise the assembling of the horses scheduled to race, the saddling of horses in the paddock, the saddling equipment and changes thereof, the mounting of the jockeys, and their departure for the post.
The paddock judge shall provide a report on saddling equipment to the Stewards at their request.
19.
Duties Of Patrol Judges.
The patrol judges, when utilized, shall be subject to the orders of the stewards and shall report to the stewards all facts occurring under their observation during the running of a race.
20.
Duties Of Placing Judges And Timers.
The placing judges, timers, and/or stewards shall occupy the judges' stand at the time the horses pass the finish line; and their duties shall be to hand time, place the horses in the correct order of finish, and report the results.
In case of a dead heat or a disagreement as to the correct order of finish, the decision of the stewards shall be final.
In placing the horses at the finish, the position of the horses' noses only shall be considered the most forward point of progress.
21.
Duties Of The Clerk Of Scales.
The clerk of scales is responsible for the presence of all jockeys in the jockey's room at the appointed time and to verify that all jockeys have a current Utah jockey's license.
The clerk of scales shall verify the correct weight of each jockey at the time of weighing out and when weighing in, and shall report any discrepancies to the
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 20
stewards immediately.
In addition, he or she shall be responsible for the security of the jockey's room and the conduct of the jockeys and their attendants.
He or she shall promptly report to the stewards any infraction of the Rules with respect to weight, weighing, riding equipment, or conduct.
He or she shall be responsible for accounting of all data required on the scale sheet and submit that data to the horsemen's bookkeeper at the end of each race day.
22.
Duties Of The Racing Secretary.
The racing secretary shall write and publish conditions of all races and distribute them to horsemen as far in advance of the closing of entries as possible.
He or she shall be responsible for the safekeeping of registration certificates and the return of same to the trainers on request or at the conclusion of the race meeting.
He or she shall record winning races on the form supplied by the breed registry, which shall remain attached to or part of the registration certificate.
The racing secretary shall be responsible for the taking of entries, checking eligibility, closing of entries, selecting the races to be drawn, conducting the draw, posting the overnight sheet, compiling the official program, and discharging such other duties of their office as required by the rules or as directed by the Stewards.
23.
Duties Of Associate Judge.
An associate judge may perform any of the duties which are performed by any racing official at a meeting, provided such duties are assigned or delegated to them by the Commission or by the stewards presiding at that meeting.
24.
Duties Of The Official Veterinarian.
The official veterinarian must be a graduate veterinarian and licensed to practice in the State of Utah.
He or she shall recommend to the stewards any horse that is deemed unsafe to be raced, or a horse that it would be inhumane to allow to race.
He or she shall supervise the taking of all specimens for testing according to procedures approved by the Commission.
He or she shall provide proper safeguards in the handling of all laboratory specimens to prevent tampering, confusion, or contamination.
All specimens collected shall be sent in locked and sealed cases to the laboratory.
He or she shall have the authority and jurisdiction to supervise the practicing licensed veterinarians within the enclosure.
The official veterinarian shall report to the Commission the names of all horses humanely destroyed or which otherwise expire at the meeting, and the reasons therefore.
The official veterinarian may place horses on a veterinarian's list, and may remove from the list those horses which, in their opinion, can satisfactorily compete in a race.
25.
Veterinarian's List.
The official veterinarian may maintain a list of all horses who, in their opinion, are incapable of safely performing in a race and are, therefore, ineligible to be entered or started in a race.
Such horse may be removed from the Veterinarian's List when, in the opinion of the official veterinarian, the horse has satisfactorily recovered the capability of performing in a race.
The reasons for placing a horse on the veterinarian's list shall include the shedding of blood from one or both nostrils following exercise or the performance in a race and the running of a temperature unnatural to the horse.
26.
Duties Of The Identifier.
The identifier shall identify all horses starting in a race.
The identifier shall inspect documents of ownership, eligibility, registration, or breeding as may be necessary to ensure proper identification of each horse
eligible to compete at a race meeting provide assistance to the stewards in that regard.
The identifier shall immediately report to the paddock judge and the stewards any horse which is not properly identified or any irregularities reflected in the official identification records.
The identifier shall report to the stewards and to the Commission on general racing practices observed, and perform such other duties as the Commission may require.
The identifier shall report to the racing secretary before the close of the race day business.
R65-7-7.
Entries and Declarations.
1.
Control Over Entries And Declarations.
All entries and declarations are under the supervision of the Stewards or their designee; and they, without notice, may refuse the entries any person or the transfer of entries.
2.
Racing Secretary To Establish Conditions.
The racing secretary may establish the conditions for any race, the allowances or handicaps to be established for specific races, the procedures for the acceptance of entries and declarations, and such other conditions as are necessary to provide and conduct the organization's race meeting.
The racing secretary is responsible for the receipt of entries and declarations for all races.
The racing secretary, employees of their department, or racing officials shall not disclose any pertinent information concerning entries which have been submitted until all entries are closed.
After an entry to a race for which conditions have been published has been accepted by the racing secretary or their delegate, no condition of such race shall be changed, amended or altered, nor shall any new condition for such race be imposed.
3.
Entries.
No horse shall be entered in more than one race on the same day.
No person shall enter or attempt to enter a horse for a race unless such entry is a bona fide entry made with the intention that such horse is to compete in the race for which entry is made except, if racing conditions permit, for entry back in finals or consolations involving physically disabled or dead qualifiers for purse payment purposes.
Entries shall be in writing on the entry card provided by the organization and must be signed by the trainer or assistant trainer of the horse.
Entries made by telephone are valid properly confirmed by the track when signing the entry card.
No horse shall be allowed to start unless the entry card has been signed by the trainer or his assistant trainer.
4.
Determining Eligibility.
Determination of a horse's eligibility, penalty or penalties and the right to allowance or allowances for all races shall be from the date of the horse's last race unless the conditions specify otherwise.
The trainer is responsible for the eligibility of his horse and to properly enter his horse in condition.
In the event the records of the Racing Secretary or the appropriate breed registry do not reflect the horse's most recent starts, the trainer or owner shall accurately provide such information.
If a horse is not eligible under the first condition of any race, he cannot be eligible under subsequent conditions.
If the conditions specify nonwinners of a certain amount, it means that the horse has not won a race in which the winner's share was the specified amount or more.
If the conditions specify nonearners of a stated amount, it means that the horse has not earned that stated amount in any total number of races regardless of the horse's placing.
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 21
5.
Entries Survive With Transfer.
All entries and rights of entry are valid and survive when a horse is sold with his engagements duly transferred.
If a partnership agreement is properly filed with the Horsemen's Bookkeeper, subscriptions, entries and rights of entry survive in the remaining partners.
Unless written notice to the contrary is filed with the stewards, the entries, rights of entry, and engagements remain with the horse and are transferred therewith to the new owner.
No entry or right of entry shall become void on the death of the nominator unless the conditions of the race state otherwise.
6.
Horses Ineligible To Start In A Race.
In addition to any other valid ground or reason, a horse is ineligible to start any race if: A.
Such horse is not registered by The Jockey Club if a Thoroughbred; the American Quarter Horse Association if a Quarter Horse; the Appaloosa Horse Club if an Appaloosa; the Arabian Horse Club Registry of America if an Arabian; the American Paint Horse Association if a Paint; the Pinto Horse Association of America, Inc., if a Pinto; or any successors to any of the foregoing or other registry recognized by the Commission.
B.
The Certificate of Foal Registration, eligibility papers, or other registration issued by the official registry for such horse is not on file with the racing secretary one hour prior to post time for the race in which the horse is scheduled to race.
C.
Such horse has been entered or raced at any recognized race meeting under any name or designation other than the name or designation duly assigned by and registered with the official registry.
D.
The Win Certificate, Certificate of Foal Registration, eligibility papers or other registration issued by the official registry has been materially altered, erased, removed, or forged.
E.
Such horse is ineligible to enter said race, is not duly entered for such race, or remains ineligible to time of starting.
F.
The trainer of such horse has not completed the prescribed licensing procedures required by the Commission before entry and the ownership of such horse has not completed the prescribed licensing procedures prior to the horse starting or the horse is in the care of an unlicensed trainer.
G.
Such horse is owned in whole or in part or trained by any person who is suspended or ineligible for a license or ineligible to participate under the rules of any Turf Governing Authority or Stud Book Registry.
H. Such horse is a suspended horse.
I.
Such horse is on the stewards' list, starter's list, or the veterinarian's list.
J. Except with permission of the stewards and identifier, the identification markings of the horse do not agree with identification as set forth on the registration certificate to the extent that a correction is required from the appropriate breed registry.
K. Except with the permission of the stewards, a horse has not been lip tattooed by a Commission approved tattooer.
L.
The entry of a horse is not in the name of his true owner.
M.
The horse has drawn into the field or has started in a race on the same day.
N. Its age as determined by an examination of its teeth by the official veterinarian does not correspond to the age shown
on its registration certificate, such determination by tooth examination to be made in accordance with the current "Official Guide for Determining the Age of the Horse" as adopted by the American Association of Equine Practitioners.
7.
Horses Ineligible To Enter Or Start.
Any horse ineligible to be entered for a race or ineligible to start in any race which is entered or competes in such race, may be scratched or disqualified; and the stewards may discipline any person responsible.
8.
Registration Certificate To Reflect Correct Ownership.
Every certificate of registration, eligibility certificate or lease agreement filed with the organization and its racing secretary to establish the eligibility of a horse to be entered for any race shall accurately reflect the correct and true ownership of such horse, and the name of the owner which is printed on the official program for such horse shall conform to the ownership as declared on the certificate of registration or eligibility certificate.
A stable name may be registered for such owner or ownership with the Commission.
In the event ownership is by syndicate, corporation, partnership or other association or entity, the name of the owner which is printed on the official program for such shall be the responsible managing owner, officer, or partner who assumes all responsibilities as the owner.
9.
Alteration Or Forgery Of Certificate Of Registration.
No person shall alter or forge any win sheet, certificate of registration, certificate of eligibility, or any other document of ownership or registration, no willfully forge or alter the signature of any person required on any such document or entry card.
10.
Declarations And Scratches.
Any trainer or assistant trainer of a horse which has been entered in a race who does not wish such horse to participate in the draw must declare his horse from the race prior to the close of entries.
Any trainer or assistant trainer of a horse which has been drawn into or is also eligible for a race who does not wish such horse to start in the race, must scratch his horse from the race prior to the designated scratch time.
The declaration or scratch of a horse from a race is irrevocable.
11.
Deadline For Arrival Of Entered Horses.
All horses scheduled to compete in a race must be present within the enclosure no later than 30 minutes prior to their scheduled race without stewards' approval.
Horses not within the enclosure by their deadline may be scratched and the trainer subject to fine and/or suspension.
12.
Refund Of Fees.
If a horse is declared or scratched from a race, the owner of such horse shall not be entitled to a refund of any nomination, sustaining and penalty payments, entry fees, or organization charges paid or remaining due at the time of the declaration or scratch.
In the event any race is not run, declared off, or canceled for any reason, the owners of such horses that remain eligible at the time the race is declared off or canceled shall be entitled to a complete refund of all the above payments and fees less monies specified in written race conditions for advertising and promotion.
13.
Release Of Certificates.
Any certificate of registration or document of ownership filed with the racing secretary to establish eligibility to enter a race shall be released only to the trainer of record of the horse.
However, the trainer may authorize in a form provided by the racing secretary the release
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 22
of the certificate to the owner named on the certificate or his authorized agent.
Any disputes concerning the rights to the registration certificates shall be decided by the stewards.
14.
Nomination Races.
Prior to the closing of nominations, the organization shall file with the Commission a copy of the nomination blank and all advertisements for races to be run during a race meeting.
For all races which nominations close no earlier than 72 hours before post time, the organization shall furnish the Commission and the owners of horses previously made eligible by compliance with the conditions of such race, with a list of all horses nominated and which remain eligible.
The list shall be distributed within 15 days after the due date of each payment and shall include the horse's name, the owner's name and the total amount of payments and gross purse to date, including any added monies, applicable interest, supplementary payments, and deduction for advertising and administrative expenses.
The organization shall deposit all monies for a nomination race in an escrow account according to procedures approved by the Commission.
15.
Limitations On Field And Number Of Races.
No race with less than five horses entered, or three horses ultimately participating, shall be run, with the exception of a trial or the finals for a nomination race.
No more than 20 races may be run on a race day, except with permission of the Commission.
A race day may be canceled if less than 75 horses have been entered on the day's program, with the exception of days on which trials or finals for a nomination race are scheduled.
16.
Agreement Upon Entry.
No entry shall be accepted in any race except upon the condition that all disputes, claims, and objections arising out of the racing or with respect to the interpretation of Commission and track rules or conditions of any race shall be decided by the Board of Stewards at the race meet; or, upon appeal, decided by the Commission.
17.
Selection Of Entered Horses.
The manner of selecting post positions of horses shall be determined by the stewards.
The selection shall be by lot and shall be made by one of the stewards or their designee and a horseman, in public, at the close of entries.
If the number of entries to any race is in excess of the number of horses which may, because of track limitations, be permitted to start in any one race, the race may be split; or four horses not drawing into the field may be placed on an also eligible list.
18.
Preferred List Of Horses.
The racing secretary may maintain a list of entered horses eliminated from starting by a surplus of entries, and these horses shall constitute a preferred list and have preference.
The manner in which the preferred list shall be maintained and all rules governing such list shall be the responsibility of the Racing Secretary.
Such rules must be submitted to the Commission 30 days prior to the commencement of the meet and are subject to approval by the Commission.
R65-7-8.
Veterinarian Practices, Medication and Testing Procedures.
1.
Veterinary Practices - Treatment Restricted.
Within the time period of 24 hours prior to the post time for the first race of the week until four hours after the last race of the week, no person other than Utah licensed veterinarians or animal technicians under direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian
who have obtained a license from the Commission shall administer to any horse within the enclosure any veterinary treatment or any medicine, medication, or other substance recognized as a medication, except for recognized feed supplements or oral tonics or substances approved by the Official Veterinarian.
2.
Veterinarians Under Supervision Of Official Veterinarian.
Veterinarians licensed by the Commission and practicing at an authorized meeting are under the supervision of the Official Veterinarian and the Stewards.
The Official Veterinarian shall recommend to the Stewards or the Commission the discipline to be imposed upon a veterinarian who violates the Rules, and he or she may sit with the Stewards in any hearing before the Stewards concerning such discipline or violation.
3.
Veterinarian Report.
Every veterinarian who treats any horse within the enclosure for any contagious or communicable disease shall immediately report to the official veterinarian in writing on a form approved by the Commission.
The form shall include the name and location of the horse treated, the name of the trainer, the time of treatment, the probable diagnosis, and the medication administered.
Each practicing veterinarian shall be responsible for maintaining treatment records on all horses to which they administer treatment during a given race meeting.
These records shall be available to the Commission upon subpoena when required.
Any such record and any report of treatment as described above is confidential; and its content shall not be disclosed except in a proceeding before the stewards or the Commission, or in the exercise of the Commission's jurisdiction.
4.
Drugs Or Medication.
Except as authorized by the provisions of this Article, no drug or medication shall be administered to any horse prior to or during any race.
Presence of any drug or its metabolites or analog, or any substance foreign to the natural horse found in the testing sample of a horse participating in a Commission-sanctioned race shall result in disqualification by the Stewards.
When a horse is disqualified because of an infraction of this Rule, the owner or owners of such horse shall not participate in any portion of the purse or stakes; and any trophy or other award shall be returned.
(See Drugs and Medications Exceptions, Section R67-7-13.)
5.
Racing Soundness Examination.
Each horse entered to race may be subject to a veterinary examination by the official veterinarian or his authorized representative for racing soundness and health on race day.
6.
Positive Lab Reports.
A finding by a licensed laboratory that a test sample taken from a horse contains a drug or its metabolites or analog, or any substance foreign to the natural horse shall be prima facie evidence that such has been administered to the horse either internally or externally in violation of these rules.
It is presumed that the sample of urine, saliva, blood or other acceptable specimen tested by the approved laboratory to which it is sent is taken from the horse in question; its integrity is preserved; that all procedures of same collection and preservation, transfer to the laboratory, and analyses of the sample are correct and accurate; and that the report received from the laboratory pertains to the sample taken from the horse in question and correctly reflects the condition of the horse during the race in which he was entered, with the
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 23
burden on the trainer, assistant trainer or other responsible party to prove otherwise at any hearing in regard to the matter conducted by the stewards or the Commission.
7.
Intent Of Medication Rules.
It shall be the intent of these rules to protect the integrity of horse racing, to guard the health of the horse, and to safeguard the interests of the public and the racing participants through the prohibition or control of all drugs, medication, and substances foreign to the natural horse.
8.
Power To Have Tested.
As a safeguard against the use of drugs, medication, and substances foreign to the natural horse, a urine or other acceptable sample shall be taken under the direction of the official veterinarian from the winner of every race and from such other horses as the stewards or the Commission may designate.
9.
Pre-Race Testing.
The stewards may require any horse entered to race to submit to a blood or other pre-race test, and no horse is eligible to start in a race until the owner or trainer complies with the required testing procedure.
10.
Equipment For Official Testing.
Organizations shall provide the equipment, necessary supplies and services prescribed by the Commission and the official veterinarian for the taking of or administration of blood, urine, saliva or other tests.
11.
Taking Of Samples.
Blood, urine, saliva or other samples shall be taken under the direction of the official veterinarian or persons appointed or assigned by the official veterinarian for taking samples.
All samples shall be taken in a detention area approved by the Commission, unless the Official Veterinarian approves otherwise.
Each horse shall be cooled out for a minimum of 30 minutes after entry into the test barn before a sample is to be taken.
The taking of any test samples shall be witnessed, confirmed or acknowledged by the trainer of the horse being tested or his authorized representative or employee, and may be witnessed by the owner, trainer, or other licensed person designated by them.
Samples shall be sent to racing laboratories approved and designated by the Commission, in such manner as the Commission or its designee may direct.
All required samples shall be in the custody of the official veterinarian, his/her assistants or other persons approved by the official veterinarian from the time they are taken until they are delivered for shipment to the testing laboratory.
No person shall tamper with, adulterate, add to, break the seal of, remove or otherwise attempt to so alter or violate any sample required to be taken by this Article, except for the addition of preservatives or substances necessarily added by the Commission-approved laboratory for preservation of the sample or in the process of analysis.
The Commission has the authority to direct the approved laboratory to retain and preserve samples for future analysis.
The fact that purse money has been distributed prior to the issuance of a laboratory report shall not be deemed a finding that no chemical substance has been administered in violation of these Rules to the horse earning such purse money.
12.
Laboratories Approved By The Commission.
Only laboratories approved by the Commission may be used in obtaining analysis reports on urine, or other specimens, taken from the winners or other designated horses of each race meeting.
The Commission and the Board of Stewards shall
receive reports directly from the laboratory.
13.
Split Samples.
As determined by the official veterinarian, when sample quantity permits, each test sample shall be divided into two portions so that one portion shall be used for the initial testing for unknown substances.
If the Trainer or owner so requests in writing to the stewards within 48 hours of notice of positive lab report on the test sample of his horse, the second sample shall be sent for further testing to a drug testing laboratory designated and approved by the commission.
Nothing in this rule shall prevent the commission or executive director from ordering first use of both sample portions for testing purposes.
The results of said split sampling may not prevent the disqualification of the horse as per R65-78-4 and 65-7-8-6.
All costs for transportation and testing of the second sample portion shall be the responsibility of the requesting person.
The official veterinarian shall have overall supervision and responsibility for the freezing, storage and safeguarding of the second sample portion.
14.
Facilitating The Taking Of Urine Samples.
When a horse has been in the test barn more than 1-1/2 hours, a diuretic may be administered by the Official Veterinarian for the purpose of facilitating the collection of a urine sample with permission of the stewards and the trainer or the trainer's authorized test barn representative.
The cost of administration of the diuretic is the responsibility of the trainer.
Prior to the administration of a diuretic, a blood sample may be taken from the horse.
15.
Postmortem Examination.
Every horse which dies or suffers a breakdown on the racetrack in training or in competition within any enclosure licensed by the Commission and is destroyed, may undergo, at a time and place acceptable to the official veterinarian, a postmortem examination to the extent reasonably necessary to determine the injury or sickness which resulted in euthanasia or natural death.
Any other horse which expires within any enclosure may be required by the official veterinarian to undergo a postmortem examination.
A.
The postmortem examination required under this rule will be conducted by a licensed veterinarian employed by the owner or his trainer in consultation with the official veterinarian, who may be present at such postmortem examination.
B. Test samples may be obtained from the carcass upon which the postmortem examination is conducted and shall be sent to a laboratory approved by the Commission for testing for foreign substances or their metabolites and natural substances at abnormal levels.
When practical, samples shall be procured prior to euthanasia.
C.
The owner of the deceased horse shall make payment of any charges due the veterinarian employed by him to conduct the postmortem examination.
D.
A record of such postmortem shall be filed with the official veterinarian by the owner's veterinarian within 72 hours of the death and shall be submitted on a form supplied by the Commission.
E.
Each owner and trainer accepts the responsibility for the postmortem examination provided herein as a requisite for maintaining the occupation license issued by the Commission.
R65-7-9.
Running the Race.
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 24
1.
Jockeys To Report.
Every jockey engaged to ride in a race shall report to the jockey room at least one hour before post time of the first race and shall weigh out at the appointed time unless excused by the stewards.
After reporting, a jockey shall not leave the jockey room until all of their riding engagements have been fulfilled and/or unless excused by the stewards.
2.
Entrance To Jockey Room Prohibited.
Except with permission of the stewards or the Commission, no person shall be permitted entrance into the jockey room from one hour before post time for the first race until after the last race other than jockeys, their attendants, racing officials and security officers on duty, and organization employees performing required duties.
3.
Weighing Out.
All jockeys taking part in a race must be weighed out by the Clerk of Scales no more than one hour preceding the time designated for the race.
Any overweight in excess of one pound shall be declared by the jockey to the Clerk of Scales, who shall report such overweight and any change in jockeys to the Stewards for immediate public announcement.
A jockey's weight includes the riding costume, racing saddle and pad; but shall not include the jockey's safety helmet, whip, the horse's bridle or other regularly approved racing tack.
A jockey must be neat in appearance and must wear a conventional riding costume.
4.
Unruly Horses In The Paddock.
If a horse is so unruly in the saddling paddock that the identifier cannot read the tattoo number and properly identify the horse; or if the trainer or their assistant is uncooperative in the effort to identify the horse, then the horse may be scratched by order of the stewards.
5. Use Of Equipment.
No bridle shall weigh more than two pounds, nor shall any whip weigh more than one pound or be more than 31 inches in length.
No whip shall be used unless it shall have affixed to the end thereof a leather "popper."
All whips are subject to inspection and approval by the stewards.
Blinkers are not to be placed on the horse until after the horse has been identified by the official identifier, except with permission of the stewards.
6.
Prohibited Use Of Equipment.
Jockeys are prohibited from whipping a horse excessively, brutally, or upon the head, except when necessary to control the horse.
No mechanical or electrical devices or appliances other then the ordinary whip shall be possessed by any individual or used on any horse at any time a race meeting, whether in a race or otherwise.
7.
Responsibility For Weight.
The jockey, trainer and owner shall be responsible for the weight carried by the horse after the jockey has been weighed out for the race by the clerk of scales.
The trainer or owner may substitute a jockey when the engaged jockey reports an overweight in excess of two pounds.
8.
Safety Equipment Required.
All persons, when mounted on a race horse within the enclosure or riding in a race, shall wear a properly fastened safety helmet and flak jacket.
The Commission or the stewards may require any other person to wear such helmet and jacket when mounted on a horse within the enclosure.
All safety helmets and flak jackets so required are subject to approval of the stewards or Commission.
9.
Display Of Colors And Post Position Numbers.
In a race, each horse shall carry a conspicuous saddle cloth number and a head number, and the jockey shall wear colors and a numbered helmet cover corresponding to the number of the
horse which are furnished by the organization licensee.
10.
Deposit Of Jockey Fee.
The minimum jockey mount fee for a losing mount in the race must be on deposit with the horsemen's bookkeeper, prior to the time for weighing out, and failure to have such minimum fee on deposit is cause for disciplinary action and cause for the stewards to scratch the horse for which such fee is to be deposited.
The organization assumes the obligation to pay the jockey fee when earned by the engaged jockey.
The jockey fee shall be considered earned when the jockey is weighed out by the clerk of scales, unless, in the opinion of the stewards, such jockey capable of riding elect to take themselves off the mount without proper cause.
11.
Requirements For Horse, Trainer, And Jockey.
Every horse must be in the paddock at the time appointed by the stewards before post time for their race.
Every horse must be saddled in the paddock stall designated by the paddock judge unless special permission is granted by the stewards to saddle elsewhere.
Each trainer or their assistant trainer having the care and custody of such horse shall be present in the paddock to supervise the saddling of the horse and shall give such instructions as may be necessary to assure the best performance of the horse.
Every jockey participating in a race shall give their best effort in order to facilitate the best performance of their horse.
12.
Failure To Fulfill Jockey Engagements.
No jockey engaged for a certain race or for a specified time may fail or refuse to abide by his or her agreement unless excused by the stewards.
13.
Control And Parade Of Horses On The Track.
The horses are under the control of the starter from the time they enter the track until dispatched at the start of the race.
All horses with jockey mounted shall parade and warm up carrying their weight and wearing their equipment from the paddock to the starting gate, as well as to the finish line.
Any horse failing to do so may be scratched by the stewards.
After passing the stands at least once, the horses may break formation and warm up until directed to proceed to the starting gate.
In the event a jockey is injured during the parade to post or at the starting gate and must be replaced, the horse shall be returned to the paddock and resaddled with the replacement jockey's equipment.
Such horse must carry the replacement jockey to the starting gate.
14.
Start Of The Race.
When the horses have reached the starting gate, they shall be placed in their starting gate stalls in the order stipulated by the starter.
Except in cases of emergency, every horse shall be started by the starter from a starting gate approved by the Commission.
The starter shall see that the horses are placed in their proper positions without unnecessary delay.
Causes for any delay in the start shall immediately be reported to the stewards.
If, when the starter dispatches the field, the doors at the front of the starting gate stall should not open properly due to a mechanical failure of malfunction of the starting gate, the stewards may declare such horse to be a nonstarter.
Should a horse which is not previously scratched not be in the starting gate stall thereby causing such horse to be left when the field is dispatched by the starter, such horse shall be declared a nonstarter by the stewards.
15.
Leaving The Race Course.
Should a horse leave the course while moving from the paddock to starting gate, he shall return to the course at the nearest practical point to that at which
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 25
he left the course, and shall complete his parade to the starting gate from the point at which he left the course.
However, should such horse leave the course to the extent that he is out of the direct line of sight of the stewards, or if such horse cannot be returned to the course within a reasonable amount of time, the stewards shall scratch the horse.
Any horse which leaves the course or loses its jockey during the running of a race shall be disqualified and may be placed last, or the horse may be unplaced.
16.
Riding Rules.
In a straightaway race, every horse must maintain position as nearly as possible in the lane in which he starts.
If a horse is ridden, drifts, or swerves out of their lane in such a manner that he interferes with or impedes another horse, it is a foul.
Every jockey shall be responsible for making his best effort to control and guide his mount in such a way as not to cause a foul.
The stewards shall take cognizance of riding which results in a foul, irrespective of whether an objection is lodged; and if in the opinion of the stewards a foul is committed as a result of a jockey not making his best effort to control and guide their mount to avoid a foul, whether intentionally or through carelessness or incompetence, such jockey may be penalized at the discretion of the stewards.
17.
Stewards To Determine Fouls And Extent Of Disqualification.
The stewards shall determine the extent of interference in cases of fouls or riding infractions.
They may disqualify the offending horse and place it behind such other horses as in their judgment it interfered with, or they may place it last.
The stewards may determine that a horse shall be unplaced.
18.
Careless Riding.
A jockey shall not ride carelessly or willfully so as to permit his or her mount to interfere with or impede any other horse in the race.
A jockey shall not willfully strike at another horse or jockey so as to impede, interfere with, or injure the other horse or jockey.
If a jockey rides in a manner contrary to this rule, the horse may be disqualified and/or the jockey may be fined and/or suspended, or otherwise disciplined.
19.
Ramifications Of A Disqualification.
When a horse is disqualified by the stewards, every horse in the race owned wholly or in part by the same owner, or trained by the same trainer, may be disqualified.
When a horse is disqualified for interference in a time trial race, it shall receive the time of the horse it is placed behind plus 0.01 of a second penalty, or more exact measurement if photo finish equipment permits, and shall be eligible to qualify for the finals or consolations of the race on the basis of the assigned time.
20.
Dead Heat.
When a race results in a dead heat, the heat shall not be run off.
The purse distribution due the horses involved in the dead heat shall be divided equally between them.
All prizes or trophies for which a duplicate is not awardable shall be drawn for by lot.
21.
Returning To The Finish After The Race.
After the race, the jockey shall return their horse to the finish and before dismounting, salute the stewards.
No person shall assist a jockey in removing from their horse the equipment that is to be included in the jockey's weight except by permission of the stewards.
No person shall throw any covering over any horse at the place of dismounting until the jockey has removed the equipment that is to be included in his weight.
22.
Objection - Inquiry Concerning Interference.
Before
the race has been declared official, a jockey, trainer or their assistant trainer, owner or their authorized agent of the horse, who has reasonable grounds to believe that their horse was interfered with or impeded or otherwise hindered during the running of a race, or that any riding rule was violated by any jockey or horse during the running of the race, may immediately make a claim of interference or foul with the stewards or their delegate.
The stewards shall thereupon hold an inquiry into the running of the race; however, the stewards may upon their own motion conduct an inquiry into the running of a race.
Any claim of foul, objection, and/or inquiry shall be immediately announced to the public.
23.
Official Order Of Finish.
When satisfied that the order of finish is correct, that all jockeys unless excused have been properly weighed in, and that the race has been properly run in accordance with the rules of the Commission, the Stewards shall declare that the order of finish is official; and it shall be announced to the public, confirmed, and the official order of finish posted for the race.
24.
Time Trial Qualifiers.
When two or more time trial contestants have the same qualifying time, to a degree of .01 of a second, or more exact measurement if photo finish equipment permits, for fewer positions in the finals or consolation necessary for all contestants, then a draw by lot will be conducted in accordance with Subsection R65-7-7(17).
However, no contestant may draw into a finals or consolation instead of a contestant which out finished such contestant.
When scheduled races are trial heats for futurities or stakes races electronically timed from the starting gates, no organization licensee shall move the starting gates or allow the starting gates to be moved until all trial heats are complete, except in an emergency as determined by the stewards.
R65-7-10.
Objections and Protests; Hearing and Appeals.
1.
Stewards To Make Inquiry Or Investigation.
The stewards shall make diligent inquiry or investigation into any complaint, objection or protest made either upon their own motion, by any Racing Official, or by any other person empowered by this Article to make such complaint, protest or objection.
2.
Objections.
Objections to the participation of a horse entered an any race shall be made to the stewards in writing and signed by the objector.
Except for claim of foul or interference, an objection to a horse entered in a race shall be made not later than two hours prior to the scheduled post time for the first race on the day which the questioned horse is entered.
Any such objection shall set forth the specific reason or grounds for the objection in such detail so as to establish probable cause for the objection.
The stewards upon their own motion may consider an objection until such time as the horse becomes a starter.
An objection concerning claim of foul in a race may be lodged verbally to the stewards before the race results are declared official.
3.
Grounds For Objections.
An objection to a horse which is entered in a race shall be made on the following grounds or reasons: A.
A misstatement, error or omission in the entry under which a horse is to run.
B. That the horse which is entered to run is not the horse
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 26
it is represented to be at the time of entry, or that the age is erroneously given.
C. That the horse is not qualified to enter under the conditions specified for the race, or that the allowances are improperly claimed or not entitled the horse, or that the weight to be carried is incorrect under the conditions of the race.
D. That the horse is owned in whole or in part, or leased by a person ineligible to participate in racing or otherwise ineligible to run a race as provided in these Rules.
E. That reasonable grounds exist whereby a horse was interfered with or impeded or otherwise hindered by another horse or jockey during the running of a race.
4.
Horse Subject To Objection.
The stewards may scratch from the race any horse which is the subject of an objection if they have reasonable cause to believe that the objection is valid.
5.
Protests.
A protest against any horse which has started in a race shall be made to the stewards in writing, signed by the protestor, within 48 hours of the race, except as noted in Subsection R65-7-10(8).
Any such protest shall set forth the specific reason or reasons for the protest in such detail as to establish probable cause for protest.
The stewards upon their own motion may consider a protest at any time.
6.
Grounds For Protest.
A protest may be made upon the following grounds: A.
Any ground for objection set forth in R65-1-10(3).
B. That the order of finish as officially determined by the stewards was incorrect due to oversight or errors in the numbers designated to the horses which started in the race.
C. That a jockey, trainer or owner of a horse which started in the race was ineligible to participate in racing as provided in these rules.
D. That the weight carried by a horse was improper by reason of fraud or willful misconduct.
E. That an unfair advantage was gained in violation of the rules.
7.
Persons Empowered To File Objection Or Protest.
A jockey, trainer, owner or authorized agent of the horse which is entered or is a starter in a race is empowered to file an objection or protest against any other horse in such race upon the grounds set forth in this Article for objections and protests.
8.
No Limitation On Time To File When Fraud Alleged.
Notwithstanding any other provision in this Article, the time limitation on the filing of protests shall not apply in any case in which fraud or willful misconduct is alleged, provided that the stewards are satisfied that the allegations are bona fide and susceptible to verification.
9.
Frivolous Or Inaccurate Objection Or Protest.
No person shall knowingly file a frivolous, inaccurate, false, or untruthful objection or protest; nor shall any person present his objection or protest to the stewards in a disrespectful or undignified manner.
10.
Horse To Be Disqualified On Valid Protest.
If a protest against a horse which has run in a race is declared valid, that horse may be disqualified.
A horse so disqualified which was a starter in the said race, may be placed last in the order of finish or may be unplaced.
The stewards or the Commission may order any purse, award or prize for any race withheld from distribution pending the determination of the protest(s).
In the event any purse, award or prize has been distributed to a person
on behalf of a horse which by protest or other reason is disqualified or determined not to be entitled to such purse, award or prize, the stewards or the Commission may order such purse, award or prize returned and redistributed to the rightful person.
Any person who fails to comply with an order to return any purse, award or prize previously distributed shall be suspended until its return.
11.
Notification Of And Representation At Hearing.
Adequate notice of hearing shall be given to every summoned person in accordance with the procedures set forth in Subsection R65-7-3(6).
Every person alleged to have committed a rule violation or who is called to testify before the stewards is entitled at the persons expense to have counsel present evidence and witnesses on his behalf and to cross-examine other witnesses at the hearing.
12.
Testimony And Evidence At Hearing.
Every person called to a hearing before the stewards for a rule violation shall be allowed to present testimony, produce witnesses, crossexamine witnesses, and present documentary evidence in accordance with the rules of privilege recognized by law.
13.
Duty Of Disclosure.
It is the duty and obligation of every licensee to make full disclosure at a hearing before the Commission or before the stewards of any knowledge he or she possesses of a violation of any racing law or of the rules of the Commission.
No person may refuse to testify at any hearing on any relevant matter except in the proper exercise of a legal privilege, nor shall any person testify falsely.
14.
Failure To Appear.
Any licensee or summoned person who fails to appear before the stewards or the Commission after they have been ordered personally or in writing to do so, may be suspended pending appearance before the stewards or the Commission.
Nonappearance of a summoned person after adequate notice may be construed as a waiver of right to be present at a hearing.
15. Record Of Hearing.
All hearings before the stewards or Commission shall be recorded.
That portion at a hearing constituting deliberations in executive session need not be recorded.
A written transcript or a copy of the tape recording shall be made available to any person alleged to have committed a violation of the Act or the rules upon written request and payment of appropriate reimbursement cost(s) for transcription or reproduction.
16.
Vote On Steward's Decision.
A majority vote shall decide any question to which the authority of the stewards extends.
If a vote is not unanimous, the dissent steward shall provide a written record to the Commission of the reasons for such dissent within 72 hours of the vote.
17.
Rulings By The Stewards.
Any ruling or order issued by the stewards shall specify the full name of the licensee or person subject to the ruling or order; most recent address on file with the Commission; date of birth; social security number; statement of the offense charged including any rule number; date of ruling; fine and/or suspension imposed or other action taken; changes in the order of finish and purse distribution in a race, when appropriate; and any other information deemed necessary by the stewards or the Commission.
Any member of a Board of Stewards may, after consultation with and by mutual agreement of the other stewards, issue an Order or Notice signed by one steward on behalf of the Board of Stewards.
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 27
Subsequently, an Order containing all three stewards' signatures shall be made part of the official record.
18.
Summary Suspension Of Occupation Licensee.
If the stewards or the Commission find that the public health, safety, or welfare require emergency action and incorporates such finding to that effect in any Order, summary suspension may be ordered pending proceedings for revocation or other action, which proceedings shall be promptly initiated and held as provided in Subsection R65-7-10(19).
19.
Duration Of Suspension Or Revocation.
Unless execution of an order of suspension or revocation is stayed by the Commission or a court of competent jurisdiction, a person's occupation license, suspended or revoked, shall remain suspended or revoked until the final determination has been made pursuant to the provisions of Section R65-7-5.
20.
Grounds For Appeal From Decision Of The Stewards.
Any decision of the stewards, except decisions regarding disqualifications for interference during the running of a race, may be appealed to the Commission; and such decision may be overruled if it is found by a preponderance of evidence that: A.
The stewards mistakenly interpreted the law; or B.
The Appellant produces new evidence of a convincing nature which, if found to be true, would require the overruling of the decision; or C.
The best interests of racing and the State may be better served.
21.
Appeal From Decision Of The Stewards.
The Commission shall review hearings of any case referred to the Commission by the stewards or appealed to the Commission from the decisions of the stewards except as otherwise provided in this Article.
Upon every appealable decision of the stewards, the person subject to the decision or Order shall be made aware of his right to an appeal before the Commission and the necessary procedures thereof.
Appeals shall be made no later than 72 hours or the third calendar day from the date of the rendering of the decision of the stewards unless the Commission for good cause extends the time for filing not to exceed 30 days from said rendering date.
The appeal shall be in writing, signed by the appellant; shall contain his full name, present mailing address, and present phone number; and shall set forth the facts and any new evidence the appellant believes to be grounds for an appeal before the Commission.
Action on such a hearing request must commence by the Commission within 30 days of the filing of the appeal.
An appeal shall not affect a decision of the stewards until the appeal has been sustained or dismissed or a stay order issued.
22.
Appointment Of Hearing Examiners.
When directed by the Commission, any qualified person(s) may sit as a hearing examiner(s) for the taking of evidence in any matter pending before the Commission.
Any such hearing examiner shall report to the Commission Findings of Fact and Conclusions of Law, and the Commission shall determine the matter as if such evidence had been presented to the full Commission.
23.
Hearings On Agreement.
Persons aggrieved as of the result of a stewards' ruling in a preliminary or trial race may request a hearing before the executive director of the Commission to review same.
If all interested parties waive the right to receive ten day notice of hearing, such a hearing may be heard on a day certain within seven days after the preliminary or
trial race in question.
All such appeals shall be heard on days set by the executive director of the Commission or anyone acting in his stead.
24.
Temporary Stay Order.
The Executive Director may, upon consultation with the direction of a minimum of three Commissioners, issue or deny a temporary stay order to stay execution of any ruling, order or decision of the stewards except stewards' decisions regarding disqualifications for interference during the running of a race.
Any application for a temporary stay shall be in writing, signed by the appellant; shall contain his full name, present mailing address, and present phone number; shall set forth the facts and any evidence to justify the issuance of the stay; and shall be filed with the Office of the Commission as specified in Subsection R65-7-3(7).
The granting of a temporary stay order shall carry no presumption that the stayed decision of the stewards is or may be invalid, and a temporary stay order may be dissolved at any time by further order of the executive director upon consultation with and the direction of a minimum of three Commissioners.
25.
Appearance At Hearing Upon Appeal.
The Commission shall notify the Appellant and the stewards of the date, time and location of its hearing in the matter upon appeal.
The burden shall be on the appellant to provide the facts necessary to sustain the appeal.
26.
Complaints Against Officials.
Any complaint against a racing official other than a steward shall be made to the stewards in writing and signed by the complainant.
All such complaints shall be reported to the Commission by the stewards, together with a report of the action taken or the recommendation of the stewards.
Complaints against any stewards shall be made in writing to the executive director of the Commission and signed by the complainant.
27.
Rulings On Admissibility And Evidence.
In all hearings, the chairperson, chief steward or such other person as may be designated, shall make rulings on admissibility and introduction of evidence.
Such a ruling shall prevail; except when a Commission member or a steward requests a poll of the panel, and the ruling overturned by majority vote.
R65-7-11.
General Conduct.
1.
Conditions Of Meeting Binding Upon Licensees.
The Commission, recognizing the necessity for an organization to comply with the requirements of its license and to fulfill its obligation to the public and the State of Utah with the best possible uninterrupted services in the comparatively short licensed period, herein provides that all organizations, officials, horsemen, owners, trainers, jockeys, grooms, farriers, organization employees, and all licensees who have accepted directly or indirectly, with reasonable advance notice, the conditions defined by these rules under which said organization engages and plans to conduct such race meeting, shall be bound thereby.
2.
Trainer Responsibility.
The trainer is presumed to know the "Rules of Racing" and is responsible for the condition, soundness, and eligibility of the horses he enters in a race.
Should the chemical analysis, urine or otherwise, taken from a horse under his supervision show the presence of any drug or medication of any kind or substance, whether drug or otherwise, regardless of the time it may have been administered, it shall be
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 28
taken as prima facie evidence that the same was administered by or with the knowledge of the trainer or person or persons under his supervision having care or custody of such horse.
At the discretion of the stewards or Commission, the trainer and all other persons shown to have had care or custody of such horse may be fined or suspended or both.
Under the provisions of this rule, the trainer is also responsible for any puncture mark on any horse he enters in a race, found by the stewards upon recommendation of the official veterinarian to evidence injection by syringe.
If the trainer cannot be present on race day, he shall designate an assistant trainer.
Such designation shall be made prior to time of entry, unless otherwise approved by the stewards.
Failure to fully disclose the actual trainer of a horse participating in an approved race shall be grounds to disqualify the horse, and subject the actual trainer to possible disciplinary action by the stewards or the Commission.
Designation of an assistant trainer shall not relieve the trainer's absolute responsibility for the conditions and eligibility of the horse, but shall place the assistant trainer under such absolute responsibility also.
Willful failure on the part of the trainer to be present at, or refusal to allow the taking of any specimen, or any act or threat to prevent or otherwise interfere therewith shall be cause for disqualification of the horse involved; and the matter shall be referred to the stewards for further action.
3.
Altering Sex Of Horse.
Any alteration to the sex of a horse from the sex as recorded on the Certificate of Foal Registration or other official registration Certificate of such horse shall be immediately reported by the trainer to the racing secretary and the official horse identifier if such horse is registered to race at any race meeting.
4.
Official Workouts And Schooling Races.
No trainer shall permit a horse in his charge to be taken on to the track for training or a workout except during hours designated by the organization.
A trainer desiring to engage a horse in a workout or schooling race shall, prior to such workout or race, identify the horse by registered name and tattoo number when requested to do so by the stewards or their authorized representative.
5.
Intoxication.
No licensee, employee of the organization or its concessionaires, shall be under the influence of intoxicating liquor, the combined influence of intoxicating liquor and any controlled dangerous substance, or under the influence of any narcotic or other drug while within the enclosure.
No person shall in any manner or at any time disturb the peace or make themselves obnoxious on the enclosure of an organization.
6.
Firearms.
No person shall possess any firearm within the enclosure unless he is a fully qualified peace officer as defined in the laws of the State of Utah, or is acting in accordance with Title 53, Chapter 5, Part 7, Concealed Weapons Act and Title 76, chapter 10, Part 5, Utah Code.
A person carrying a concealed weapon may be asked to show a valid, current concealed weapons permit before being allowed to enter the facility.
7.
Financial Responsibility.
No licensee shall willfully and deliberately fail or refuse to pay any monies when due for any service, supplies or fees connected with his operations as a licensee; nor shall he falsely deny any such amount due or the validity of the complaint thereof with the purpose of hindering or delaying or defrauding the person to whom such indebtedness
is due.
A commission authorized license may be suspended pending settlement of the financial obligation.
Any financial responsibility complaint against a licensee shall be in writing, signed by the complainant, and accompanied by documentation of the services, supplies or fees alleged to be due, or by a judgment from a court.
8.
Checks.
No licensee shall write, issue, make or present a bad check in payment for any license fee, fine, nomination or entry fee or other fees, or for any service or supplies.
The fact that such check is returned to the payee by the bank as refused is a ground for suspension pending satisfactory redemption of the returned check.
9.
Gratuity To Starter Or Assistant Starter.
No person shall offer or give money or other gratuity to any starter or assistant starter, nor shall any starter or assistant starter receive money or other compensation, gratuity or reward, in connection with the running of any race or races except compensation received from an organization for official duties.
10.
Possession Of Contraband.
No person other than a veterinarian or an animal technician licensed by the Commission shall have in his possession within the enclosure during sanctioned meetings any prohibited substance, or any hypodermic syringe or hypodermic needle or similar instrument which may be used for injection except as provided in Subsection R65-7-8(1).
No person shall have in his or her possession within the enclosure during any recognized meeting any device other than the ordinary whip which can be used for the purpose of stimulating or depressing the horse or affecting its speed at any time.
The stewards may permit the possession of drugs or appliances by a licensee for personal medical needs under such conditions as the stewards may impose.
11.
Bribes.
No person shall give, or offer or promise to give, or attempt to give or offer any money, bribe or thing of value to any owner, trainer, jockey, agent, or any other person participating in the conduct of a race meeting in any capacity, with the intention, understanding or agreement that such owner, trainer, jockey, agent or other person shall not use his best efforts to win a race or so conduct himself in such race that any other participant in such race shall be assisted or enabled to win such race; nor shall any trainer, jockey, owner, agent or other person participating at any race meeting accept, offer to accept, or agree to accept any money, bribe or thing of value with the intention, understanding or agreement that he will not use his best efforts to win a race or to so conduct himself that any other horse or horses entered in such race shall thereby be assisted or enabled to win such race.
12.
Trainer's Duty To Ensure Licensed Participation.
No trainer shall have in his custody within the enclosure of any race meeting any horse owned in whole or in part by any person who is not licensed as a horse owner by the Commission unless such owner has filed an application for license as a horse owner with the Commission and the same is pending before the Commission; nor shall any trainer have in his employ within the enclosure any groom, stable employee, stable agent, or other person required to be licensed, unless such person has a valid license.
All changes of commissioned licensed personnel shall be reported immediately to the Commission.
13.
Conduct Detrimental To Horse Racing.
No licensee shall engage in any conduct prohibited by law and by the rules
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 29
of the Commission, nor shall any licensee engage in any conduct which by its nature is unsportsmanlike or detrimental to the best interest of horse racing.
14.
Denial Of Access To Private Property.
Nothing contained in these rules shall be deemed, expressly or implicitly, to prevent an organization from exercising the right to deny access to or to remove any person from the organization's premises or property for just cause.
15.
Tricks/Schemes.
No person shall falsify, conceal, or cover up by trick, scheme, or device a material fact; or make any false, fictitious, or fraudulent statements or representations; or make or use any false writing or document knowing the same to contain any false, fictitious, or fraudulent statement or entry regarding the prior racing record, pedigree, identity, or ownership of a registered animal in any matter related to the breeding, buying selling, or racing of such animal.
16.
Prearranging The Outcome Of A Race.
No licensed or unlicensed person may attempt or conspire to prearrange the outcome of a race.
R65-7-12.
Fire Prevention and Security.
1.
Security Control.
Every organization conducting a race meeting shall maintain security controls over its premises, and such security controls are subject to the approval of the Commission.
2.
Identification Required.
No person shall be admitted to a restricted area within the enclosure without a license, visitor's pass, or other identification issued by the Commission or the organization on his person.
Whenever deemed advisable, the stewards or the organization may require the visible display of the identification as a badge.
No person shall use the license or credential issued to another, nor shall any person give or loan his license or credential to any other person.
3.
Organization Credentials.
The racing organization shall establish a system or method of issuing credentials or passes to restrict access to its restricted areas or to ensure that all participants at its meeting are licensed as required by this Article; provided, however, that no such system or methods may exclude any investigator or employee of the Commission or any peace officer when on duty; nor shall any person be excluded solely on the basis of sex, color, creed, or national origin or ancestry.
4.
Organization To Prevent Unauthorized Access To Restricted Areas.
Unless granted exemption by the Commission, every organization shall prevent access to and shall remove or cause to be removed from its restricted areas any person who is unlicensed, or who has not been issued a visitor's pass or other identifying credential, or whose presence in such restricted area is unauthorized.
Nothing herein shall be construed to exclude members of the Commission and any staff members of the Commission in the conduct of official duties.
5.
Examination Of Personal Effects.
The Commission, its authorized officers or agents may enter the stables, rooms, or other places within the premises of a recognized meeting to inspect and examine the personal effects and property of any licensee or other person in or about or permitted access to any restricted area; and each licensee in accepting his license, and each person entering such restricted area does thereby consent thereto.
6.
Obedience To Security Officers And Public Safety Officers.
No licensee shall willfully ignore or refuse to obey any order issued by the stewards; the Commission; or any security officer of the organization; or any public officer of any police, fire or law enforcement agency when such order is issued or given in the performance of duty for the purpose of controlling any hazardous situation or occurrence.
No person shall interfere with public safety officers, security officers or any racing official in the performance of their duties.
R65-7-13.
Drugs and Medication Exceptions and Illegal Practices.
1.
Horses Tested.
The winner of every race and such other horses as the stewards or commission veterinarian may designate shall be escorted by the veterinarian assistant after the race to the testing enclosure for examination by the authorized representative of the Commission and the taking of specimens shall be by the commission veterinarian or his assistant.
2.
Trainer Present at Testing.
The trainer, or his authorized representative, must be present in the testing enclosure when a urine or other specimen is taken from a horse, the sample tag attached to the specimen shall be signed by the trainer or his representative, as witness of taking of the specimen.
Willful failure to be present at or a refusal to allow the taking of the specimen, or any act or threat to impede or prevent or otherwise interfere therewith, shall subject the person or persons doing so to immediate suspension and fine by the stewards and the matter shall be referred to the Commission for such further penalty as may be determined.
3.
Specimens Delivered to Laboratory.
All specimens taken by or under the direction of the commission veterinarian, or other authorized representative of the Commission, shall be delivered to the laboratory approved by the Commission for official analysis.
Each specimen shall be marked by number and date and may also bear such information as may be essential to its proper analysis; but the identity of the horse from the specimen was taken or the identity of its owner, trainer, jockey or stable shall not be revealed to the laboratory.
The container of specimen shall be sealed as soon as the specimen is placed therein and shall bear the name of the Commission.
4.
Medication.
The commission veterinarian, the Commission or any member of the Board of Stewards may take samples of any medicines or other materials suspected of containing improper medication, drugs or chemicals which would affect the racing conditions of a horse in a race and which may be found in stables or elsewhere on race track grounds or in the possession of such tracks or any person connected with racing and the same shall be delivered to the laboratory designated by the Commission.
5.
The Only Non-Steroidal Anti-Inflammatory Drug Permitted.
Phenylbutazone shall be administered to the horse no later than 24 hours prior to the time the horse is scheduled to race.
6.
Phenylbutazone Levels Permitted and Penalty.
No urine sample taken from a horse shall exceed 165 micrograms of phenylbutazone or its metabolites per milliliter of urine or shall not exceed 5 micrograms per milliliter of blood plasma.
On a first violation period at phenylbutazone concentrations above 5 ug/ml but below 10 ug/ml plasma or serum: a minimum
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 30
fine of $250.00; at concentrations above 10 ug/ml plasma: a fine of up to $500.00.
On a second violation within a 12 month period at phenylbutazone concentrations above 5 ug/ml but below 10 ug/ml plasma or serum: a minimum fine of $500.00; at concentrations above 10 ug/ml plasma: a fine of up to $1,000.00.
On a third or subsequent violation within a 12-month period: a fine of $1,000.00, a suspension of 30 days, and loss of purse.
7.
Administered under Direction of Commission Licensed Veterinarian.
Phenylbutazone must be administered under the direction of a commission licensed veterinarian.
8.
List Provided.
Horses which are on phenylbutazone shall not be indicated on the daily racing programs or any other publications except that a list of horses on phenylbutazone will be kept by the stewards.
9.
Lasix Treatment.
Any horse which exhibits symptoms of Epistaxis and/or respiratory tract hemorrhage is eligible for placement on the bleeder list and for treatment on race days with the approved medication to prevent or limit bleeding during racing.
10.
Bleeders Listing.
To be placed on the bleeders list, a horse must be found to have, during or immediately following a race or workout, shed free blood from one or both nostrils or bled internally in the respiratory tract.
A Commission licensed veterinarian, following his or her personal examination of a horse, or after consulting with the horses' private veterinarian, shall be allowed to certify a horse as a bleeder.
A universal bleeders certificate is required.
11.
License Required.
In any and all cases, private veterinarians must be licensed with the Utah Horse Racing Commission as a veterinarian in order to administer Lasix.
12.
Horse Removed From Bleeders List.
A Commission licensed veterinarian may remove a horse from the bleeders list, provided a request is made in writing and it is the recommendation of the veterinarian of the horse, or after an examination by the veterinarian, it is determined that the horse is not a bleeder or is no longer eligible for the bleeders list.
13.
Treatment Procedure.
Horses on the bleeders list must be treated at least four hours prior to post time with the bleeder medication furosemide, (i.e. Lasix).
No other treatment is permitted for bleeder treatment.
Bleeder medication must be administered by a Commission licensed veterinarian, such dosage not to exceed 250 mg.
The bleeder medication is administered by the trainers veterinarian, and must be witnessed by the trainer or his designee upon their request.
Administration of the bleeder medication must be reported in writing on a form designated by the Commission, to the track management no later than two hours prior to the scheduled post time of the last live race of the program.
14.
Lasix Levels Permitted and Penalty.
Any horse whose post race blood tests contains a level in excess of 80 nanograms of furosemide per milliliter of plasma will be said to be positive for Lasix overage and in violation of Utah Horse Racing Rules and Regulations.
Any horse whose post-race urine creatinine is less than 40 milligrams creatinine per 100 milliliters of urine, and the ratio of urine furosemide to urine creatinine does not exceed 0.15, with urine furosemide being measured in
micrograms per milliliter of urine will be said to be positive for Lasix overage and in violation of Utah Horse Racing rules.
A.
A finding of a chemist of furosemide (Lasix) exceeding the allowable test levels given above shall be considered prima facia evidence that the medication was administered to the horse and carried in the body of the horse while participating in the race.
B.
In these cases, a fine and/or suspension will be levied to such horse trainer under the trainer responsibility rule and the horse will be disqualified from the race.
15.
Horses Designated.
The horses' trainer or designated agent is responsible to enter horses correctly indicating the prescribed medication for the horse.
Horses approved for Lasix medication will be designated on the overnight and the daily program with a Lasix or "L".
A list of horses approved for and using Lasix medication will be maintained by the stewards.
16.
Bleeder Disqualification.
Any horse that bleeds a second time in Utah shall not be able to race for a period of 30 days from the date of the second bleeding offense.
Any horse that bleeds for a third time shall be suspended from racing for a period of one year from the date of the third offense.
Any horse bleeding for the fourth time will be given a lifetime suspension from racing.
17.
Disqualification of Owner or Trainer.
A horse owner or trainer found to have committed illegal practices under this chapter or found to have administered any non-approved medication substances in violation of the rules in this chapter, shall be deemed disqualified and denied, or shall promptly return, any portion of the purse or sweepstakes or trophy awarded in the affected race, and shall be distributed as in the case of a disqualification.
If the affected race is a qualifying race for a subsequent race and if a horse shall be so disqualified, the eligibility of the other horses which ran in the affected race, and which have started in the subsequent race before announcement of such disqualification shall not in any way be affected.
18.
Hypodermic Instruments Prohibited.
Except by specific written permission of the presiding steward, no person within the grounds of the racing association where the horses are lodged or kept shall have possession of, upon the premises which he occupies or has the right to occupy or in any of his personal property or effects, any hypodermic instrument, hypodermic syringes or hypodermic needle which may be used for injection into any horse of any medication prohibited by this rule.
Every racing association is required to use all reasonable efforts to prevent the violation of this rule.
19.
Search Provisions.
Every racing association, the Commission or the stewards shall have the right to enter, search and inspect the buildings, stables, rooms and other places where horses which are eligible to race are kept, or where property and effects of the licensee are kept within the grounds of the association.
Any licensee accepting a license shall be deemed to have consented to such search and to the seizure of any nonapproved or prohibited materials, chemicals, drugs or devices and anything apparently intended to be used in connection therewith.
20.
Daily Medication Reports.
All practicing veterinarians must submit daily to the commission veterinarian a medication report form furnished by the Commission containing the
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 31
following: A. Name, age, sex and breed of the horse.
B.
The permitted drug used (Bute or Lasix).
C.
The time administered.
D.
The route of the administration.
E.
The report must be dated and signed by the veterinarian so administering the medication.
Any such report is confidential and its contents shall not be disclosed except in a proceeding before the stewards or the Commission or in the exercise of the Commission's jurisdiction.
21.
Prima Facia Evidence.
If the stewards find that any non-approved medication, for which the purpose of definition shall include any drug, chemical, narcotic, anesthetic, or analgesic has been administered to a horse in such a manner that it is present in a pre-race or post-race test sample, such presence shall constitute prima facia evidence that the horse has been illegally medicated.
22.
Trainer Responsibility.
Under all circumstances, the horse of record trainer shall be responsible for the horse he trains.
KEY: horses June 9, 2003 Notice of Continuation October 19, 2001
4-38-4
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 32
R68.
Agriculture and Food, Plant Industry.
R68-5.
Grain Inspection.
R68-5-1.
Authority.
Promulgated under authority of Section 4-2-2(2).
R68-5-2.
Grain Inspection Fees.
Fees shall be charged for the inspection and grading services as determined by the department pursuant to 4-2-2(2).
A current list of approved fees may be obtained, upon request from the department: A. Location: Utah Department of Agriculture and Food Grain Inspection P.O. Box 1519 - 128 17th Street Ogden, UT 84402 Phone (801) 392-2292 B. Hours.
Regular working hours are 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m., Monday through Friday.
C. Days Not Worked.
Saturdays, Sundays, New Years Day, Memorial Day, Independence Day, Labor Day, Thanksgiving, and Christmas.
Holidays are considered overtime hours.
R68-5-3.
Utah Standards For Safflower.
A. Safflower (carthamus tinctorius), for purposes of this rule, shall be construed to include all types and varieties of Safflower.
B. Moisture.
The moisture, or water content in Safflower shall be tested in the following manner: 1.
Basis of determination.
A moisture determination shall be made on a representative portion from the representative sample, before the removal of foreign material or dockage, by testing exactly the amount of 225 grams of safflower seed product.
2.
Certification.
The percentages of moisture content shall be reported on the pan-ticket and the Utah Department of Agriculture and Food-Grain Inspection Certificate, and shall be expressed in whole and tenths of a percent, rounded to the nearest tenth percent.
C. Dockage.
All matter other than whole Safflower Seed which can be removed from a test portion of the original sample, shall be removed by the use of an approved device, and also by handpicking a portion of the machine-cleaned sample to remove all remaining material other than Safflower and other grains.
1.
Basis of determination.
A dockage determination test shall be made using approximately 750-850 grams or 1 1/8 to 1 1/2 quarts cut from the original sample.
a.
The person making the test shall first determine the mechanically separated dockage.
This involves a separation procedure using a Carter Dockage Tester. b.
An arbitrarily handpicked portion of approximately 75 grams shall be cut from the mechanically cleaned Safflower Seed.
2.
The following process shall be used to determine dockage with the Carter Dockage Tester. a.
The air control shall be set at number 9 (wide open).
b.
The feed control shall be set at number 6.
c.
In the Riddle Carriage, the plastic seed riddle, part number 35898, shall be used. d.
A number 2 sieve shall be used in the top sieve carriage.
e.
If there is a sieve in the middle or the bottom sieve carriage, it shall NOT be used.
3.
Dockage will consist of: a.
Any material removed by the aspirator (air collecting pan). b. Coarse material, except whole Safflower Seed that passed over the riddle (riddle collecting pan).
Whole kernels of Safflower Seed that passed over the riddle shall be returned to the cleaned sample.
c.
Any material that passed through the number 2 sieve (bottom collecting pan). d.
Any material other than Safflower seed and other grains removed by handpicking a machine cleaned portion of approximately 75 grams.
4.
Certification.
The percentage of dockage shall be reported on the pan ticket and the Utah Department of Agriculture and Food-Grain Inspection Certificate.
The percent of dockage shall be stated in terms of whole or half percentages.
D. Test weight per bushel.
1.
Basis of determination.
A test weight per bushel shall be performed on a representative portion ranging in size from 1 to 1 1/2 quarts or 750-850 grams after the removal of the mechanically separated dockage.
2.
Certification.
The test weight per bushel shall be reported on the sample pan ticket and the Utah Department of Agriculture-Grain Inspection Certificate in whole and half pounds.
E. Hulls.
Hulls shall have less than 1 third (1/3) of the kernels attached.
1.
Basis of determination.
A determination for testing the percentage of kernels attached to hulls shall be performed using approximately 30 grams cut from the work portion after the removal of dockage.
2.
Certification.
The percentage of kernels attached to hulls shall be reported on the pan ticket and the Utah Department of Agriculture-Grain Inspection Certificate, and shall be expressed to the nearest tenth percent.
F. Dehulled kernels and broken seed.
Dehulled kernels and broken seed shall consist of Safflower or pieces of seed in which the hull has been completely removed from Safflower Seed that have 1 third (1/3) or more of the kernels attached, and also in cases of Safflower seeds that have been so broken that the kernel has been exposed.
1.
Basis of determination.
A determination of dehulled and broken seed will be reported on the pan ticket and the Utah Department of Agriculture-Grain Inspection Certificate to the nearest tenth percent.
2.
Certification.
The percentage of dehulled and broken seed will be reported on the pan ticket and the Utah Department of
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003 3 2 5.0 sniarG rehtO
Page 33 *
KEY: inspections December 16, 1997 Notice of Continuation June 13, 2003
.egakcod fo noitarapes lacina eht retfa st e l l e p h t r a e fo %5.2 naht erom sniatnoC .vi ro ,rodo ngi elbanoitcejbo yllaicremmoc ro ruos ,ytsum a saH .iii ro ,senots ro 7 sniatnoc ,elpmas marg 058-057 a yletamixorppa nI .ii ro ,3 hguorht 1 hatU edarg rof stnemeriuqer eht teem ton seoD .i :h puorg dees-rewolffaS a fo tsisnoc llahs rewolffaS edarg elp
.elur siht rednu noitcepsni fo sesoprup rof 3 hatU ro 2 hatU edarg naht rehgih detar eb ton yam deeS rewolffaS deniats rehtaew yldab ro ylthgilS .1 :ETON
4-2-2(2)
* * *
5 1 4
5 2.0 2
3 0.0 1
lato tae tuorp sdeeS rewolffa degama
cihw maS* hatU erom erof hcem
T H S S D
Agriculture-Grain Inspection Certificate to the nearest tenth percent.
G.
Other grains.
Other grains shall consist of any other grain or domestic kernels which are not removed in the dockage.
1.
Basis of determination.
A test to determine the percentage of other grains present in the product, will be performed on approximately 30 grams cut from the work sample after the removal of dockage.
2.
Certification.
The percentage of other grains will be reported on the pan ticket and the Utah Department of Agriculture-Grain Inspection Certificate to the nearest tenth percent.
H. Damaged and heat-damaged Safflower Seed.
Amounts of damaged Safflower total kernels and pieces of kernels that are heat damaged, sprout damaged, frost damaged, green or otherwise materially damaged shall be assessed.
Heat damaged means Safflower kernels and pieces of kernels that have been materially discolored and damaged by heat.
1.
Basis of determination.
A test to determine the percentage of damaged and heat damaged Safflower kernels will be performed using approximately 30 grams cut from the work portion after the removal of dockage.
2.
Certification.
The percentage of heat damaged Safflower Seed and damaged Safflower Seed (total) shall be reported on the pan ticket and the Utah Department of Agriculture-Grain Inspection Certificate, and shown to the nearest tenth percent.
I. Split damage.
A check for split damage in Safflower Seed shall be conducted noting any break, fissure, crack, or tear in the seed kernels, husk or cover.
1.
Basis of determination.
A test to determine the percent of split, damaged Safflower kernels will be performed on approximately 30 grams cut from the work portion after the removal of dockage.
2.
Certification.
The percentage of split damaged Safflower seeds shall be reported in the split section and included in the damaged Safflower section on the Utah Department of Agriculture-Grain Inspection Certificate, and shown to the nearest tenth percent.
J. Safflower Seed claiming a UTAH grade shall meet the requirements in the following table: ELBAT elpmaS * * * * * sbl 0.53 3 hatU 6 8 5 8 stnemeriuqeR edarG deeS rewolffaS hatU sbl 0.83 2 hatU 6 4 2 5 sbl 0.04 1 hatU 2 2 1 2 lehsub reP .tw tseT timiL muminiM stil deeS nekorB d slenreK delluh sll )smarg 001 re seno timiL mumix p n e u p t a S a D H ( S M edarG edarG
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 34
R68.
Agriculture and Food, Plant Industry.
R68-9.
Utah Noxious Weed Act.
R68-9-1.
Authority.
Promulgated under authority of 4-2-2 and 4-17-3.
R68-9-2.
Designation and Publication of State Noxious Weeds.
A.
The following weeds are hereby officially designated and published as noxious for the State of Utah, as per the authority vested in the Commissioner of Agriculture and Food under Section 4-17-3: ELBAT
R68-9-3.
Designations and Publication of Articles Capable of Disseminating Noxious Weeds.
A. As provided in Section 4-17-3, the following articles are designated and published by the Commissioner as capable of disseminating noxious weeds: 1.
Machinery and equipment, particularly combines and hay balers.
2.
Farm trucks and common carriers.
3.
Seed.
4.
Screenings sold for livestock feed.
5.
Livestock feed material.
6.
Hay, straw, or other material of similar nature.
7.
Manure.
8.
Soil, sod and nursery stock.
9.
Noxious weeds distributed or sold for any purpose.
10.
Livestock.
R68-9-4.
Prescribed Treatment for Articles.
A. As provided in Section 4-17-3, the Commissioner has
determined that the following treatments shall be considered minimum to prevent dissemination of noxious weed seeds or such parts of noxious weed plants that could cause new growth by contaminated articles: 1.
Machinery and Equipment.
a.
It shall be unlawful for any person, company or corporation to (1) bring any harvesting or threshing machinery, portable feed grinders, portable seed cleaners or other farm vehicles or machinery into the state without first cleaning such equipment free from all noxious weed seed and plant parts; or (2) move any harvesting or threshing machinery, portable feed grinders or portable seed cleaners from any farm infested with any noxious weed without first cleaning such equipment free from all noxious weed seed and plant parts.
(a) Immediately after completing the threshing of grain or seed which is contaminated with noxious weeds, such machine is to be cleaned by: (1) removing all loose material from the top and side of the machine by sweeping with a blower (2) opening the lower end of elevator, return and measuring device and removing infested material from shakers, sieves, and other places of lodgement; (3) running the machine empty for not less than five minutes, alternately increasing and retarding the speed; and (4) following the manufacturer's detailed suggestions for cleaning the machine.
2.
Farm Trucks and Common Carriers.
It shall be unlawful for any person, company or corporation to transport seed, screenings or feed of any kind containing noxious weed seed over or along any highway in this State or on any railroad operating in this State unless the same is carried or transported in such vehicles or containers which will prevent the leaking or scattering thereof.
All common carriers shall thoroughly clean and destroy any noxious weed seeds or plant parts in cars, trucks, vehicles or other receptacles used by them after each load shall have been delivered to consignee before again placing such car, truck, vehicle or receptacle into service.
3.
Seed. a.
It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to sell, offer or expose for sale or distribute in Utah any agricultural, vegetable, flower or tree and shrub seeds for seeding purposes which contain any seeds of those weeds declared noxious by the Commissioner of Agriculture and Food. b.
It shall be the duty of the State Agricultural Inspector to remove from sale any lots of seeds offered for sale which are found to contain noxious weed seeds.
Such seed may be recleaned under the supervision of the inspector and, if found to be free from noxious weed seeds, the same may be released for sale or distribution; otherwise, such seed shall be returned to point of origin, shipped to another state where such weed shall be returned to point of origin, shipped to another state where such weed seed is not noxious, or destroyed or processed in such a manner as to destroy viability of the weed seeds.
4.
Screenings Sold for Livestock Feed. a.
All screenings or by-products of cleaning grains or other seeds containing noxious weed seeds, when used in commercial feed or sold as such to the ultimate consumer, shall be ground fine enough or otherwise treated to destroy such weed seeds so
.niereht swal eht ot tcejbus eb llahs dna saera rehto lla tuohguorht deew suoixon a taht fo seiradnuo b e h t nihtiw waL deeW snoisivorp ot tcejbus eb ton llahs dna ytnu suoixon a eb ton llahs )nolytcad n o d o n y C (
.L mu . .vuaeB ).L .L
.pps suluvlovnoC .sreP ).L( nolytcad nodonyC muhgro dna ).sre muhgroS( detimil . .maL .pocS ). easudem-tu .L .
S( P ss t L a L( .L silaititsl . htoR asorrau .maL asoluc .L muilofital muidipeL i L ( l htn sn sn air .L pa a )i m . r n i u e ) a o a s aca eper eper acil snat iks c mu luse dora umlA L( e G no tub rotc ffid snev o p q a s p s m mu a n as un ve re a P m sn sn g ni a ra aer s ai aer aer idro erua oryp mur suu ). tai bro mum hgr pel oJ idu si rua mui N h i , u e h n t e u r u u a a a a p t o h d L n h l o a o l t t s t d t t o n r t r ( e p a S h t c a n r n r n n n s e i aT uE n e g y a e a e e i I C C O C A L C C C C C )p ssargrepp ) .pps mu d
eltsihtratS wo pote sorr det otto T hc nai argk L el ihT
deewpanK deewpan )eltsihT eltsi deewpan s efirtseso elt
hatU fo etatS eb llahs tI suoixoN hatU oC notgnihsaW ssargadumreB
ghroS la ao K hT W ae gn d rg e K n h K s o s
e wpa lts o eti e de y olg liW ss
e e t P r d *
daehasudeM egrupS yfaeL
d n i h v ( a
in W es a l n e d
l l i e a
n s u d a d r w u
e r f a T a o d m l t a t C t s c p k
r e f n ( o M n r l i u o ( o s a r s
iB eB rB e y i a c u u u u e h q p eht .ytn eht ni d * P D D C S R Q P M Y W S S f uo f ee o c o w
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 35
that the finished product contains not more than six whole noxious weed seeds per pound.
b.
All mills and plants cleaning or processing any grains or other seeds shall be required to grind or otherwise treat all screenings containing noxious weed seeds so as to destroy such weed seeds to the extent that the above stated tolerance is not exceeded before allowing the same to be removed from the mill or plant.
Such screenings may be moved to another plant for grinding and treatment; provided that: each container or shipment is labeled with the words "screenings for processing not for seeding or feeding" and with the name and address of the consignor and the consignee.
5.
Livestock Feed Material. a.
It shall be unlawful for any person, company or corporation to sell or offer for sale, barter or give away to the ultimate consumer any livestock feed material, including whole grains, which contain more than six whole noxious weed seeds per pound.
Whole feed grain which exceeds this tolerance of noxious weed seeds may be sold to commercial processors or commercial feed mixers where the manner of processing will reduce the number of whole noxious weed seed to no more than six per pound.
6.
Hay, Straw or Other Material of Similar Nature.
a.
It shall be unlawful for any person, company or corporation to sell or offer for sale, barter or give away any hay, straw, or other material of similar nature, which is contaminated with mature noxious weed seeds or such parts of noxious weed plants which could cause new growth.
7.
Manure. a.
Manure produced from grain, hay, or other forage infested with noxious weeds shall not be applied or dumped elsewhere than upon the premises of the owner thereof.
8.
Soil, Sod and Nursery Stock.
a.
No soil, sod or nursery stock which contains or is contaminated with noxious weed seeds, or such parts of the plant that could cause new growth, shall be removed from the premises upon which it is located until cleaned of such weed seed or plant parts, except that such contaminated soil may be used for restrictive non-planting purposes upon permission and under direction of the county weed supervisor or a representative of the Utah Department of Agriculture and Food.
9.
Noxious Weeds Distributed or Sold for Any Purpose. a.
It shall be unlawful for any person, company or corporation to sell, barter or give away any noxious weed plants or seeds for any purpose.
10.
Livestock. a.
No livestock to which grain, hay, or other forage containing noxious weed seeds has been fed shall be permitted to range or graze upon fields other than those upon which they have been so fed for a period of 72 hours following such feeding.
During such period, they shall be fed materials which are not contaminated with noxious weed seeds.
R68-9-5.
Reports From Counties.
A.
The Board of County Commissioners of each county, with the aid of their county Weed Board and their County Weed Supervisor, shall submit an "Annual Progress Report of County Noxious Weed Control Program" to the Commissioner of Agriculture and Food by January 15 of each year, covering the
activities of the previous calendar year.
A prescribed form for this report shall be supplied by the Commissioner.
R68-9-6.
Notices.
A. General and individual notices pertaining to the control and prevention of noxious weeds shall be substantially of the types prescribed herein; namely, General Notice to Control Noxious Weeds, Individual Notice to Control Noxious Weeds, and Notification of Noxious Weed Lien Assessment.
1.
General Notice To Control Noxious Weeds.
A general public notice shall be posted by the County Weed Board in at least three public places within the county and be published in one or more newspapers of general circulation throughout the county, on or before May 1 of each year and at any other times the County Weed Board determines.
Such public notice shall state that it is the duty of every property owner to control and prevent the spread of noxious weeds on any land in his possession, or under his control, and shall serve as a warning that if he fails to comply with this notice, enforced weed control measures may be imposed at the direction of county authorities.
Such general notice shall also include a list of weeds declared noxious for the State of Utah and for said county, if any.
2.
Individual Notice to Control Noxious Weeds.
Following publication of a general notice, if a County Weed Board determines that definite weed control measures are required to control noxious weeds on a particular property, the Board shall cause an individual notice to be served upon the owner or the person in possession of said property, giving specific instructions concerning when and how the noxious weeds are to be controlled within a specified period of time.
The individual notice shall also inform the property owner or operator of legal action which may be taken against him if he fails to comply with said notice.
3.
Notification of Noxious Weed Lien Assessment.
If it is deemed advisable, the Board of County Commissioners may cause noxious weeds to be controlled on a particular property and any expenses incurred by the county shall be paid by the owner of record or the person in possession of the property.
A notice shall be provided such person, showing an itemized cost statement of the labor and materials necessarily used in the work of said control measures.
This notice shall also state that the expense constitutes a lien against the property and shall be added to the general taxes unless payment is made to the County Treasurer within 90 days.
KEY: weed control November 3, 1997 Notice of Continuation June 13, 2003
4-2-2 4-17-3
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 36
R68.
Agriculture and Food, Plant Industry.
R68-14.
Quarantine Pertaining to Gypsy Moth - Lymantria Dispar.
R68-14-1.
Authority.
Promulgated under authority of 4-2-2 and 4-35-9.
R68-14-2.
Purpose.
For the following reasons this rule is enacted: 1.
Gypsy Moth (Lymantria dispar) has recently been found in the state of Utah, and 2.
it will survive and multiply rapidly in the state of Utah, and 3.
it is a serious pest to forest, residence, park, and agricultural tree plantings, and 4.
it is capable of destroying watershed areas, orchards, or ornamentals, and 5.
it is also a nuisance to the general public.
R68-14-3.
Definitions.
The definitions set forth in this section shall apply throughout this chapter.
A. "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Agriculture and Food of this state, or a duly authorized representative.
B. "Department" means the Utah State Department of Agriculture and Food.
C. "Interior quarantine" means a quarantine within the state of Utah established against the movement of designated plant pests, life stages, their hosts, and possible carriers from areas identified as being infested by the Utah State Department of Agriculture and Food.
D. "Exterior quarantine" means a quarantine established against the movement into Utah State of designated plant pests, life stages, their hosts, and possible carriers from areas identified as being infested by the Utah State Department of Agriculture and Food.
E. "Gypsy Moth (Lymantria dispar)" means a lepidopterous insect of the family Lymantriidae which in the larval stage defoliates many species of trees and shrubs.
F. "Qualified certified applicator (QCA)" means any individual who is (1) certified pursuant to the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (FIFRA) (86 Stat. 983; 7 U.S.C. 136b) as a certified commercial applicator in a category allowing use of the Restricted Use Pesticides recommended for use in the treatment of outdoor household articles for gypsy moth and (2) who has attended and completed a workshop segment approved by USDA Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service on the identification and treatment of gypsy moth life stages on regulated articles.
G. Regulated Articles: are those articles and commodities listed in R68-14-5 A.-E. R68-14-4.
Quarantine - Gypsy Moth - Area Under Order.
A. Interior Quarantine.
Real and personal properties within the State where the department identified multiple gypsy moth life stages and where occupants and/or owners of those properties have been notified by the department of the gypsy moth infestation and to the effect that the subject property is under quarantine pursuant to Title 4, Chapter 2, Section 2.
The
department shall post quarantined areas both at entrance points and exit points with signs no smaller than 22" x 34".
B. Exterior Quarantine.
All areas of the United States and Canada that are declared high risk by the United States Department of Agriculture, Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, plant protection and quarantine or Utah Commissioner of Agriculture and Food.
R68-14-5.
Quarantine/Gypsy Moth Hosts and Carriers.
The following regulated articles and commodities are placed under quarantine when located within or originating from an area as described in R68-14-4 A. Trees, shrubs with persistent woody stems, Christmas trees, and parts of such trees and shrubs (except seeds, fruits and cones).
B. Timber and building materials, including but not limited to such items as lumber, planks, poles, logs, firewood, pulpwood, fencing, and building blocks.
C. Mobile homes, recreational vehicles, trailers, boats, camping gear, and associated equipment.
D. Outdoor household articles including but not limited to such items as furniture, toys, garden tools, garden machinery, animal houses, storage sheds.
E.
Any other items or means of conveyance not covered above when that item or conveyance is determined by the Commissioner to present a hazard of the spread of any life stage of gypsy moth. R68-14-6.
Gypsy Moth Quarantine Restrictions - Interior.
Items under quarantine are prohibited of movement from the area under quarantine except as follows: A.
Any item under quarantine may be inspected and certified for movement by a Department or Federal Inspector.
In addition, OHA's can be certified if inspected and found free of all stages of gypsy moth by QCA or the homeowner.
B. Garden prunings from trees and shrubs may be removed from quarantine areas only when they are moved in tarped vehicles to the city or county dumps where such material is to be burned, incinerated, buried, composted, or otherwise treated or handled in a manner that is approved by the Commissioner and does not pose a hazard to the spread of gypsy moth life stages.
C.
Such items cleaned or treated shall be certified by a Department or Federal Inspector, before movement from the quarantine area.
In addition, OHA's can also be cleaned or treated by a QCA or homeowner before movement from the quarantine area.
D. Expense of cleaning or treatment of articles or commodities for gypsy moth shall be the responsibility of the person in possession of the articles or commodities, or the consignee in case of commercial shipment by common carriers of household goods.
R68-14-7.
Gypsy Moth Quarantine Restrictions - Exterior.
Quarantined articles and commodities are prohibited entry into the state of Utah from areas described by R68-14-5 B. except under the following conditions: A.
All move-ins to the State of Utah from an area known to be infested with Gypsy Moth will be required to register their
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 37
Utah residence with the State Department of Agriculture and Food within thirty days of entering the State of Utah.
The Department of Agriculture and Food shall provide at points of entry, Driver License Offices, and County Courthouses selfaddressed, postage paid notice forms, or B. Submission to the Commissioner of a completed "Gypsy Moth Outdoor Household Articles Transit Inspection Follow-up Worksheet" or other official State or APHIS Inspection Form stating: 1.
origin of regulated articles prior to movement to Utah; 2.
Utah address stating where regulated articles are destined; 3.
address of owner if different from (2) above.
C.
The Department of Agriculture and Food may inspect all regulated articles of move-ins from quarantined areas.
The Department will maintain a Gypsy Moth trap for two entire seasons at residences of all new move-ins from quarantined areas.
D.
A person's failure to provide the Department of Agriculture and Food with the official Notice Form or form described in R68-14-7(B) above within the prescribed time shall be in violation of this quarantine and may be liable for costs associated with any eradication program caused by failure to notify the Department.
R68-14-8.
Certification of QCA's.
A.
To facilitate the issuance of certification for property movement out of quarantined areas the Commissioner shall provide training certification workshops to certify licensed pesticide applicators to become QCA's as defined in the definitions.
QCA may charge for inspections.
R68-14-9.
Forms.
A. Inspection certificate: The following form shall be issued by the Commissioner or QCA after thorough inspection.
R68-14-10.
Violations and Penalties.
A.
Any fraudulent use of or use of incorrect information on any forms used in the enforcement of this quarantine is a violation of this quarantine.
B.
Any intentional movement of Gypsy Moth life stages from any infested area is a violation.
Failure to perform or have inspection will constitute intentional movement as well as willfully moving property after notification.
C. Failure to register with the Department of Agriculture and Food within 30 days of moving to Utah from an area defined in R68-14-4 B, is a violation of this quarantine.
D. Failure to comply with any provisions of this quarantine shall be a violation of this quarantine.
E. Violators of this quarantine shall be subject to civil penalties of not more than $5,000 per violation as defined in 42-15.
KEY: quarantine 1989 Notice of Continuation June 13, 2003
4-2-2 4-35-9
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 38
R68.
Agriculture and Food, Plant Industry.
R68-16.
Quarantine Pertaining to Pine Shoot Beetle, Tomicus piniperda.
R68-16-1.
Authority.
A. Promulgated under authority of Subsection 4-2-2(1)(k), 4-2-2(1)(l)(ii) and Section 4-35-9.
B. Refer to the Notice of Quarantine, Pine Shoot Beetle, Tomicus piniperda (Linnaeus), Effective December 28, 1992, issued by Utah Department of Agriculture and Food.
R68-16-2.
Pest.
Pine Shoot Beetle, Tomicus Piniperda (Linnaeus), a beetle, family Scolytidae, is a serious pest of pine trees, and also known to damage fir, larch, and spruce trees by attacking the trunks and stems.
R68-16-3.
Areas Under Quarantine.
A.
The counties in the states listed below are hereby considered quarantined areas due to the confirmed presence of the Pine Shoot Beetle, Tomicus piniperda (Linnaeus): 1.
Illinois: Kane County 2.
Indiana: Allen, Elkhart, Fulton, Jasper, Kosciusko, LaGrange, Lake, Laporte, Marshall, Newton, Noble Porter, Pulaski, St. Joseph, Starke, Stueben, Wells and Whitley counties.
3.
Michigan: Cass, Monroe, St. Joseph and Barrien counties.
4.
New York: Erie and Niagara counties.
5.
Ohio: Ashland, Ashtabula, cuyahoga, Geauga, Huron, Lake, Lorain, Mahoning, Medina, Portage, Richland, Summit, Trumbull, and Wayne counties.
6.
Pennsylvania: Crawford, Erie, and Lawrence counties.
B.
Any areas not mentioned above and subsequently found to be infested.
R68-16-4.
Articles and Commodities Under Quarantine.
The following are hereby declared to be regulated articles, hosts, and possible carriers of the Pine Shoot Beetle: A.
The Pine Shoot Beetle, Tomicus piniperda (Linnaeus), in any living stage of development.
B. P lants of the genus Pinus spp. whether balled and burlapped or cut live for use as Christmas trees.
C. Timber or whole log forms of the genus Pinus spp., Abies spp., Larix spp., and Picea spp. with bark intact.
D. Ornamental foliage from the genus Pinus spp. E.
Any other plant, plant part, article, or means of conveyance when it is determined by the Commissioner of the Department of Agriculture and Food or the Commissioner's duly authorized agent to present a hazard of spreading live Pine Shoot Beetle due to infestation or exposure to infestation by Pine Shoot Beetle.
R68-16-5.
Restrictions.
A.
All articles and commodities under quarantine are prohibited entry into Utah from an area under quarantine with the following exceptions: 1.
From uninfested areas of the states listed in R68-16-3 when accompanied by a certificate of origin stating the origin of the material and that the plant material originated from an area
not known to be infested with the Pine Shoot Beetle.
2.
Regulated logs and lumber may be permitted entry only when such articles are certified by an authorized state or federal inspector to have been fumigated in accordance with the following schedule: Logs and lumber may be treated with methyl bromide at normal atmospheric pressure with 48 g/m3 (3 lbs/1000 ft.3) for 16 hours at 21 C (70 F), or above, or 80 g/m3 (5 lb./1000 ft. 3) for 16 hours at 4.5 -22.5 C (40 -69 F).
Additionally, such treated articles shall be protected from reinfestation prior to shipping and an official fumigation certificate signed by or bearing a facsimile signature of the authorized agricultural inspection official of the state of origin shall accompany each load or lot of regulated articles so fumigated.
Such certificate shall include, but not be limited to the following information: Verification that the articles were fumigated, the date, the exact location or place of fumigation and the dosage of the fumigant used.
R68-16-6.
Disposition of Violations.
Any or all shipments or lots of quarantined articles or commodities listed in R68-16-4, arriving in Utah in violation of this quarantine shall immediately be sent out of the state, destroyed, or treated by a method and in a manner as directed by the Commissioner of the Utah Department of Agriculture and Food or his agent.
Treatment shall be performed at the expense of the owner, or owners, or their duly authorized agent.
KEY: quarantine 1994 Notice of Continuation June 13, 2003
4-2-2(1)(k) 4-2-2(1)(1)(ii) 4-35-9
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003 1994 Notice of Continuation June 13, 2003
Page 39 4-2-2(1)(k) 4-2-2(1)(1)(ii)
R68.
Agriculture and Food, Plant Industry.
R68-17.
Quarantine Pertaining to Necrotic Strain of the Potato Virus Y. R68-17-1.
Authority.
A. Promulgated under authority of Subsection 4-2-2(1)(k) and 4-2-2(1)(l)(ii).
B. Refer to the Notice of Quarantine, Necrotic Strain of the Potato Virus Y, effective April 15, 1993, issued by Utah Department of Agriculture and Food.
R68-17-2.
Disease.
Necrotic Strain of the Potato Virus Y, a virus disease of many plant species, mostly in the family Solanacea.
R68-17-3.
Areas Under Quarantine.
A.
The Canadian provinces listed below are hereby considered regulated areas due to the confirmed presence of the Necrotic Strain of the Potato Virus Y: 1.
New Brunswick 2.
Nova Scotia 3.
Ontario 4.
Prince Edward Island 5.
Quebec B.
Any areas not mentioned above and subsequently found to be infested.
R68-17-4.
Articles and Commodities Under Quarantine.
The following are hereby declared to be regulated articles, hosts and possible carriers of the Necrotic Strain of the Potato Virus Y: A. Potatoes for propagation.
B. Plants of the family Solanaceae.
C.
Any other plant, plant part, article, or means of conveyance when it is determined by the Commissioner of the Department of Agriculture and Food or the Commissioner's duly authorized agent to present a hazard of introducing the Necrotic Strain of the Potato Virus Y into the State of Utah.
R68-17-5.
Restrictions.
All articles and commodities under quarantine are prohibited entry into Utah from an area under quarantine.
R68-17-6.
Exemptions.
Table stock and processing potatoes from quarantined areas may be shipped to Utah, provided they are treated with a sprout inhibitor registered for use in the State of Utah.
R68-17-7.
Disposition of Violations.
Any or all potato fields planted with seed potatoes from quarantined areas and any or all shipments of lots of quarantined articles or commodities listed in R68-17-4, arriving in Utah in violation of this quarantine shall immediately be sent out of the state, destroyed, or treated by a method in a manner as directed by the Commissioner of the Utah Department of Agriculture and Food or his duly authorized agent.
Treatment shall be performed at the expense of the owner, or owners, or their duly authorized agent.
KEY: quarantine
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 40
R81.
Alcoholic Beverage Control, Administration.
R81-8.
Manufacturers (Distillery, Winery, Brewery).
R81-8-1.
Application.
An application for a manufacturer (distillery, winery, brewery) license shall be included in the agenda of the monthly commission meeting for consideration for issuance of a manufacturer license when the requirements of Sections 32A-8102, -103, and -105 have been met, and a completed application has been received by the department.
R81-8-2.
Out of State Business.
Brewers which are located outside the state which desire to sell and deliver beer containing an alcohol content of less than 4% alcohol by volume, to licensed beer wholesalers, must obtain a certificate of approval from the department pursuant to Sections 32A-8-101(4) and 32A-11-106(2).
KEY: alcoholic beverages April 29, 2002 Notice of Continuation December 18, 2001
32A-1-107
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 41
R137.
Career Service Review Board, Administration.
R137-2.
Government Records Access and Management Act.
R137-2-1.
Purpose.
The purpose of this rule is to provide procedures for access to government records of the Career Service Review Board.
R137-2-2.
Authority.
The authority for this rule is found in Sections 63-2-204 and 63-2-904 of the Government Records Access and Management Act (GRAMA).
R137-2-3.
Definitions.
A. "Administrator" means the Administrator of the Career Service Review Board as set forth at Sections 67-19a-101(1) and 67-19a-204.
B. "CSRB" means the Career Service Review Board.
C. "Chairman" means the person mentioned at Section 6719a-201(5).
D. "GRAMA" means the Government Records Access and Management Act as enacted by the 1992 Utah Legislature, Sections 63-2-101 through -909, Utah Code Annotated.
E. "Records Officer" means the individual responsible to fulfill Section 63-2-103(21) of the GRAMA.
R137-2-4.
Records Officer.
A.
The records officer for the CSRB shall be the administrator.
B.
The records officer shall review and respond to requests for access to CSRB records, according to Section 63-2-903.
R137-2-5.
Requests for Access.
A. Requests for access to CSRB records shall be in writing and must include the requester's name, mailing address, daytime telephone number if available, and a brief but reasonably specific description of the records being requested.
A records access form may be obtained from the CSRB upon request, but this form is not required in order to petition for access to CSRB records.
B. Requests should be directed to either Records Officer or Administrator, Career Service Review Board, 1120 State Office Building, Salt Lake City, UT 84114.
C.
The CSRB is not required to respond to requests submitted to the wrong person, agency or location within the time limits set by the GRAMA.
R137-2-6.
Fees.
A. Reasonable fees may be charged for copies of records provided upon request.
Fees for photocopying may be charged as authorized by Section 63-2-203.
A fee schedule may be obtained from the CSRB office by telephoning (801) 538-3048 or by making a personal inquiry at the CSRB office during regular business hours.
B.
The CSRB may require payment of past fees and future fees before beginning to process a request if fees are expected to exceed $50.00, or if the requester has not paid fees from previous requests.
R137-2-7.
Waiver of Fees.
Fees for duplication and compilation of a record may be
waived under certain circumstances described in Section 63-2203(3).
Requests for application of a waiver of a fee may be made to the CSRB records officer.
R137-2-8.
Requests to Amend a Record.
A.
An individual may contest the accuracy or completeness of a document pertaining to the requester, pursuant to Section 63-2-603.
Requests to amend a record shall be processed as informal adjudications under the Utah Administrative Procedures Act.
All requests to amend a record must include the requester's name, mailing address, daytime telephone number if available, and a brief but reasonably specific description of the record to be amended.
B. Adjudicative proceedings concerning requests to amend a record or records under the GRAMA shall be informal adjudicative proceedings and shall comply with Section 63-2401 et seq. R137-2-9.
Time Periods under GRAMA.
The provisions of Rule 6 of the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure shall apply to calculate time periods specified in GRAMA.
R137-2-10.
Appeal of Agency Decision.
A.
If a requester is dissatisfied with the CSRB's initial decision, the requester may appeal that decision to the CSRB chairman under the procedures of Section 63-2-401 et seq. B.
A person may contest the accuracy or completeness of a document pertaining to that individual according to Section 63-2-603.
The initial request must be made to the CSRB administrator.
An appeal from the CSRB administrator's decision may be made to the CSRB chairman under the procedures of Section 63-2-603.
C. Appeals of requests to amend a record shall be informal adjudications under the Utah Administrative Procedures Act.
R137-2-11.
Request for Access for Research Purposes.
Access to private or controlled records for research purposes is allowed by GRAMA under Section 63-2-202(8).
Requests for access to such records for research purposes may be made directly to the CSRB records officer.
KEY: public records, records access* 1993 Notice of Continuation June 18, 2003
63-2-101 through 63-2-909 67-19a-203(8)
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 42
R151.
Commerce, Administration.
R151-14.
New Automobile Franchise Act Rule.
R151-14-1.
Title.
This rule shall be known as the "New Automobile Franchise Act Rule".
R151-14-2.
Authority - Purpose.
In accordance with the New Automobile Franchise Act, Title 13, Chapter 14, this rule governs administrative proceedings before the Utah Motor Vehicle Franchise Advisory Board, and is adopted under the authority of Subsection 13-14104(1).
R151-14-3.
Adjudicative Proceedings.
(1) Informal Proceeding.
Pursuant to Section 13-14-104, administrative and adjudicative proceedings conducted before the Board shall be conducted informally.
(2) Applicable Rules.
In addition to Title 63, Chapter 46b, Utah Administrative Procedures Act, any adjudicative proceedings required by the New Automobile Franchise Act shall be conducted in accordance with this rule and with the Department of Commerce Administrative Procedures Act Rule, R151-46b.
(3) Procedure for Substitution of Presiding Officer.
In accordance with Sections 63-46b-2(1)(h) and 13-14-107(2), the Executive Director of the Department may upon his/her own motion substitute an administrative law judge as the presiding officer to conduct certain aspects of the adjudicative proceedings before the Board if he/she determines that fairness to the parties would not be compromised by such substitution.
The substitution order shall give any party who feels that such substitution would compromise fairness an opportunity to request the Executive Director to reconsider the substitution by submitting written objections and supporting arguments to the Executive Director.
Upon reconsideration, the Executive Director may leave the order intact or make such other orders as he/she deems appropriate.
(4) Submissions.
Except as otherwise expressly required or permitted in this Rule or in the New Automobile Franchise Act, all correspondence or other submissions shall be directed to the Chair of the Utah Motor Vehicle Franchise Advisory Board at the Utah Department of Commerce.
(5) Form of Pleadings.
A request for approval of an act regulated by the New Automobile Franchise Act shall be commenced by the filing of a pleading headed "BEFORE THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE" and captioned "Request for Agency Action."
The pleading shall be substantially in compliance with the Utah Administrative Procedures Act, Section 63-46b-3, and the Department of Commerce Administrative Procedures Act Rule, R151-46b-7.
(6) Answer.
If the presiding officer determines that an answer to any request for agency action would be helpful to the proceedings, the presiding officer may order a party to the proceedings to file an answer.
(7) Memoranda.
If the presiding officer determines that prehearing briefs would be helpful to the proceedings, the presiding officer may order the parties to submit memoranda in accordance with any scheduling order entered by the presiding officer.
(8) GRAMA.
Any requests for records of the proceedings before the Board will be governed by GRAMA (Government Records Access and Management Act), Utah Code Ann.
Section 63-2-101 et seq.
Any schedule of records classifications maintained by the Department shall be made available to the parties upon request.
R151-14-4.
Registration.
(1) Each newly formed or otherwise not previously registered franchisor or franchisee shall request an initial registration form from the Board.
The Board shall provide a renewal form to each registered franchisor and franchisee at least 30 and not more than 60 days prior to the expiration of the current registration.
(2) A registrant may use the form provided by the Board to renew its registration or may submit a renewal request in another format so long as that request contains the following information: (a) Name of dealership/manufacturer; (b) Address of dealership/manufacturer; (c) Owners or stockholders and percentage of holding (5% or above only); (d) Line-makes manufactured, distributed, or sold; (e) If applicable, dealer number; and (f) Name and address of person designated for the purpose of receiving notices or process pursuant to the provisions of the New Automobile Franchise Act.
(3) At the option of the Board's chair, the processing of an application for registration by the Department staff may be delayed for a reasonable time to give the registrant an opportunity to cure technical defects in an application for registration.
KEY: automobiles, motor vehicles, franchises, recreational vehicles June 17, 2003 13-14-101 et seq.
Notice of Continuation November 14, 2001
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 43
R151.
Commerce, Administration.
R151-35.
Powersport Vehicle Franchise Act Rule.
R151-35-1.
Title.
This rule shall be known as the "Powersport Vehicle Franchise Act Rule".
R151-35-2.
Authority - Purpose.
In accordance with the Powersport Vehicle Franchise Act, Title 13, Chapter 35, this rule governs administrative proceedings before the Utah Powersport Vehicle Franchise Advisory Board, and is adopted under the authority of Subsection 13-35-104(1).
R151-35-3.
Adjudicative Proceedings.
(1) Informal Proceeding.
Pursuant to Section 13-35-104, administrative and adjudicative proceedings conducted before the Board shall be conducted informally.
(2) Applicable Rules.
In addition to Title 63, Chapter 46b, Utah Administrative Procedures Act, any adjudicative proceedings required by the Powersport Vehicle Franchise Act shall be conducted in accordance with this rule and with the Department of Commerce Administrative Procedures Act Rule, R151-46b.
(3) Procedure for Substitution of Presiding Officer.
In accordance with Sections 63-46b-2(1)(h) and 13-35-107(2), the Executive Director of the Department may upon his/her own motion substitute an administrative law judge as the presiding officer to conduct certain aspects of the adjudicative proceedings before the Board if he/she determines that fairness to the parties would not be compromised by such substitution.
The substitution order shall give any party who feels that such substitution would compromise fairness an opportunity to request the Executive Director to reconsider the substitution by submitting written objections and supporting arguments to the Executive Director.
Upon reconsideration, the Executive Director may leave the order intact or make such other orders as he/she deems appropriate.
(4) Submissions.
Except as otherwise expressly required or permitted in this Rule or in the Powersport Vehicle Franchise Act, all correspondence or other submissions shall be directed to the Chair of the Utah Powersport Vehicle Franchise Advisory Board at the Utah Department of Commerce.
(5) Form of Pleadings.
A request for approval of an act regulated by the Powersport Vehicle Franchise Act shall be commenced by the filing of a pleading headed "BEFORE THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE" and captioned "Request for Agency Action."
The pleading shall be substantially in compliance with the Utah Administrative Procedures Act, Section 63-46b-3, and the Department of Commerce Administrative Procedures Act Rule, R151-46b-7.
(6) Answer.
If the presiding officer determines that an answer to any request for agency action would be helpful to the proceedings, the presiding officer may order a party to the proceedings to file an answer.
(7) Memoranda.
If the presiding officer determines that prehearing briefs would be helpful to the proceedings, the presiding officer may order the parties to submit memoranda in accordance with any scheduling order entered by the presiding officer.
(8) GRAMA.
Any requests for records of the proceedings before the Board will be governed by GRAMA (Government Records Access and Management Act), Utah Code Ann.
Section 63-2-101 et seq.
Any schedule of records classifications maintained by the Department shall be made available to the parties upon request.
R151-35-4.
Registration.
(1) Initial Registration.
Each franchisor and franchisee doing business in this state shall request an initial registration form from the Board.
The Board will provide an initial registration form to each known franchisor and franchisee.
(2) Annual Renewals.
The Board will provide a renewal form to each registered franchisor and franchisee at least 30 and not more than 60 days prior to the expiration of the current registration.
(3) A registrant may use the form provided by the Board as its initial or renewal registration or may submit a registration or renewal request in another format so long as that request contains the following information: (a) Name of dealership/manufacturer; (b) Address of dealership/manufacturer; (c) Owners or stockholders and percentage of holding (5% or above only); (d) Line-makes manufactured, distributed, or sold; (e) If applicable, dealer number; and (f) Name and address of person designated for the purpose of receiving notices or process pursuant to the provisions of the Powersport Vehicle Franchise Act.
(4) At the option of the Board chair, the processing of an application for registration by the Department staff may be delayed for a reasonable time to give the registrant an opportunity to cure technical defects in an application for registration.
KEY: motorcycles, dirt bikes, off road vehicles, franchises June 17, 2003 13-35-101 et seq.
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 44
R156.
Commerce, Occupational and Professional Licensing.
R156-3a.
Architect Licensing Act Rules.
R156-3a-101.
Title.
These rules are known as the "Architect Licensing Act Rules".
R156-3a-102.
Definitions.
In addition to the definitions in Title 58, Chapters 1 and 3a, as used in Title 58, Chapters 1 and 3a or these rules: (1) "ARE" means the NCARB Architectural Registration Examination.
(2) "Committee" means the IDP Committee created in Section R156-3a-201.
(3) "Complete and final" as used in Subsection 58-3a603(1) means "complete construction plans" as defined in Subsection 58-3a-102(4).
(4) "Divisions of the ARE" mean: (a) pre-design (PD): satisfied by passing Division A between 1983 and 1996; (b) site planning (SP): satisfied by passing both Division B- Written and Division B-Graphic between 1988 and 1996; or by passing Division B between 1983 and 1987; (c) building planning (BP): satisfied by passing Division C between 1983 and 1996; (d) building technology (BT): satisfied by passing Division C between 1983 and 1996; (e) general structures (GS): satisfied by passing Division D/F between 1988 and 1996; or by passing both Division D and Division F between 1983 and 1987; (f) lateral forces (LF): satisfied by passing Division E between 1983 and 1996; (g) mechanical and electrical systems (ME): satisfied by passing Division G between 1983 and 1996; (h) materials and methods (MM): satisfied by passing Division H between 1983 and 1996; and (i) construction documents and services (CD): satisfied by passing Division I between 1983 and 1996.
(5) "EESA" means the Education Evaluation Services for Architects.
(6) "Employee, subordinate, associate, or drafter of an architect" as used in Subsections 58-3a-102(8), 58-3a-603(1)(b) and these rules means one or more individuals not licensed as an architect who are working for, with, or providing architectural services directly to the licensed architect under the supervision of the licensed architect.
(7) "Intern Development Program" or "IDP" as used in Subsection R156-3a-302(2) means a NCARB approved training program.
(8) "NAAB" means the National Architectural Accrediting Board.
(9) "NCARB" means the National Council of Architectural Registration Boards.
(10) "Program of diversified practical experience" as used in Subsection 58-3a-302(1)(e) means: (a) current licensure in a recognized jurisdiction; or (b) the training standards and requirements set forth in the Intern Development Program.
(11) "Recognized jurisdiction" as used in Subsections 583a-302(2)(d)(i) and (iii), for licensure by endorsement, means
any state, district, territory of the United States, or any foreign country who issues licenses for architects, and whose licensure requirements include: (a) a bachelors or post graduate degree in architecture or equivalent education as set forth in Subsection R156-3a-301(2); (b) a program of diversified practical experience as set forth in Subsection R156-3a-102(10), or an equivalent training program; and (c) passing the ARE or passing a professional architecture examination that is equivalent to the ARE. (12) "Responsible charge" as used in Subsections 58-3a102(7), 58-3a-302(2)(d)(iv) and 58-3a-304(6) means direct control and management by a principal over the practice of architecture by an organization.
(13) "Under the direction of the architect" as used in Subsection 58-3a-102(8), as part of the definition of "supervision of an employee, subordinate, associate, or drafter of an architect" means that the unlicensed employee, subordinate, associate, or drafter of the architect engages in the practice of architecture only on work initiated by the architect, and only under the administration, charge, control, command, authority, oversight, guidance, jurisdiction, regulation, management, and authorization of the architect.
(14) "Unprofessional conduct" as defined in Title 58, Chapters 1 and 3a, is further defined, in accordance with Subsection 58-1-203(5), in Section R156-3a-501.
R156-3a-103.
Authority - Purpose.
These rules are adopted by the division under the authority of Subsection 58-1-106(1) to enable the division to administer Title 58, Chapter 3a.
R156-3a-104.
Organization - Relationship to Rule R156-1.
The organization of this rule and its relationship to Rule R156-1 is as described in Section R156-1-107.
R156-3a-201.
Advisory Peer Committee Created Membership - Duties.
(1) There is created in accordance with Subsection 58-1203(1)(f), the IDP Committee as an advisory peer committee to the Architect Licensing Board consisting of five members as follows: (a) one State IDP Coordinator; (b) one Education Coordinator; (c) two Intern IDP Coordinators; and (d) one member of the Utah Architects Licensing Board.
(2) The committee shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section R156-1-205.
(3) The duties and responsibilities of the committee shall include assisting the board in its duties, functions, and responsibilities defined in Subsection 58-1-202(1)(e) as follows: (a) promote an awareness of IDP by holding meetings and seminars on IDP; (b) establish a network of sponsors and advisors for IDP interns; (c) encourage firms to support IDP; (d) act as a resource to respond to questions on IDP received from advisors, sponsors, and interns; and (e) report to the board as directed.
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 45
R156-3a-301.
Qualifications for Licensure - Architecture Program Criteria.
In accordance with Subsection 58-3a-302(1)(d), the architecture program criteria are established as follows.
(1) The architecture program shall be accredited by either the National Architectural Accrediting Board (NAAB), or the Canadian Architectural Certification Board (CACB), or an architectural program equivalent to a NAAB accredited program.
(2) Equivalency shall be documented by submitting one of the following: (a) if educated in a foreign country, a comprehensive report prepared by EESA stating that the applicant has successfully completed an educational program that is equivalent to the NAAB accredited educational program; or (b) a current NCARB Council Record.
R156-3a-302.
Qualifications for Licensure - Program of Diversified Practical Experience.
In accordance with Subsection 58-3a-302(1)(e), an applicant shall establish completion of a program of diversified practical experience requirement by submitting documentation of: (1) IDP; (2) current licensure in a recognized jurisdiction; or (3) a current NCARB Council Record.
R156-3a-303.
Qualifications for Licensure - Examination Requirements.
(1) In accordance with Subsection 58-3a-302(1)(f), an applicant for licensure as an architect shall either submit documentation of a current NCARB Council Record or pass the following examinations: (a) as part of the application for licensure, pass all questions on the open book, take home Utah Law and Rule Examination; and (b) all divisions of the ARE as defined in Subsection R156-3a-102(4) with a passing score as established by NCARB.
(2) In accordance with Subsection 58-3a-302(2)(e), an applicant for licensure by endorsement shall either submit documentation of a current NCARB Council Record or pass the following examinations: (a) as part of the application for licensure, pass all questions on the open book, take home Utah Law and Rule Examination; and (b) all divisions of the ARE as defined in Subsection R156-3a-102(4) with a passing score as established by NCARB.
R156-3a-305.
Renewal Cycle - Procedures.
(1) In accordance with Subsection 58-1-308(1), the renewal date for the two-year renewal cycle applicable to licenses under Title 58, Chapter 3a is established by rule in Section R156-1-308.
(2) Renewal procedures shall be in accordance with Section R156-1-308.
R156-3a-501.
Unprofessional Conduct.
"Unprofessional conduct" includes: (1) submitting an incomplete final plan, specification,
report, or set of construction plans to: (a) a client, when the licensee represents, or could reasonably expect the client to consider, the plan, specification, report, or set of construction plans to be complete and final; or (b) a building official for the purpose of obtaining a building permit; (2) failing as a principal to exercise reasonable charge; (3) failing as a supervisor to exercise supervision of an employee, subordinate, associate or drafter; or (4) failing to conform to the generally accepted and recognized standards and ethics of the profession including those established in the August 2002 edition of the NCARB "Rules of Conduct", which is hereby incorporated by reference.
R156-3a-601.
Architectural Seal - Requirements.
In accordance with Section 58-3a-601, all final plans and specifications of buildings erected in this state, prepared by the licensee or prepared under the supervision of the licensee, shall be sealed in accordance with the following: (1) Each seal shall be a circular seal, 1-1/2 inches minimum diameter.
(2) Each seal shall include the licensee's name, license number, "State of Utah", and "Licensed Architect".
(3) Each seal shall be signed and dated with the signature and date appearing across the face of each seal imprint.
(4) Each original set of final plans and specifications, as a minimum, shall have the original seal imprint, original signature and date placed on the cover or title sheet.
(5) A seal may be a wet stamp, embossed, or electronically produced.
(6) Copies of the original set of plans and specifications which contain the original seal, original signature and date is permitted, if the seal, signature and date is clearly recognizable.
KEY: architects, licensing June 3, 2003 Notice of Continuation June 11, 2001
58-3a-101 58-1-106(1)(a) 58-1-202(1)(a)
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 46
R156.
Commerce, Occupational and Professional Licensing.
R156-28.
Veterinary Practice Act Rules.
R156-28-101.
Title.
These rules are known as the "Veterinary Practice Act Rules".
R156-28-102.
Definitions.
In addition to the definitions in Title 58, Chapters 1 and 28, as used in Title 58, Chapters 1 and 28 or these rules: (1) "AAVSB", as used in these rules, means the American Association of Veterinary State Boards.
(2) "AVMA", as used in these rules, means the American Veterinary Medical Association.
(3) "Direct supervision" means the supervising licensed veterinarian shall be present at the point and time at which professional services are being provided by the student or unlicensed person being supervised.
(4) "In association with licensed veterinarians" as used in Subsection 58-28-8(6) means providing consultation, performing a special procedure, or providing special expertise for a specialized case in the same facility as the Utah licensed veterinarian who requested the professional services.
(5) "Indirect supervision" means the supervising licensed veterinarian shall be available for immediate voice contact by telephone, radio, or other means and shall provide daily face-toface consultation and review of cases at the veterinary facility for the veterinary intern or unlicensed person being supervised.
(6) "NAVLE", as used in these rules, means the North American Veterinary Licensing Examination.
(7) "NBEC", as used in these rules, means the National Board Examination Committee of the American Veterinary Medical Association.
(8) "PAVE", as used in these rules, means Program for the Assessment of Veterinary Education Equivalence.
(9) "Practice of veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry" means those acts and practices defined in Subsection 58-28-2(4) and includes the implantation of any electronic device for the purpose of establishing or maintaining positive identification of animals.
(10) "Qualified continuing education" means continuing education that meets the standards set forth in Section R156-28304.
(11) "RACE", as used in these rules, means the Registry of Approved Continuing Education.
(12) "Supervision" as used in Subsection 58-28-8(2) means direct supervision.
(13) "Unprofessional conduct" as defined in Title 58, Chapters 1 and 28, is further defined in accordance with Subsection 58-1-203(5) in Section R156-28-502.
(14) "Veterinarian-client-patient relationship" means that the veterinarian has assumed the responsibility for making medical judgments regarding the health of the animal and the need for medical treatment, and the client who is the owner or other caretaker has agreed to follow the instruction of the veterinarian.
In addition, there is sufficient knowledge of the animal by the veterinarian to initiate at least a general or preliminary diagnosis of the medical condition of the animal.
This means that the veterinarian has recently seen and is personally acquainted with the keeping and care of the animal
by virtue of an examination of the animal, or by medically appropriate and timely visits to the premises where the animal is kept.
In addition, the practicing veterinarian is readily available for follow-up in case of adverse reactions or failure of the regimen of therapy.
R156-28-103.
Authority - Purpose.
These rules are adopted by the division under the authority of Subsection 58-1-106(1) to enable the division to administer Title 58, Chapter 28.
R156-28-104.
Organization - Relationship to Rule R156-1.
The organization of this rule and its relationship to Rule R156-1 is as described in Section R156-1-107.
R156-28-302a.
Qualifications for Licensure - Education Requirements.
In accordance with Subsections 58-1-203(2) and 58-1301(3), the education requirements for licensure in Subsection 58-28-4(3) are defined, clarified, or established as follows.
(1) Each applicant must have graduated from a veterinary college which held current accreditation by the Council on Education of the American Veterinary Medical Association (AVMA) at the time of his graduation as evidenced by an official transcript documenting the degree earned and the date of graduation or a notarized diploma.
(2) Each applicant who has received his veterinary education in a foreign veterinary school shall demonstrate educational equivalency of his foreign veterinary school with an accredited domestic veterinary school by submitting a Certificate of Competence issued by the AVMA Educational Commission for Foreign Veterinary Graduates (ECFVG) or the AAVSB Program for Assessment of Veterinary Education Equivalence (PAVE) Certificate.
R156-28-302b.
Qualifications for Licensure - Experience Requirements.
In accordance with Subsections 58-1-203(2) and 58-1301(3), the experience requirements for licensure in Subsection 58-28-4(4) are defined, clarified, or established as follows.
(1) Each applicant for licensure as a veterinarian shall complete an approved internship which includes a minimum of 1000 hours of supervised veterinary practice to be earned in not less than six consecutive months and not more than 12 consecutive months.
Successful completion of an approved internship shall be documented and submitted to the division in a form provided by the division.
(2) Each veterinary intern shall have a valid Utah veterinary internship license before beginning his 1000 hour internship.
(3) An applicant for a veterinary internship license must make application to the division on a form provided by the division.
(4) A veterinary intern shall practice under the indirect supervision of the licensed Utah veterinarian approved by the division in consultation with the board or a licensed Utah veterinarian designated by the supervising veterinarian.
The veterinary intern must reapply to the division for any change of supervising veterinarian.
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 47
(5) The 1000 hour internship shall not begin before the applicant has graduated from an AVMA accredited veterinary college, passed the Utah Veterinary Law and Rules Examination and obtained his Utah internship license.
(6) If the applicant is a graduate of a foreign college of veterinary medicine, he must document ECFVG or PAVE certification or acceptance to take the ECFVG or PAVE examination and meet with the board before obtaining a Utah internship license and beginning his 1000 hour internship.
(7) Evidence of a completed internship shall be documented by the supervising veterinarian and the veterinary intern to the division at the time application is made for Utah licensure as a veterinarian on a form provided by the division.
R156-28-302c.
Qualifications for Licensure - Examination Requirements.
In accordance with Subsections 58-1-203(2) and 58-1301(3), the examination requirements for licensure in Subsection 58-28-4(2) are defined, clarified, or established as follows: (1) For applicants sitting for the examinations listed in this subsection prior to May 1, 2000: (a) the National Board Examination (NBE) of the National Board Examination Committee (NBEC) of the American Veterinary Medical Association (AVMA) with a minimum passing score as determined by the NBEC; (b) the Clinical Competency Test (CCT) of the NBEC of the AVMA with a minimum passing score as determined by the NBEC; and (c) the Utah Veterinary Law and Rules Examination with a minimum passing score of 75%.
(2) For applicants who do not sit for the examinations listed in Subsection (1) prior to May 1, 2000: (a) the NAVLE with a passing score as determined by the NBEC; and (b) the Utah Veterinary Law and Rules Examination with a minimum passing score of 75%.
(3) To be eligible to sit for the NAVLE examination, an applicant shall submit the following: (a) an application for licensure; (b) application fee; (c) a letter from the Dean of an approved veterinary school confirming the applicant is a student in good standing and will graduate with the next graduating class; and (d) a copy of the test application submitted to NAVLE.
R156-28-302d.
Qualifications for Licensure - Content of Utah Veterinary Law and Rules Examination.
The Utah Veterinary Law and Rules Examination shall cover five content areas: (1) the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing Act, Title 58, Chapter 1; (2) the General Rules of the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing, R156-1; (3) the Veterinary Practice Act, Title 58, Chapter 28; (4) the Veterinary Practice Act Rules, R156-28; and (5) the State of Utah rules governing the admission and inspection of livestock, poultry, and other animals, R58-1.
R156-28-302e.
Qualifications for Licensure - Meet With the Board.
Applicants may be requested to meet with the board, at the discretion of the division or board, to satisfy the board that the applicant is qualified to practice veterinary medicine in the state.
R156-28-303.
Renewal Cycle - Procedures.
(1) In accordance with Subsection 58-1-308(1), the renewal date for the two-year renewal cycle applicable to licensees under Title 58, Chapter 28 is established by rule in Section R156-1-308.
(2) Renewal procedures shall be in accordance with Section R156-1-308.
R156-28-304.
Continuing Education.
(1) There is hereby established a continuing professional education requirement for all individuals licensed under Title 58, Chapter 28.
(2) During each two year period commencing on September 30 of each even numbered year, a licensee shall be required to complete not less than 24 hours of qualified professional education directly related to the licensee's professional practice.
(3) The required number of hours of professional education for an individual who first becomes licensed during the two year period shall be decreased in a pro-rata amount equal to any part of that two year period preceding the date on which that individual first became licensed.
(4) Qualified professional education under this section shall: (a) have an identifiable clear statement of purpose and defined objective for the educational program directly related to the practice of a veterinarian; (b) be relevant to the licensee's professional practice; (c) be presented in a competent, well organized, and sequential manner consistent with the stated purpose and objective of the program; (d) be prepared and presented by individuals who are qualified by education, training, and experience; and (e) have associated with it a competent method of registration of individuals who actually completed the professional education program and records of that registration and completion are available for review.
(5) Credit for professional education shall be recognized in accordance with the following: (a) unlimited hours shall be recognized for professional education as a student or presenter, completed in blocks of time of not less than one hour in formally established classroom courses, seminars, lectures, wet labs, or specific veterinary conferences approved or sponsored by: (i) the American Veterinary Medical Association; (ii) the Utah Veterinary Medical Association; (iii) the American Animal Hospital Association; (iv) the American Association of Equine Practitioners; (v) the American Association of Bovine Practitioners; (vi) certifying boards approved by the RACE of the AVMA; (vii) the Western Veterinary Conference; or (viii) other state veterinary medical associations;
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 48
(b) no more than five continuing education hours may be counted for being the primary author of an article published in a peer reviewed scientific journal and no more than two continuing education hours may be counted for being a secondary author; and (c) no more than six continuing education hours may be in practice management courses.
(6) A licensee shall be responsible for maintaining competent records of completed qualified professional education for a period of four years after close of the two year period to which the records pertain.
It is the responsibility of the licensee to maintain such information with respect to qualified professional education to demonstrate it meets the requirements under this section.
(7) A licensee who documents that he/she is engaged in full time activities or is subjected to circumstances which prevent that licensee from meeting the continuing professional education requirements established under this section may be excused from the requirement for a period of up to three years; however, it is the responsibility of the licensee to document the reasons and justify why the requirement could not be met.
R156-28-305.
Exemptions From Licensure.
In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Sections 58-1-307 and 58-28-8, the following are exempt from the licensing provisions of this chapter, subject to the stated circumstances and conditions: (1) any unlicensed personnel of a licensed veterinarian performing duties other than diagnosis, prescription or surgery under the direct supervision of the licensed veterinarian or under the indirect supervision of said licensed veterinarian while carrying out ongoing care for hospitalized patients; and (2) the implantation of any electronic device for identifying animals by established humane societies, animal control organizations or governmental agencies that provide appropriate training.
R156-28-502.
Unprofessional Conduct.
Unprofessional conduct includes: (1) any deviation in the minimum standards of veterinary practice set forth in Section R156-28-503; (2) permitting an unlicensed person under his supervision to assist or engage in acts or practices in which the individual is not competent; (3) permitting an unlicensed person under his supervision to engage in acts or practices included in the definition of the practice of veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry without direct supervision or without indirect supervision while carrying out ongoing care for hospitalized patients; and (4) permitting an unlicensed person under his supervision to perform surgery, to diagnose or prescribe.
R156-28-503.
Minimum Standards of Practice.
(1) A veterinarian shall compile and maintain written records on each patient to minimally include: (a) client's name, address and phone number, if telephone is available; (b) patient's identification, such as name, number, tag, species, age and gender, except for herds, flocks or other large
groups of animals which may be more generally defined; (c) veterinarian's diagnosis or evaluation of the patient; (d) treatments rendered including drugs used and dosages; and (e) date of service.
(2) A veterinarian shall make available to each client a statement of charges.
(3) A veterinarian shall maintain a sanitary environment to avoid sources and transmission of infection to include the proper routine disposal of waste materials and proper sterilization or sanitation of all equipment used in diagnosis and treatment.
(4) A veterinarian shall assure a valid veterinarian-clientpatient relationship in the use, prescription, or sale of any veterinary prescription drug, or the prescribing of an extra-label use of any drug.
(5) Medical records including radiographs are the physical property of the hospital or the proprietor of the practice that prepares them.
(6) The veterinary facility shall have minimum indoor lighting to provide reasonable visibility: (a) halls and wards with 20 foot candles; (b) reception area with 50 foot candles; (c) examining rooms at table elevation with 70 foot candles; and (d) surgery table elevation with 150 foot candles.
(7) The veterinary facility shall have adequate measures for the control of objectionable noises and odors in compliance with applicable health codes and standards of practice.
(8) The veterinary facility shall contain the following: (a) a reception room and office, or a combination of the two; (b) an examination room or area that is separate from the other areas of the facility and of sufficient size to accommodate the doctor, assistant, patient and client; and (c) a sanitary surgery room or area which is separate and distinct from all other rooms, except in a large animal practice where modifications may be necessary to accommodate large animal surgery.
(9) The veterinary facility shall have an alternate source of lighting to be used in the event of power failure.
(10) The veterinary facility shall have appropriate temperature and ventilation to assure the comfort of all patients.
(11) The veterinary facility shall have an acceptable sanitary system for the disposal of deceased animals.
(12) In those veterinary facilities where animals are retained for treatment or hospitalization, the following shall be provided: (a) separate compartments, one for each animal, maintained in a sanitary manner as to assure comfort, and be of a design and construction so as to facilitate sanitation procedures; (b) facilities and efforts allowing for the effective separation of contagious and noncontagious cases; (c) exercise areas which provide and allow effective separation of animals and their waste products; and (d) adequate fire precautions according to local building and fire codes.
(13) The following equipment is required in a veterinary
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 49
practice: (a) an adequate means of sterilizing all appropriate equipment; (b) autoclave equipment shall be properly utilized in those facilities where major surgery is conducted; (c) surgical packs including drapes, gloves, sponges, towels, and adequate instrumentation; (d) anesthetic equipment in accordance with the level of surgery performed available at all times; and (e) oxygen resuscitating equipment available on the premises at all times.
(14) The following shall apply to the use of anesthesia: (a) preanesthetic examination shall be performed on the patient by the attending veterinarian, unless contraindicated; (b) the anesthetized animal shall be under supervision at all times and observed until at least the swallowing reflex has returned; and (c) when major surgery is performed, currently recognized anesthesia shall be used.
(15) Currently recognized procedures for aseptic surgery shall be utilized as follows: (a) scrubbing of surgical area with cleansing agent and water, unless contraindicated; (b) disinfecting of the surgical area of the patient where practical; (c) use of drapes where practical to cover the surgical area of the patient; (d) appropriate attire and personal sanitation of surgeons and assistants, where practical; and (e) properly prepared and sterilized surgical packs for each surgical procedure.
KEY: veterinary medicine, licensing June 3, 2003 Notice of Continuation April 15, 2002
58-1-106(1) 58-1-202(1) 58-28-1
UAC (As of July 1, 2003)
Printed: September 23, 2003
Page 50
R156.
Commerce, Occupational and Professional Licensing.
R156-31b.
Nurse Practice Act Rules.
R156-31b-101.
Title.
These rules are known as the "Nurse Practice Act Rules".
R156-31b-102.
Definitions.
In addition to the definitions in Title 58, Chapters 1 and 31b, as defined or used in these rules: (1) "Activities of daily living (ADLs)" means those personal activities in which individuals normally engage or are required for an individual's well-being whether performed by them alone, by them with the help of others, or for them by others, including eating, dressing, mobilizing, toileting, bathing, and other acts or practices to which an individual is subjected while under care in a regulated facility or under the orders of a licensed health care practitioner in a private residence.
(2) "APRN" means an advanced practice registered nurse.
(3) "Approved continuing education" in Subsection R15631b-303(3) means: (a) continuing education that has been approved by a professional nationally recognized approver of health related continuing education; (b) nursing education courses taken from an approved education program as defined in Section R156-31b-601; and (c) health related course work taken from an educational institution accredited by a regional institutional accrediting body identified in the "Accredited Institutions of Postsecondary Education", 1997-98 edition, published for the Commission of Recognition of Postsecondary Accreditation of the American Council on Education.
(4) "Approved education program" as defined in Subsection 58-31b-102(3) is further defined to include any nursing education program published in the documents entitled "State-Approved Schools of Nursing RN", 1998, and "StateApproved Schools of Nursing LPN/LVN", 1998, published by the National League for Nursing Accrediting Co
